The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Standard Oratorios, by George P. Upton

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: The Standard Oratorios
       Their Stories, Their Music, And Their Composers

Author: George P. Upton

Release Date: September 28, 2007 [EBook #22793]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE STANDARD ORATORIOS ***




Produced by David Newman, Stephen Hutcheson and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net










                                   THE
                           Standard Oratorios

             THEIR STORIES, THEIR MUSIC, AND THEIR COMPOSERS


                              _A Handbook_

                           BY GEORGE P. UPTON

                                 CHICAGO
                        A. C. McCLURG AND COMPANY
                                  1893

                                Copyright
                        By A. C. McClurg and Co.
                               A.D. 1886.




                                PREFACE.


The "Standard Oratorios" is intended as a companion to the "Standard
Operas;" and with this purpose in view the compiler has followed as
closely as possible the same method in the arrangement and presentation
of his scheme. The main object has been to present to the reader a
comprehensive sketch of the oratorios which may be called "standard,"
outlining the sacred stories which they tell, and briefly indicating and
sketching their principal numbers, accompanied in each case with a short
biography of the composer and such historical matter connected with the
various works as is of special interest. The compiler has also included
in his scheme a sketch of the origin and development of the Oratorio as
illustrated in its three principal evolutionary stages, together with
descriptions of several works which are not oratorios in the strict
sense, but at the same time are sacred compositions written upon a large
scale and usually performed by oratorio societies, such as Bach's
"Passion Music" and "Magnificat," Berlioz's, Mozart's, and Verdi's
Requiems, Mendelssohn's "Hymn of Praise," Handel's "Dettingen Te Deum,"
Schumann's "Paradise and the Peri," and Rubinstein's "Tower of Babel."

As in the case of the "Standard Operas," the work has been prepared for
the general public rather than for musicians, and as far as practicable,
technical terms have been avoided. Description, not criticism, has been
the purpose of the volume, and the various works are described as fully
as the necessarily brief space allotted to each would allow. The utmost
pains have been taken to secure historical and chronological accuracy,
inasmuch as these details are nearly always matters of controversy. The
favor which has been so generously accorded to the "Standard Operas"
leads the compiler to believe that the "Standard Oratorios" will also be
welcomed by those who enjoy the sacred music of the great masters, and
that it will prove a valuable addition to other works of musical
reference.

                                                                G. P. U.

Chicago, September, 1886.




                                CONTENTS.


                                                                   PAGE
  PREFACE                                                             3
  THE ORATORIO                                                        9
  BACH                                                               31
    Christmas Oratorio                                               33
    The Saint Matthew Passion                                        39
    The Magnificat in D                                              48
  BEETHOVEN                                                          51
    The Mount of Olives                                              53
  BENNETT                                                            60
    The Woman of Samaria                                             62
  BERLIOZ                                                            68
    The Requiem                                                      70
  BRAHMS                                                             78
    The German Requiem                                               80
  COSTA                                                              82
    Eli                                                              84
  DVORÁK                                                             90
    The Stabat Mater                                                 92
  GOUNOD                                                             96
    The Redemption                                                   98
    Mors et Vita                                                    106
  HANDEL                                                            114
    Israel in Egypt                                                 117
    Saul                                                            125
    Samson                                                          132
    The Messiah                                                     140
    Judas Maccabæus                                                 149
    The Dettingen Te Deum                                           155
  HAYDN                                                             159
    The Creation                                                    162
    The Seasons                                                     170
  LISZT                                                             177
    Legend of the Holy Elizabeth                                    180
    Christus                                                        186
  MACFARREN                                                         191
    St. John the Baptist                                            193
  MACKENZIE                                                         198
    The Rose of Sharon                                              199
  MENDELSSOHN                                                       206
    St. Paul                                                        208
    Hymn of Praise                                                  213
    Elijah                                                          218
    Christus                                                        229
  MOZART                                                            234
    Requiem                                                         236
  PAINE                                                             245
    St. Peter                                                       246
  ROSSINI                                                           251
    Stabat Mater                                                    253
  RUBINSTEIN                                                        258
    Tower of Babel                                                  260
    Paradise Lost                                                   264
  SAINT-SAËNS                                                       267
    Christmas Oratorio                                              269
  SCHUMANN                                                          271
    Paradise and the Peri                                           273
  SPOHR                                                             280
    Last Judgment                                                   283
  SULLIVAN                                                          290
    The Prodigal Son                                                292
    The Light of the World                                          294
  VERDI                                                             301
    Manzoni Requiem                                                 303
  SACRED MUSIC IN AMERICA                                           309
  APPENDIX                                                          329




                         THE STANDARD ORATORIOS.




                              THE ORATORIO.


The oratorio in its modern form is a musical setting of a sacred story or
text in a style more or less dramatic. Its various parts are assigned to
the four solo voices and to single or double chorus, with accompaniment
of full orchestra, sometimes amplified by the organ. Like the opera, it
has its recitative, linking together and leading up to the various
numbers. The origin of the word is to be found in the "oratory," or place
of prayer, where these compositions were first performed. Crescimbeni,
one of the earliest musical writers, says: "The oratorio had its origin
from San Filippo Neri,[1] who, in his chapel, after sermons and other
devotions, in order to allure young people to pious offices, and to
detain them from earthly pleasures, had hymns, psalms, and such like
prayers sung by one or more voices." In tracing its evolutionary stages,
its root will be found in the moralities, mysteries, and miracle-plays of
the thirteenth and fourteenth centuries, which were instituted for the
purpose of impressing Biblical events in symbolical form upon the early
converts to the Christian Church. These representations were entirely
dramatic in character, and their subjects, though always sacred, were
often grotesquely treated, and sometimes verged on buffoonery. Among the
actors, God, Christ, Satan, Mary, and the angels nearly always appeared;
later, the various virtues and vices were personified. The
representations were usually given in the streets or in fields, and
sometimes on the water. The highest dignitaries of the Church did not
disdain to act in these plays, nor did their promoters hesitate at times
to reduce the exhibition to the level of a Punch-and-Judy show by the
introduction of puppets cleverly manipulated. The earliest of these
miracle-plays in England were performed by the various London Companies.
The Tanners, for instance, produced the Fall of Lucifer. The Drapers
played the Creation, in which Adam and Eve appeared in their original
costume,--apparently without giving offence. The Water-Drawers naturally
chose the Deluge. In the scene describing the embarkation of Noah's
family, the patriarch has a great deal of trouble with his wife, who is
determined not to go aboard. She declares that if her worldly friends are
left behind, she will stay and drown with them, and he can

      "Rowe forth away when thou liste,
      And get thee another wif."

Noah expostulates with her in vain, grows furiously indignant, and bids
her

      "Come in, wif, in twenty devill ways,
      Or alles stand thee without."

Her friends the gossips entreat her to remain with them, and have a
carousal over a "pottel full of malmsey;" but at last Shem makes a virtue
of necessity and forces her into the ark, as the following scene shows:--

      "In faith, moder, in ye shall,
      Whither you will or noughte."

            NOE.

      "Well me wif into this boate."
          [_She gives him a box on the ear._]
      "Haue you that for thee note."

            NOE.

      "A le Mary this whote,
      A childre methinks my boate remeues,
      Our tarrying here heughly me grieues."
          [_She is forced into the ark._]

The earliest of these representations, so far as has been discovered,
dates back to the twelfth century, and is known as the Feast of Asses. In
these exhibitions, Balaam, superbly habited and wearing an enormous pair
of spurs, rode a wooden ass, in which the speaker was concealed. The ass
and the devil were favorite characters. The former sometimes appeared in
monkish garb and brayed responses to the intonations of the priests,
while the latter, arrayed in fantastic costumes, seems to have been the
prototype of clown in the pantomime. As late as 1783 the buffoonery of
this kind of exhibition continued. An English traveller, describing a
mystery called the "Creation" which he saw at Bamberg in that year,
says:--

  "Young priests had the wings of geese tied on their shoulders to
  personate angels. Adam appeared on the scene in a big curled wig and
  brocaded morning-gown. Among the animals that passed before him to
  receive their names were a well-shod horse, pigs with rings in their
  noses, and a mastiff with a brass collar. A cow's rib-bone had been
  provided for the formation of Eve; but the mastiff spied it out,
  grabbed it, and carried it off. The angels tried to whistle him back;
  but not succeeding, they chased him, gave him a kicking, and recovered
  the bone, which they placed under a trap-door by the side of the
  sleeping Adam, whence there soon emerged a lanky priest in a loose
  robe, to personate Eve."

The buffoonery and profanity of the early exhibitions, however, gradually
wore away when the Church assumed the monopoly of them and forbade
secular performances. Among the earlier works Burney cites the
following:--

  "The 'Conversion of St. Paul,' performed at Rome, 1440, as described by
  Sulpicius, has been erroneously called the first opera, or musical
  drama. 'Abram et Isaac suo Figliuolo,' a sacred drama (_azione sacra_),
  'showing how Abraham was commanded by God to sacrifice his son Isaac on
  the mountain,' was performed in the Church of St. Mary Magdalen in
  Florence, 1449. Another on the same subject, called 'Abraham and
  Sarah,' 'containing the good life of their son Isaac, and the bad
  conduct of Ishmael, the son of his handmaid, and how they were turned
  out of the house,' was printed in 1556; 'Abel e Caino,' and 'Samson,'
  1554; 'The Prodigal Son,' 1565; and 'La Commedia Spirituale dell'
  Anima' ('The Spiritual Comedy of the Soul'), printed at Siena, without
  date, in which there are near thirty personifications, besides Saint
  Paul, Saint John Chrysostom, two little boys who repeat a kind of
  prelude, and the announcing angel, who always speaks the prologue in
  these old mysteries. He is called _l'angelo che nunzia_, and his figure
  is almost always given in a wooden cut on the title-page of printed
  copies. Here, among the interlocutors, we have God the Father, Michael
  the archangel, a chorus of angels, the Human Soul with her guardian
  angel, memory, intellect, free-will, faith, hope, charity, reason,
  prudence, temperance, fortitude, justice, mercy, poverty, patience, and
  humility; with hatred, infidelity, despair, sensuality, a chorus of
  demons, and the devil. None of these mysteries are totally without
  music, as there are choruses and _laudi_, or hymns, that are sung in
  them all, and sometimes there was playing on instruments between the
  acts. In a play written by Damiano and printed at Siena, 1519,
  according to Crescimbeni, at the beginning of every act there was an
  octave stanza, which was sung to the sound of the lyra viol by a
  personage called Orpheus, who was solely retained for that purpose; at
  other times a madrigal was sung between the acts, after the manner of a
  chorus."

It was not until the time when San Filippo Neri began his dramatization
and performance of Biblical stories, such as "The Good Samaritan," "The
Prodigal Son," and "Tobias and the Angels," accompanied with music
written by his friend Giovanni Animuccia, that the term "Oratorio" came
to be accepted as the distinctive title of these sacred musical dramas.
His productions were very crudely and hastily arranged, his only purpose
having been to render his service attractive. After his death, however,
in 1595, his work was continued by Emilio del Cavaliere, a Roman
composer, who produced the first real oratorio which had as yet appeared.
It was entitled "La Rappresentazione dell' Anima e del Corpo" ("The Soul
and the Body"), and was first performed in February, 1600, in the oratory
of the Church of Santa Maria della Vallicella at Rome. Burney assigns to
it the credit of being "the first sacred drama or oratorio in which
recitative was used." The characters were Time, Human Life, the World,
Pleasure, the Intellect, the Soul, the Body, and two youths who were to
recite the prologue. The orchestra was composed of a double lyre, a
harpsichord, a large or double guitar, and two flutes. The composer has
left some curious instructions for the performance of his work; among
them the following:--

  "Pleasure, an imaginary character, with two companions, are to have
  instruments in their hands, on which they are to play while they sing
  and perform the ritornels.

  "Il Corpo, the Body, when these words are uttered, 'Sí che hormai alma
  mia,' etc., may throw away some of his ornaments, as his gold collar,
  feather from his hat, etc.

  "The World, and Human Life in particular, are to be gayly and richly
  dressed; and when they are divested of their trappings, to appear very
  poor and wretched, and at length dead carcases."

The ballet played a prominent part in all the early oratorios, and the
composer has also left detailed instructions for its guidance. During the
ritornels the four principal dancers accompanied them in "a ballet
enlivened with capers," and at the close of the performance stanzas were
sung, alternating with dances to be executed "sedately and
reverentially."

Emilio del Cavaliere was followed by a long line of Italian oratorio
composers who contributed to amplify and enrich this form of composition.
Among the earliest of these writers were Carissimi, Stradella, Scarlatti,
Mazzocchi, Federici, Pistocchi, Caldara, and Colonna. Carissimi perfected
the recitative and invested the music with more importance, giving it
something like equal rank with the dramatic character of the composition.
It was during his time that the personage known as "Historicus" was
introduced, who continued the action with explanatory passages between
the numbers,--a modern illustration of which may be found in the
"Narrator," as used by Gounod in his "Redemption." Carissimi employed
this expedient, and made it very effective. It is also claimed that he
was the first to introduce the cantata as a form of church music, and the
accompaniment of violins in motet performances. His most famous oratorios
are "Jephte," "Abraham et Isaac," "Le Jugement Dernier," and "Judicium
Salomonis." Of the first named, Hawkins says: "It consists of recitative,
airs, and chorus; and for sweetness of melody, artful modulation, and
original harmony, is justly esteemed one of the finest efforts of musical
skill and genius that the world knows of." Stradella, whose romantic
history is familiar to every one, is chiefly remembered by his attachment
for Hortensia, the vengeance of the Venetian lover which followed them so
long, and the song which saved the composer's life from the assassins.
This song was from his own oratorio, "St. John the Baptist," first
performed in the Church of St. John Lateran at Rome. Burney, who examined
the score, says: "The recitative is in general excellent, and there is
scarce a movement among the airs in which genius, skill, and study do not
appear." He also observes that this oratorio is the first work in which
the proper sharps and flats are generally placed at the clef. Scarlatti,
born in 1659, was a composer of great originality, as well as
versatility. He has left, in addition to his numerous operas and
cantatas, several oratorios, the most famous of which are "I Dolori di
Maria sempre Vergine," "Il Sagrifizio d' Abramo," "Il Martirio di Santa
Teodosia," and "La Concezzione della beata Vergine." He gave to the
oratorio more breadth, boldness, and dignity of style, improved the form
of the aria, made the accompanied recitative more dramatic, and developed
the treatment of several instruments, among them the trumpet, whose real
beauty and effect he was the first to bring out. Mazzocchi is chiefly
known by his oratorio, "Querimonia," produced in Rome in 1631, which is
said to have drawn tears from all who heard it. Federici wrote two
oratorios, "Santa Cristina," and "Santa Caterina de Sienna," in both of
which "interstitial" accompaniment is used for the first time; that is,
the violins, instead of accompanying the voice, repeat portions of the
melody in short symphonies. Pistocchi was one of the most prominent
stage-singers of his time, and established a school of singing at
Bologna. His most famous oratorio is entitled "Maria Vergine addolerata,"
and is without overture or chorus. Burney notes that in the close of this
work degrees of diminution of sound, such as "piano," "più piano," and
"pianissimo," are used for the first time. Caldara wrote a large number
of oratorios, mostly adapted to the poetry of Zeno and Metastasio, which
are said to have been delightful productions. Colonna, who was a
contemporary of Stradella, but not so famous, has left one oratorio, "St.
Basil," which is highly praised. Bononcini also, who afterwards became a
rival of Handel in England, wrote several oratorios before he went to
that country, the best of which is entitled "San Girolamo della Carità."

The conclusion of this period brings us to the second stage in the
evolution of the oratorio; namely, the passion-music, which may be
regarded as the connecting link between the earlier form as developed by
the Italian composers of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, and the
oratorio as it appeared after it had felt the mighty influence of Handel.
The  passion-music was the direct outgrowth of the passion-play. It
portrayed the passion of Christ. Its earliest forms are found in the
"Passio secundum Matthæum" by Stephani, a Nuremberg composer who
flourished in the sixteenth century; in a hymn-book published in 1573 by
Keuchental; and in Selenica's hymn-book, which appeared in 1587. Heinrich
Schütz, however, was the first to establish the passion-music in genuine
oratorio form. He was born in 1585, and died in 1672. The pupil of an
Italian master, the famous Gabrielli of Venice, he retained the Italian
forms, but added to them his native German force and solidity. His most
prominent work, "Die Auferstehung Christi," first performed at Dresden in
1623, where he was chapel-master to the Elector George I., is regarded as
the foundation of the German oratorio. The passion-music was usually
assigned to three priests, one of whom recited or intoned the part of
Jesus, the second that of the evangelist, and the third the other parts,
while the chorus served for the "turbæ," or people. In Schütz's music,
however, the narrative is given to a chorus of evangelists, the
accompaniment being performed by four viole di gamba and organ. There is
also a wide departure from all his predecessors in the entire absence of
dramatic action. His first work was followed by another, entitled "Die
sieben Worte Christi" ("The Seven Words of Christ"),--a subject which
Haydn subsequently treated with powerful effect,--and four different
compositions on the passion of our Lord. In these works are to be found
the real germs of the modern oratorio; they were preparing the way for
Handel and Bach. Johann Sebastiani succeeded Schütz, and in 1672
published a passion-music, in which the narrative appears in recitative
form and solidly harmonized chorales are used,--with this peculiarity,
that only the treble was sung, the other voices being taken by the
strings. In 1673 still another passion, written by Theile, was produced
at Lübeck. From this time until 1704 there appears to be a gap in the
sequence of works of this kind.

In the latter year, however, two more were produced, which made a
sensation all over Germany, "The Bleeding and Dying Jesus," by Reinhard
Keiser, and the "Passion nach Cap. 19 S. Johannis" by Handel. In the
former, cantatas were substituted for the narrative and chorales, one of
the numbers being in the nature of a love-song,--an innovation upon the
established forms which brought down upon the composer the indignation of
the critics both in the pulpit and out of it. The passion-music of Handel
was but a weak prelude to the colossal works which were to follow from
his pen. Between 1705 and 1718 several other passions appeared, written
by Keiser, Handel, Telemann, and Mattheson, preparing the way for the two
composers who above all others were destined to develop the chorale and
make it not only the foundation, but the all-pervading idea of their
passions; they were Carl Heinrich Graun and Johann Sebastian Bach. The
former's greatest work, "Der Tod Jesu," was produced in Berlin in 1755,
and was a revelation in the matter of chorale treatment. Nothing which
had preceded it could equal it in musical skill or artistic handling. But
there was one coming greater than Graun, the father of modern music,
Johann Sebastian Bach. "If all the music written since Bach's time should
be lost," says Gounod, "it could be reconstructed on the foundations
which he laid." Besides his "Christmas Oratorio," Bach wrote five passion
oratorios, two of which, the "St. John" and "St. Matthew," have been
published and are still performed. Of these two, the "St. Matthew" was
conceived on the grander scale. In this sublime masterpiece, the early
oratorio reached its highest form in Germany. It contains a narration
delivered by an evangelist, solo parts for the principal characters,
arias, choruses, double choruses, and chorales, the congregation joining
in the latter, in which the composer not only reveals an astonishing
dramatic power in the expression of sentiment and the adaptation of his
music to the feeling and situation of the characters, but also a depth
and accuracy of musical skill and invention which have been the despair
of composers from that time to this.

With Bach, the passion-music accomplished its purpose, and we now enter
upon the third and last stage of the evolution of oratorio. It is a new
form, and the change leads us to a new country. We have examined the
sacred dramas, with their musical setting, in Italy, and the
passion-music in Germany; and now comes the oratorio in England,--the
oratorio as we know it and hear it to-day. Handel was its great
originator. He began his English career as an operatic writer; but he
soon tired of setting music to the trivial subjects so common in opera,
which, as he himself declared, were not suited to a composer advancing in
years. There were other inducements, however, which led him to turn to
the oratorio, and among them one of the most powerful unquestionably was
his disgust with the cabals which were organized against him by Italian
rivals. "Esther" was his first English oratorio, and it made a great
success. It was followed by "Deborah" and "Athalia." His vigorous
dramatic power and close musical scholarship were never more apparent
than in these works. They aroused such an enthusiasm that from this time
forth (1737) he devoted himself exclusively to this species of
composition. He wrote in all seventeen English oratorios. In 1739 he
produced "Saul," one of the most dramatic of his sacred works, and the
colossal "Israel in Egypt." In 1741 he began "The Messiah," the most
sublime of all his oratorios and one of the profoundest works of human
genius in music. It still holds its place upon the stage as one of the
grandest expressions of human aspiration and divine truth, and no
Christmas is complete without its performance. Other works followed it,
among them "Samson," "Joseph," "Belshazzar," "Judas Maccabæus," "Joshua,"
and "Theodora," which Handel considered his best work; but none of them
equalled "The Messiah," in which his genius reached its climax. Of those
last named, only "Samson" and "Judas Maccabæus" still hold their place in
the modern repertory, though the other oratorios mentioned contain many
of his most effective numbers.

While Handel was writing in England, the oratorio languished in Germany.
Hasse, Porpora, and Fux produced several oratorios, but they have not
left an impression upon the world. Handel died in 1759. It was not until
1798 that a successor appeared worthy to wear his mantle. That successor
was Joseph Haydn, whose greatest work, "The Creation," rivals "The
Messiah" in its popularity. He was in his seventieth year when he
produced it, as well as his delightful work, "The Seasons;" but "Papa"
Haydn, as his countrymen love to call him, preserved the freshness of
youth to the very last. The melodies of his old age are as delicious as
those of his youth. Both these oratorios are exquisite pictures of
nature, as well as of human and divine love. They were inspired by
Handel's oratorios (which he heard for the first time when he visited
London in 1791), and when first performed aroused as great enthusiasm,
though they are not cast in the same heroic mould as are "The Messiah"
and "Israel in Egypt." They are characterized rather by grace, sweetness,
and elegance of form, and by pure, healthy music. Haydn was a master of
instrumentation, as he had shown years before in the string quartet, of
which he was the creator, and in his almost innumerable symphonies,--he
being the originator of the modern symphony. He had had the advantage of
a magnificent orchestra while in service at Prince Esterhazy's, and the
results are seen in the orchestral resources which he employs in his
oratorios. During this period several Italian oratorios by Salieri,
Zingarelli, and Cimarosa appeared, as well as oratorios in the same style
by the German composers Himmel and Winter. In 1803 Beethoven wrote his
only oratorio, "Christ on the Mount of Olives." This production has not
attained to the popularity of his instrumental works or of his single
opera, "Fidelio," in part because it is not in pure oratorio form, and in
part because of its wretched libretto. Schubert, contemporary with
Beethoven, also undertook an oratorio on the subject of "Lazarus;" but it
was never completed, and the fragment even was not heard until 1863.

The first really successful oratorio of the present century was "Das
jüngste Gericht" ("The Last Judgment"), by Spohr, which was produced
under his own supervision at Erfurt in 1812. This oratorio, however, the
work of his earlier years, was but the prelude to his masterpiece, "Die
letzten Dinge" ("The Last Things"), which is now commonly known as "The
Last Judgment," and was first performed at Cassel in 1826. Nine years
later he brought out "Des Heiland's letzte Stunden" ("The Saviour's Last
Hours," now known as "Calvary"), and still later, "The Fall of Babylon,"
which he produced for the first time in England in 1843; but neither of
these are constructed upon the grand proportions which characterize "Die
letzten Dinge," or so well illustrate the profound musical knowledge of
the great violinist. Contemporary with Spohr was Schneider, an unusually
prolific writer, who produced no less than sixteen oratorios in a period
of twenty-eight years, in addition to a large number of operas. Though
his oratorios were very popular at the time, but one of them has
survived, the "Weltgericht," written in 1819. Among other contemporaries
were Lindpaintner, whose "Abraham" was very successful,--though this
composer is now remembered only by his orchestral pieces,--and Klein, who
brought out two oratorios, "Jephthah" (1828) and "David" (1830), which
were greatly admired, though they are now almost unknown.

Spohr had easily held his place in the first rank of the oratorio
composers of his time, but was eclipsed when Mendelssohn appeared, as
were all his contemporaries. This gifted composer had studied Handel and
Bach very closely. In 1829 he brought out the latter's "St. Matthew"
passion-music after it had lain concealed for an entire century. He
aroused enthusiasm for the two old masters both in Germany and England.
His "St. Paul," first produced at Düsseldorf in 1836, was greeted with
acclamations of enthusiasm, and still holds its place in the popular
regard. Ten years later his greatest work, "Elijah," was performed in
England. Though widely different in form and treatment from "The
Messiah," it shares equally with that work in the enjoyment of popular
favor. Its numbers are almost as familiar as household words, through
constant repetition not only upon the oratorio stage, but in the
concert-room and choir-loft. In the presentation of the personalities
concerned in the progress of the work, in descriptive power, in the
portrayal of emotion and passion, and in genuine lyrical force, "Elijah"
has many of the attributes of opera, and some critics have not hesitated
to call it a sacred opera. Indeed, there can be no question that with
costume, scenery, and the aids of general stage-setting, its effect would
be greatly enhanced. Mendelssohn began still a third oratorio,
"Christus," but did not live to complete it. His "Lobgesang" ("Hymn of
Praise"), a symphony-cantata, is usually given as an oratorio, though it
is not in the genuine oratorio form. Contemporary with him and since his
death numerous oratorios have been written, more or less inspired by his
work; but "Elijah" and "St. Paul" still remain unsurpassed. Robert
Schumann gave the world a delightful oratorio with a secular subject,
"Paradise and the Peri." Numerous English composers have produced
meritorious works, among them Sterndale Bennett, whose "Woman of Samaria"
is thoroughly devotional. In Germany, Hiller, Rheinthaler, and others
have made successful essays in this form of musical art. In France,
Massenet and Saint-Saëns have written short one-part oratorios, and
Gounod has constructed two, "The Redemption" and "Mors et Vita," upon the
old classical form, so far as division is concerned, and is now at work
upon a third, of which Joan of Arc is the theme. In "The Tower of Babel"
and "Paradise Lost," Rubinstein has given us works which are certainly
larger in design than the cantata, and are entitled to be called
oratorios. In our own country, Professor Paine, of Harvard University,
has written one oratorio, "St. Peter," which commands attention for its
scholarly work and musical treatment. Mendelssohn and Spohr, however,
represent the nineteenth century of oratorio as Haydn, Handel, and Bach
did the eighteenth. Who will take the next step forward in the twentieth,
and give to this noblest form of musical art still higher expression?

Before closing this sketch, it will not be out of place to refer briefly
to the Requiem, Te Deum, Stabat Mater, and Magnificat, since
illustrations of these musical forms appear in the body of the work.
"Requiem" is the name given to the "Missa pro Defunctis" ("Mass for the
Dead"), and comes from the first word of the Introit, "Requiem æternam
dona eis, Domine." Its musical divisions are as follows: (1) Introit; (2)
the Kyrie; (3) the Gradual and Tract,--"Requiem æternam" and "Absolve
Domine;" (4) the Sequence or Prose,--"Dies Iræ;" (5) Offertorium; (6)
Sanctus; (7) Benedictus; (8) Agnus Dei; (9) Communio,--"Lux æterna." The
most famous requiems are Palestrina's, written for five voices, but left
incomplete (1595); Vittoria's, for six voices, written for the funeral of
the Empress Marie, widow of Maximilian II. (1605); Colonna's, for eight
voices (1684); Mozart's great masterpiece (1791); Cherubini's in C minor,
written for the anniversary of the death of Louis XVI., 1793, and a
second for three male voices (1836); Berlioz's "Messe des Morts;" Verdi's
"Manzoni Requiem," and Brahms' "German Requiem." Though an integral part
of the Roman service, appointed for a special day in commemoration of the
dead, the Requiem is also employed for the anniversaries of distinguished
persons who have passed away, as well as for funeral occasions.

The Stabat Mater, or Lamentation of the Blessed Virgin Mary, the
well-known Latin hymn on the Crucifixion, is one of the most familiar
numbers in the Roman Missal. It is appointed to be sung at High Mass on
the Friday in Passion Week, and also on the third Sunday in September. On
Thursday in Holy Week it is also sung in the Sistine Chapel as an
Offertorium. The poem was written by the monk Jacobus de Benedictis in
the thirteenth century, and is regarded as one of the finest of mediæval
sacred lyrics. Grove says of it: "Several readings are extant; the one
most frequently set to music being that which immediately preceded its
last revision in the Roman Office-Books. There are also at least four
distinct versions of its plain-chant melody, apart from minor differences
attributable to local usage." It has always been a favorite hymn with the
composers. The most famous settings are those of Josquin des Prés; two by
Palestrina,--the first, which is the most effective, for a double choir
of eight voices, and the second for a triple choir of twelve voices; that
by Pergolesi for soprano and contralto; Haydn's, which is in his
peculiarly melodious style; Steffani's for six voices; those by Clari,
Astorga, Winter, Racimondi, Vito, Lanza, Inzenga, and Neukomm; Rossini's,
which is the best known of all; and Dvorák's, written in 1881, which is
one of the Bohemian composer's finest efforts. Few hymns have been so
variously treated, and, it may be added, few in the Roman service are
more popular.

The "Te Deum Laudamus" is another familiar hymn. Its origin is doubtful,
though it is usually credited to Saint Ambrose. L'Estrange, in his
"Alliance of Divine Offices," says: "The Te Deum was made by a bishop of
Triers, named Nicetius, or Nicettus, about the year 500, which was almost
a century after the death both of Saint Ambrose and Saint Augustine."
Bingham, in his "Antiquities of the Church," says: "The Benedictines, who
published the works of Saint Ambrose, judge him not to have been the
author of it; and Dr. Cave, though at one time he was of a different
judgment, and Bishop Stillingfleet, concur in the opinion that the Te
Deum was not the composition of Saint Ambrose, or of him and Saint
Augustine jointly." Hawkins also says: "The zeal of Saint Ambrose to
promote psalm-singing is in nothing more conspicuous than in his
endeavors to reduce it into form and method; as a proof whereof, it is
said that he, jointly with Saint Augustine, upon occasion of the
conversion and baptism of the latter, composed the hymn Te Deum Laudamus,
which even now makes a part of the liturgy of our Church, and caused it
to be sung in his church at Milan. But this has been discovered to be a
mistake. This, however, is certain,--that he instituted that method of
singing known by the name of the Cantus Ambrosianus, or Ambrosian Chant,
a name, for aught that now appears, not applicable to any determined
series of notes, but invented to express in general a method of singing
agreeable to some rule given or taught by him." In spite of controversy,
however, the Te Deum is still and will always be known as the "Ambrosian
Hymn." The original melody is very ancient, but not so old as the hymn
itself. It is thoroughly familiar in the Roman Church, though the number
of settings for Church use is almost endless. The early composers
harmonized it in various forms. It has also borne a conspicuous part on
festival occasions. The most celebrated Te Deums of this character,
arranged for solos, chorus, organ, and orchestra, are those of Sarti, to
commemorate Prince Potemkin's victory at Otchakous; of Graun, to
celebrate the battle of Prague; of Berlioz, for two choirs; of Purcell,
for St. Cecilia's Day; of Dr. Blow and Dr. Croft, with accompaniments of
two violins, two trumpets, and bass; and the magnificent Utrecht and
Dettingen Te Deums of Handel. Among those by contemporary writers are
Macfarren's, written in 1884, and Sullivan's, commemorating the recovery
of the Prince of Wales.

The Magnificat, or Song of the Virgin, is part of the vesper service of
the Church, and has been treated by all the old Church composers of
prominence both in plain chant and in polyphonic form. In the English
cathedral service it is often richly harmonized, and Bach, Mozart,
Handel, Mendelssohn and others have set it in oratorio style with
complete orchestral accompaniment.

[1] Born at Florence in the year 1515, and famous as the founder of the
  Congregation of the Fathers of the Oratory.




                                  BACH.


Johann Sebastian Bach, the most eminent of the world's organ-players and
contrapuntists, was born at Eisenach, March 21, 1685, and was the most
illustrious member of a long line of musicians, the Bach family having
been famous almost from time immemorial for its skill in music. He first
studied the piano with his brother, Johann Christoph, and the organ with
Reinecke in Hamburg, and Buxtehude in Lübeck. In 1703 he was court
musician in Weimar, and afterwards was engaged as organist in Arnstadt
and Mühlhausen. In 1708 he was court organist, and in 1714 concert-master
in Weimar. In 1718 he was chapel-master to the Prince von Köthen, and in
1723 was appointed music-director and cantor at the St. Thomas School in
Leipsic,--a position which he held during the remainder of his life. He
has left for the admiration of posterity an almost endless list of vocal
and instrumental works, including chorales, motets, magnificats, masses,
fugues, and fantasies, especially for organ and piano, the "Christmas
Oratorio," and several settings of the passion, of which the most famous
are the "St. John" and "St. Matthew," the latter of which Mendelssohn
introduced to the world in 1829, after it had slumbered an entire
century. His most famous instrumental work is the "Well-tempered
Clavichord,"--a collection of forty-eight fugues and preludes, which was
written for his second wife, Anna Magdalena Bach, to whom also he
dedicated a large number of piano pieces and songs. His first wife was
his cousin, Maria Barbara Bach, the youngest daughter of Johann Michael
Bach, a composer of no common ability. By these two wives he had
twenty-one children, of whom the most celebrated were Carl Phillipp
Emanuel, born in 1714, known as the "Berlin Bach;" Johann Christoph
Friedrich, born in 1732, the "Bücheburger Bach;" and Johann Christian,
born in 1735, who became famous as the "London Bach." Large as the family
was, it is now extinct. Bach was industrious, simple, honest, and
God-fearing, like all his family. He was an incessant and laborious
writer from necessity, as his compensation was hardly sufficient to
maintain his large family, and nearly all his music was prepared for the
service of the church by contract. The prominent characteristics of his
work are profound knowledge, the clearest statements of form, strength of
logical sequences, imposing breadth, and deep religious sentiment. He was
a favorite of Frederick the Great, who upon one occasion made all his
courtiers stand on one side and do homage to the illustrious composer.
"There is but one Bach," said the monarch. With all Bach's amiable
qualities, it is said that he had a hasty temper. While playing one day,
Görner, the organist at St. Thomas, struck a false chord; whereupon Bach
flew at him in a passion, tore off his wig and threw it at him,
exclaiming: "You ought to have been a cobbler, instead of an organist!"
Notwithstanding this infirmity of temper, he was a deeply religious man,
and inscribed upon every one of his principal compositions "S. D. G.,"
"to the glory of God alone." He died July 28, 1750, and was buried at
Leipsic; but no cross or stone marks the spot where he lies. His last
composition was the beautiful chorale, "Wenn wir in höchsten Nöthen
sein," freely translated, "When my last hour is close at hand," as it was
written in his last illness. The only record of his death is contained in
the official register: "A man, aged 67, M. Johann Sebastian Bach, musical
director and singing-master at the St. Thomas School, was carried to his
grave in the hearse, July 30, 1750."




                         The Christmas Oratorio.


The "Christmas Oratorio" was written by Bach in 1734, the subject being
taken from texts in Luke and Matthew pertaining to the nativity. It is
not, as its name would suggest, a work to be performed at a single
hearing, but a composition divided into six parts of divine service,
arranged for the three days of Christmas, New Year's Day, New Year's
Sunday, and the Epiphany, each part being a complete cantata for each
day, and all linked together by chorales which give it a unity of subject
and design. Like Wagner's "Ring der Nibelungen," it was given in
instalments, each part separate and complete in itself, and yet combining
to illustrate a given subject in its entirety. It is not an oratorio in
the modern sense; but the justification of its appellation as such is to
be found in Bach's own title, "Oratorium Tempore Navitatis Christi."

As the entire six parts are very rarely given, a general review of their
character will better suit the reader's purpose than a detailed review of
each. When it has been performed in this country, only the first two
parts have been given; while in England, though it has been presented
entire, the performance is usually confined to the first three, which
contain a complete story. The entire vocal score embraces no less than
sixty-four numbers,--which in itself constitutes a sufficient reason for
abridgment. In the first three parts the connecting narratives, recited
by the evangelist, are assigned to tenor and bass, and declare the events
associated with the birth of our Lord,--the journey to Bethlehem, the
birth in the manger, the joy of Mary, and the thanksgiving over the
advent of the Lord,--the choral parts being sung by the shepherds. The
fourth part, that for New Year's Day, relates the naming of Jesus, and
follows his career in a grand expression of faith and hope. The fifth
part illustrates the visit of the three kings, the anxiety of Herod when
he hears of the advent of the Lord, and the assurances given him to allay
his fears. In the sixth section the visitors depart to frustrate Herod's
designs, and choruses of rejoicing over the final triumph of the Lord
close the work. In his voluminous life of Bach, Spitta makes an
exhaustive analysis of the various parts, an abridgment of which will be
of interest in this connection.

The only variation from the particular character of each section is to be
found in the introduction of the first chorale in Part I. at the close of
Part VI., in the form of a brilliant choral fantasia.

  "In the first three the Christmas feeling prevails most vividly; this
  is effected in great measure by the chorales which are interspersed in
  far greater numbers than in the last three, and which are almost all
  familiar Christmas hymns. Most of them are simply set in four parts,
  with highly ingenious applications of the church modes."

The first and second parts close with chorales, but in the third the
opening chorus is repeated at the close.

  "Part IV. has least of the character of church festival music. The
  Biblical matter consists of a single verse from the Gospel of Saint
  Luke, ii. 21, which relates the circumcision and naming of Jesus. Not
  much material could be worked out of this, and Bach has  almost
  entirely set aside all adjuncts from the liturgy. No Christmas hymn,
  indeed no true chorale, is introduced in it.... This section,
  therefore, bears more strongly the stamp merely of a religious
  composition; it is full of grace and sweetness, and can only have
  derived its full significance for congregational use from its position
  in context with the rest of the work."

Parts V. and VI., devoted to the history of the three kings, are in no
respect inferior to the first three.

  "The lyrical choruses are full of artistic beauty and swing. The
  cantata character is more conspicuous here than in the first three
  sections, and the specially Christmas feeling resides more in the
  general tone of the music than in the chorales."

Bitter, in his life of Bach, gives the following interesting sketch of
the origin of some of the numbers contained in the work:--

  "In some parts of this music Bach borrowed from former compositions of
  his own, especially from a 'Drama per Musica,' dedicated to the Queen
  of Poland, and a drama entitled 'The Choice of Hercules,' composed in
  1733 for a Saxon prince. The old hymn-tune, 'O Haupt voll Blut und
  Wunden,' composed A.D. 1600 (by Hans Geo. Hassler to a secular tune),
  and used by Bach five times to different words in the
  'Matthäus-Passion,' is again used in this oratorio to the words of Paul
  Gerhard's Advent hymn, 'Wie soll ich dich empfangen,' and to the hymn
  of triumph, 'Nun seid ihr wohl gerochen,' at the end of the last part.
  As this tune was familiar to the hearers in connection with a hymn for
  Passion Week, its adaptation to Advent and Christmas hymns seems
  intended to express a presentiment at the time of Christ's birth of his
  future sufferings. The same tune is now used in the German Church to a
  number of different hymns, especially to 'Herzlich thut mich verlangen'
  and 'Befiehl du deine Wege,' and is in some tune-books called by one or
  other of these names. 'Befiehl du deine Wege' is one of the hymns to
  which Bach has set it in the 'Matthäus-Passion.' In the first part of
  the oratorio we find two verses of Luther's Christmas hymn, 'Gelobet
  seist du Jesu Christ;' first, the verse beginning 'Er ist auf Erden
  kommen arm,' to the tune Luther composed for it, and the verse 'Ach,
  mein herzliebes Jesulein,' to the tune (also of Luther's composition),
  'Von Himmel hoch da komm ich her.' This last-mentioned tune is also
  used twice in the second part, to the words 'Schaut hin, dort liegt im
  finstern Stalle,' and 'Wir singen dir in deinem Heer,' arranged
  differently each time. The chorales, 'Jesus, richte mein Beginnen,' in
  the fourth part, and 'Dein Glanz all Finsterniss verzehrt,' in the
  fifth part, are probably Bach's own compositions."

The first two parts of the work are the only ones which need special
notice for the purposes of the oratorio-goer. The first part opens with a
brilliant prelude, introduced by the drum, which Bach, like Beethoven,
sometimes treated as a solo instrument. It preludes the narrative bidding
Zion prepare to meet her Lord,--a simple, touching melody, followed by
the chorale, "How shall I fitly meet Thee and give Thee welcome due," set
to the old passion-hymn, "O Haupt, voll Blut und Wunden,"--a solemn and
even mournful melody, which at first appears incongruous in the midst of
so much jubilation. It is the same melody which Bach frequently uses in
different harmonic forms in his "St. Matthew Passion." It is introduced
here in the midst of the Christmas festivity for a special purpose.
Bitter gives it the following significance:--

  "We see the Angel of Death unveil his pale face, bend over the cradle
  of the Lord, and foretell his sorrows. The Child hears the song which
  one day, sung to other words, will be his death-song."

The composer's evident intention was to impress the hearer with the fact
that the object of the divine advent on earth was the passion of our
Lord. At the close of the work the same chorale appears, but it has
another meaning. It is there an exultant expression of Christ's victory
over sin and death. As the chorale dies away, the narrative is resumed,
leading up to another chorale, "For us to earth he cometh poor," combined
with an orchestral symphony and bass recitative. The next number is a
bass aria with trumpet accompaniment, "Lord Almighty, King all glorious,"
and is followed by a chorale set to the words of Martin Luther's
Christmas hymn, which also occurs in other parts of the work, differently
harmonized to suit the nature of the situation, with which the first part
closes.

The second part opens with one of the most delightful instances of Bach's
orchestration, a pastoral symphony, with which the Thomas orchestra have
made audiences familiar in this country. Like the symphony of the same
style in Handel's "Messiah," it is simple, graceful, and idyllic in
character, and pictures the shepherds watching their flocks by night on
the plains of Bethlehem. At its conclusion the evangelist resumes his
narrative, followed by the chorale: "Break forth, O beauteous, heavenly
Light," preluding the announcement of the angel, "Behold, I bring you
Good Tidings." It is followed by the bass recitative, "What God to
Abraham revealed, He to the Shepherds doth accord to see fulfilled," and
a brilliant aria for tenor, "Haste, ye Shepherds, haste to meet Him." The
evangelist gives them the sign, followed by the chorale which closed the
first part, in another form, "Within yon Gloomy Manger lies." The bass
recitative, "O haste ye then," preludes the exquisite cradle-song for
alto, "Sleep, my Beloved, and take Thy Repose,"--a number which can
hardly be excelled in the sweetness and purity of its melody or in the
exquisiteness of its instrumentation. This lovely song brings us to the
close, which is an exultant shout from the multitude of the heavenly
host, singing, "Glory to God in the highest."




                       The Saint Matthew Passion.


The passion-music of Bach's time, as we have already seen, was the
complement of the mysteries of Mediæval days. It portrays the sufferings
of Christ, and was performed at church festivals, the congregation taking
part in the singing of the chorales, which were mostly familiar religious
folk-songs. It was a revival of the sacred drama in musical form, and the
immediate precursor of the modern oratorio. Bach wrote five
passions,--the "St. John," probably written in 1723, and first performed
in the following year; another, which has been lost, in 1725; the "St.
Matthew," in 1729; the "St. Mark," in 1731; and the "St. Luke," in 1734.
Of these only two are now known,--the "St. John" and "St. Matthew;" of
which the latter is incomparably the greatest.

Macfarren, in his sketch of the "Matthew Passion," says that the idea of
this form of composition was first suggested to Bach by Solomon Deyling,
who filled an important church position in Leipsic when the composer went
there to assume his duties as cantor of the St. Thomas School, his
purpose being to introduce into the Reformed Church a service which
should be a counter attraction to the Mass as performed in the Roman
Church. It was produced for the first time at the afternoon service on
Good Friday, 1729, but was not heard again until the young Mendelssohn
revived it in Berlin, March 12, 1829. It was frequently repeated in
Germany and aroused extraordinary enthusiasm, and still keeps its place
in the festival oratorio repertory, the necessary additional
accompaniments having been furnished by Robert Franz.

The passion is written in two parts, between which the sermon intervened
in old times. It includes portions of chapters xxvi. and xxvii. of the
Gospel according to Saint Matthew, the remainder of the text being
composed of hymns furnished to Bach by Christian Friedrich Henrici, who
wrote under the pseudonym of "Picander," and, it is said, was assisted in
the compilation by the composer himself. The _dramatis personæ_ are
Jesus, Judas, Peter, Pilate, the Apostles, and the People, or _Turbæ_,
and the narrative is interpreted by reflections addressed to Jesus,
forming two choruses, "The Daughter of Zion" and "The Faithful," as
Picander calls them. They are sometimes given by the chorus, and
sometimes by single voices. The chorales are selected from those which
were in common use in the Lutheran Church, and were familiar therefore to
the congregations which sang the melody, the harmony being sustained by
the chorus and instruments. The Gospel text is in recitative form
throughout, the part of the evangelist, or narrator, being assigned to a
tenor voice, while those of the persons incidentally introduced are given
to other singers. In the dialogue, wherever the words of Jesus occur, the
accompaniment is furnished by a string quartette, which serves to
distinguish them from the others, and invests them with a peculiar
gentleness and grace. The incidental choruses, sung by the People and the
Apostles, are short and vivacious in character, many of them being in
madrigal form. The chorales, fifteen in number, as has already been said,
were taken from the Lutheran service. One of them, which Bach also
liberally used in his "Christmas Oratorio," beginning, "Acknowledge me,
my Keeper," appears five times in the progress of the work, forming the
keynote of the church sentiment, and differently harmonized on each
occasion. Another, "O Blessed Jesus," is twice used,--once where the
Saviour announces that he will be crucified after the Feast of the
Passover, when the whole congregation sings it, and again in the scene at
Gethsemane, sung by select choirs. The whole work is written for double
chorus, the two choruses singing the harmony of the chorales, accompanied
by the instruments, while the congregation sing the tune in unison. They
display to the utmost the breadth, richness, ingenuity, and power of Bach
in this form of writing. The reflective portions of the work, the text
written by Picander, are composed of arias introduced by recitative, with
the first part repeated in the close; of arias accompanied by chorus; and
of single choruses constructed in the most massive manner. Speaking of
the melodies in these portions of the work, Spitta says,--

  "The grades of feeling traversed by Bach in the solo songs of the 'St.
  Matthew Passion' are all the more impressive because every sentiment of
  joy in its various shades is wholly excluded; they are all based on the
  emotion of sorrow. The most fervent sympathy with the sufferings of the
  Son of Man, rising to the utmost anguish, childlike trustfulness, manly
  earnestness, and tenderly longing devotion to the Redeemer; repentance
  for the personal sins that his suffering must atone for, and passionate
  entreaties for mercy; an absorbed contemplation of the example offered
  by the sufferings of Jesus, and solemn vows pronounced over his dead
  body never to forsake or forget him,--these are the themes Bach had to
  treat. And he has solved the difficult problem as if it were child's
  play, with that inexhaustible wealth of resource which was most at his
  command precisely when he had to depict the sadder emotions. In no
  other of his works (unless it be in the 'Christmas Oratorio') do we
  find such a store of lovely and various solo airs, nor did Bach even
  ever write melodies more expressive and persuasive than those of the
  arias in the 'St. Matthew Passion.'"

As we have said, the music is arranged for double chorus, and each chorus
has its own orchestra and its own organ accompaniment. The double
orchestra is composed of oboes, flutes, and stringed instruments. Drums
and brass instruments are not used, the sentiment of the work, in Bach's
estimation, not being fitted for them, sweetness and expressiveness of
tone rather than power being required. As Spitta says, sorrow is the
characteristic of the work. It has no choruses of rejoicing, no pæans of
praise, not even a hallelujah at its close.

The first part opens with a reflection sung by double chorus, "Come, ye
Daughters, weep for Anguish," the first exhorting believers to weep over
the sinful world, the second responding with brief interrogations, and at
last taking part in the sorrowful strains of the first. Interwoven with
these is an independent instrumental melody, the whole crowned with a
magnificent chorale sung by the sopranos, "O Lamb of God all blameless!"
followed by still another, "Say, sweetest Jesus," which reappears in
other parts of the work variously harmonized. The double chorus and
chorales form the introduction, and are followed by recitative and a
chorale, "Thou dear Redeemer," and a pathetic aria for contralto, "Grief
and Pain," relating the incident of the woman anointing the feet of
Jesus. The next number is an aria for soprano, "Only bleed, Thou dearest
Heart," which follows the acceptance by Judas of the thirty pieces of
silver, and which serves to intensify the grief in the aria preceding it.
The scene of the Last Supper ensues, and to this number Bach has given a
character of sweetness and gentleness, though its coloring is sad. As the
disciples ask, "Lord, is it I?" another chorale is sung, "'Tis I! my Sins
betray me." Recitative of very impressive character, conveying the divine
injunctions, leads up to a graceful and tender aria for soprano, "Never
will my Heart refuse Thee," one of the simplest and clearest, and yet one
of the richest and most expressive, melodies ever conceived. After
further recitative and the chorale, "I will stay here beside Thee," we
are introduced to the scene in the Garden of Gethsemane, which is
characterized by a number of extraordinary beauty and strength in its
construction. It is introduced by a short instrumental prelude, Zion,
represented by the tenor voice, and the Believers by the chorus, coming
in after a few bars and alternating with extraordinary vocal effect. It
calls for the highest dramatic power, and in its musical development is a
web of wonderful harmonies such as we may look for only in the works of
the mighty master of counterpoint. It fitly prepares the way for the two
great movements which close the first part, an aria for soprano and alto,
"Alas! my Jesus now is taken," and a double chorus, "Ye Lightnings, ye
Thunders!" The two solo voices join in a lament of a most touching
nature, accompanied by the chorus exclaiming in short, hurried phrases,
"Let Him go! Hold! Bind Him not!" until at last the double chorus bursts
in like a tempest, accompanied with the full power of the instruments,
expressing the world's indignation at the deed which is to be committed,
in the words:--

  "Ye lightnings, ye thunders, in clouds are ye vanished!
  Burst open, O fierce flaming caverns of hell!
  Ingulf them, destroy them in wrathfullest mood!
  Oh, blast the betrayer, the murderous brood!"

and the first part concludes with a chorale, "O Man, bewail thy great
Sin!"

The second part, originally sung after the sermon, opens with an aria for
contralto, full of the deepest feeling, "Alas! now is my Jesus gone," and
one of the most beautiful numbers in the oratorio, wherein Zion, or the
Church, mourns her great loss. The trial scene before Caiaphas and the
threefold denial of Peter follow, leading up to the beautiful aria for
alto, with violin obligato, "Oh, pardon me, my God!" Macfarren, in his
admirable analysis, says of this aria,--

  "The deep, deep grief of a tormented conscience finds here an utterance
  which fulfils the purport and far transcends the expression of the
  words. One might suppose the power of the artist to have been
  concentrated upon this one incident, so infinite is its beauty,--one
  might suppose Bach to have regarded the situation it illustrates as
  more significant than others of man's relation to Deity in his sense of
  sin and need for mercy, and as requiring, therefore, peculiar
  prominence in the total impression the oratorio should convey. If this
  was his aim, it is all accomplished. The penitential feeling embodied
  in the song is that which will longest linger in a remembrance of the
  work. The soft tone of the contralto voice, and the keenness of that of
  the violin, are accessories to the effect which the master well knew
  how to handle; but these judicious means are little to be considered in
  comparison with the musical idea of which they are the adjuncts."

The work now rapidly progresses to its beautiful finale. The soprano
recitative in response to Pilate's question, "He hath done only good to
all," the aria for soprano, "From love unbounded," the powerful contralto
recitative, "Look down, O God," the chorale, "O Head all bruised and
wounded!" the contralto aria with chorus, "Look where Jesus beckoning
stands," and the peaceful, soothing recitative for bass, "At Eventide,
cool Hour of Rest," are the principal numbers that occur as we approach
the last sad but beautiful double chorus of the Apostles, "Around Thy
Tomb here sit we weeping,"--a close as peaceful as the setting of the
sun; for the tomb is but the couch on which Jesus is reposing, and the
music dies away in a slumber-song of most exalted beauty. This brief
sketch could not better close than with the beautiful description which
Mr. Dwight gives of this scene in the notes which he prepared when the
work was performed at the Triennial Festival of the Handel and Haydn
Society of Boston:--

  "How full of grief, of tender, spiritual love, of faith and peace, of
  the heart's heaven smiling through tears, is this tone-elegy! So should
  the passion-music close, and not with fugue of praise and triumph like
  an oratorio. How sweetly, evenly, the harmony flows on,--a broad, rich,
  deep, pellucid river, swollen as by countless rills from all the
  loving, bleeding, and believing hearts in a redeemed humanity! How full
  of a sweet, secret comfort, even triumph, is this heavenly farewell: It
  is 'the peace which passeth understanding.' 'Rest Thee softly' is the
  burden of the song. One chorus sings it, and the other echoes 'Softly
  rest;' then both together swell the strain. Many times as this recurs,
  not only in the voices, but in the introduction and frequent interludes
  of the exceedingly full orchestra, which sounds as human as if it too
  had breath and conscious feeling, you still crave more of it; for it is
  as if your soul were bathed in new life inexhaustible. No chorus ever
  sung is surer to enlist the singers' hearts."




                          The Magnificat in D.


The Magnificat in D--known as the "Great Magnificat," to distinguish it
from the smaller--is considered one of the grandest illustrations of
Bach's genius. It was composed for Christmas Day, 1723. Spitta says:--

  "The performance of the cantata 'Christen, ätzet diesen Tag,' with its
  attendant 'Sanctus,' took place during the morning service, and was
  sung by the first choir in the Nikolaikirche. In the evening the
  cantata was repeated by the same choir in the Thomaskirche; and after
  the sermon the Hymn of the Virgin was sung, set in its Latin form, and
  in an elaborate style. For this purpose Bach wrote his great
  'Magnificat.'"

For the occasion of this festival he expanded the Biblical text into four
vocal numbers; but in describing the work it is only necessary to give it
as it is now generally sung.

The work is written for a five-part chorus, with organ and orchestral
accompaniment. After a concerted introduction, foreshadowing the general
character of the music, it opens with the chorus, "Magnificat anima mea,"
in fugal form, worked up with that wonderful power of construction for
which Bach is so renowned among all composers. It is followed by an aria
for second soprano ("Et exultavit spiritus meus: in Deo salutari meo"),
which is in the same key and has the same general feeling as the opening
chorus, that of Christmas rejoicing. It in turn is followed by an aria
for first soprano ("Quia respexit humilitatem ancillæ suæ"), of which
Spitta says: "Scarcely ever has the idea of virgin purity, simplicity,
and humble happiness found more perfect expression than in this German
picture of the Madonna, translated as it were into musical language." It
leads directly to the chorus which takes up the unfinished words of the
soprano ("Omnes generationes"), each part overlaying the other as it
enters, and closing in canon form in grave and colossal harmony. Its next
number is an aria for bass ("Quia fecit mihi magna"), of a simple and
joyous character. It is followed by a melodious duet for alto and tenor
("Et misericordia"), with violin and flute accompaniment, setting forth
the mercy of God, in contrast with which the powerful and energetic
chorus ("Fecit potentiam") which succeeds it, is very striking in its
effect. Two beautiful arias for tenor ("Deposuit potentes de sede") and
alto ("Esurientes implevit bonis") follow, the latter being exquisitely
tender in its expression, and lead to the terzetto ("Suscepit Israel
puerum suum: recordatus misericordiæ suæ"), arranged in chorale form, and
very plaintive and even melancholy in style. Its mourning is soon lost,
however, in the stupendous five-part fugue ("Sicut locutus est") which
follows it and which leads to the triumphant "Gloria," closing the
work,--a chorus of extraordinary majesty and power. Spitta, in his
exhaustive analysis of Bach's music, says of this "Magnificat":--

  "It is emphatically distinct from the rest of Bach's grand church
  compositions by the compactness and concentrated power of the separate
  numbers,--particularly of the choruses,--by the lavish use of the means
  at command, and by its vividly emotional and yet not too agitating
  variety. It stands at the entrance of a new path and a fresh period of
  his productivity, at once full of significance in itself and of promise
  for the future development of the perennial genius which could always
  re-create itself from its own elements."




                               BEETHOVEN.


A general sketch of the life and musical accomplishments of Beethoven has
already appeared in the companion to this work, "The Standard Operas." In
this connection, however, it seems eminently fitting that some attention
should be paid to the religious sentiments of the great composer and the
sacred works which he produced. He was a formal member of the Roman
Church, but at the same time an ardent admirer of some of the Protestant
doctrines. His religious observances, however, were peculiarly his own.
His creed had little in common with any of the ordinary forms of
Christianity. A writer in "Macmillan's Magazine" some years ago very
clearly defined his religious position in the statement that his faith
rested on a pantheistic abstraction which he called "Love." He
interpreted everything by the light of this sentiment, which took the
form of an endless longing, sometimes deeply sad, at others rising to the
highest exaltation. An illustration of this in its widest sense may be
found in the choral part of the Ninth Symphony. He at times attempted to
give verbal expression to this ecstatic faith which filled him, and at
such times he reminds us of the Mystics. The following passages, which he
took from the inscription on the temple of the Egyptian goddess Neith at
Sais, and called his creed, explain this: "I am that which is. I am all
that is, that was, and that shall be. No mortal man hath lifted my veil.
He is alone by Himself, and to Him alone do all things owe their being."
With all this mysticism his theology was practical, as is shown by his
criticism of the words which Moscheles appended to his arrangement of
"Fidelio." The latter wrote at the close of his work: "_Fine_, with God's
help." Beethoven added: "O man! help thyself." That he was deeply
religious by nature, however, is constantly shown in his letters.
Wandering alone at evening among the mountains, he sketched a hymn to the
words, "God alone is our Lord." In the extraordinary letter which he
wrote to his brothers, Carl and Johann, he says: "God looks into my
heart. He searches it, and knows that love for man and feelings of
benevolence have their abode there." In a letter to Bettina von Arnim, he
writes: "If I am spared for some years to come, I will thank the
Omniscient, the Omnipotent, for the boon, as I do for all other weal and
woe." In Spohr's album his inscription is a musical setting of the words,
"Short is the pain, eternal is the joy." In a letter to the Archduke
Rudolph, written in 1817, he gives no uncertain expression to his divine
trust. He says: "My confidence is placed in Providence, who will
vouchsafe to hear my prayer, and one day set me free from all my
troubles; for I have served him faithfully from my childhood, and done
good whenever it was in my power. So my trust is in him alone, and I feel
that the Almighty will not allow me to be utterly crushed by all my
manifold trials." Even in a business letter he says: "I assure you on my
honor--which, next to God, is what I prize most--that I authorized no one
to accept commissions from me." His letters indeed abound in references
to his constant reliance upon a higher Power. The oratorio, "Christ on
the Mount of Olives," six sacred songs set to poems of Gellert, the Mass
in C written for Prince Esterhazy, and the Grand Mass in D written for
the Archduke Rudolph, one of the grandest and most impressive works in
the entire realm of sacred music, attest the depth and fervency of his
religious nature.




                          The Mount of Olives.


Beethoven wrote but one oratorio, "Christus am Oelberg" ("Christ on the
Mount of Olives"). That he had others in contemplation, however, at
different periods of his life is shown by his letters. In 1809 he wrote
to Freiherr von Hammer-Purgstall, a famous Oriental scholar, appointing
an interview for the discussion of the latter's poem on the subject of
the deluge, with reference to its fitness for treatment as an oratorio.
Again, in 1824, he writes to Vincenz Hauschka, of Vienna, that he has
decided to write an oratorio on the text furnished by Bernard, the
subject being "The Victory of the Cross." This work, however, owing to
his extreme physical sufferings at that period, was never begun, and the
world thereby has suffered a great musical loss; for, judging from his
great Mass in D, no one can doubt how majestic and impressive the
"Victory of the Cross" would have been, as compared with the "Mount of
Olives," written in his earlier period, and before any of his
masterpieces had appeared.

The "Mount of Olives" was begun in 1800, and finished during the
following year. Beethoven never remained in Vienna during the summer. The
discomforts of the city and his intense love for Nature urged him out
into the pleasantly wooded suburbs of the city, where he could live and
work in seclusion. Upon this occasion he selected the little village of
Hetzendorf, adjoining the gardens of the imperial palace of Schönbrunn,
where the Elector, his old patron, was living in retirement. Trees were
his delight. In a letter to Madame von Drossdick, he says: "Woods, trees,
and rocks give the response which man requires. Every tree seems to say,
'Holy, Holy!'" In the midst of these delightful surroundings he found his
favorite tree, at whose base he composed the larger part of the oratorio,
as well as his opera "Fidelio." Schindler says: "A circumstance connected
with both these great works, and of which Beethoven many years afterwards
still retained a lively recollection, was, that he composed them in the
thickest part of the wood in the park of Schönbrunn, seated between the
two stems of an oak, which shot out from the main trunk at the height of
about two feet from the ground. This remarkable tree, in that part of the
park to the left of the Gloriett, I found with Beethoven in 1823, and the
sight of it called forth interesting reminiscences of the former period."
The words of the oratorio were by Huber, the author of Winter's
"Unterbrochene Opferfest," and were written, with Beethoven's assistance,
in fourteen days. That more time and attention were not given to the text
was probably regretted by both poet and composer many times afterwards.
The first performance of the work in its entirety took place at Vienna,
April 5, 1803, at the Theater an der Wien, upon which occasion the
programme also included the Symphony in D (second) and the Piano Concerto
in C minor, the latter executed by himself. The oratorio was received
with enthusiasm, and was repeated three times during that year.

The libretto of the work is unquestionably defective in the most salient
qualities which should characterize the text of an oratorio, even to the
degree of extravagance and sensationalism. It fails to reflect the
sorrowful character of the scene it depicts, and the dramatic
requirements which it imposes are often strained, and sometimes border on
the grotesque. The theatrical style of the narrative was deplored by
Beethoven himself at a subsequent period. Marx, one of the keenest of
critics, says of the work:--

  "The poet had no other aim but that of making verses for a composer;
  the latter, no other motive than the ordinary creative impulse
  prompting him to try his powers in a different and important sphere.
  The result on both sides could not therefore be other than phrases,
  although the better of the two proceeded from the composer, and that
  composer was Beethoven. To conceal or palliate this would be derogatory
  to the reverence which we all owe to Beethoven; he stands too high to
  be in need of extenuation."

This is Marx's judgment; and yet it must be said that the world for the
most part has found more in the "Mount of Olives" than he has.

The oratorio is written for three solo voices (Jesus, Peter, and a
Seraph), chorus, and orchestra. The narrative opens with the agony in the
garden, followed by the chant of a Seraph reciting the divine goodness
and foretelling the salvation of the righteous. In the next scene Jesus
learns his fate from the Seraph, yields himself to approaching death, and
welcomes it. The Soldiers enter in pursuit, and a tumult ensues as the
Apostles find themselves surrounded. Peter draws his sword and gives vent
to his indignation; but is rebuked both by Jesus and the Seraph, and
together they conjure him to be silent and endure whatever may happen.
The Soldiers, discovering Jesus, rush upon him and bind him. The
Disciples express their apprehension that they too will suffer; but Jesus
uncomplainingly surrenders himself, and a chorus of rejoicing completes
the work. From this brief sketch the artificial and distorted manner of
treating the solemn subject will be evident.

The score opens with an adagio introduction for instruments which is of a
very dramatic character, and, unlike nearly all of the sacred music of
that time, is noticeable for the absence of the fugue. Barbedette, the
great French critic, pronounces it the _chef-d'oeuvre_ of introductions,
and a masterpiece in the serious style. The first number is a recitative
and aria for tenor, sung by Jesus ("All my Soul within me shudders"),
which, notwithstanding the anomaly of such a scene in such surroundings,
is simple and touching in expression. The Seraph follows with a scene and
aria ("Praise the Redeemer's Goodness"), concluding with a brilliant and
jubilant obligato with chorus ("O triumph, all ye Ransomed"). The next
number is an elaborate duet between Jesus and the Seraph ("On me then
fall Thy heavy Judgment"), which is still more anomalous than the scene
and aria with which Jesus opens the work. In a short recitative passage,
Jesus welcomes death; and then ensues one of the most powerful numbers in
the work, the chorus of Soldiers in march time ("We surely here shall
find Him"), interspersed with the cries of the People demanding his
death, and the lamentations of the Apostles. At the conclusion of the
tumult a dialogue ensues between Jesus and Peter ("Not unchastised shall
this audacious Band"), which leads up to the crowning anomaly of the
work, a trio between Jesus, Peter, and the Seraph, with chorus ("O, Sons
of Men, with Gladness"). The closing number, a chorus of angels
("Hallelujah, God's Almighty Son"), is introduced with a short but
massive symphony leading to a jubilant burst of Hallelujah, which finally
resolves itself into a glorious fugue, accompanied with all that wealth
of instrumentation of which Beethoven was the consummate master. In all
sacred music it is difficult to find a choral number which can surpass it
in majesty or power.

The English versions of the "Mount of Olives" differ materially from the
German in the text. Numerous efforts have been made to avoid the
incongruity of the original narrative, but with poor success. It was
first produced in England in 1814 by Sir George Smart during the Lenten
oratorios at Drury Lane, the English version of which was made by Arnold,
at that time manager of the King's Theatre. Still later it was produced
again, and the adapter compromised by using the third person, as
"'Jehovah, Thou, O Father,' saith the Lord our Saviour." Two other
versions were made by Thomas Oliphant and Mr. Bartholomew, but these were
not successful. At last the aversion to the personal part of Jesus led to
an entirely new text, called "Engedi," the words of which were written by
Dr. Henry Hudson, of Dublin, and founded upon the persecution of David by
Saul in the wilderness, as described in parts of chapters xxiii., xxiv.,
and xxvi. of the first book of Samuel. The characters introduced are
David, Abishai, and the Prophetess, the latter corresponding to the
Seraph in the original. The compiler himself in his preface says:--

  "So far as was possible, the author has availed himself of Scripture
  language, and David's words have been taken (almost wholly) from the
  Psalms generally attributed to him, though of course not in regular
  order, as it has invariably throughout been the writer's first object
  to select words adapting themselves to the original music in its
  continually varying expression, which could not have been done had he
  taken any one psalm as his text. How far the author has succeeded, he
  must leave to others to determine."

The substituted story has not proved successful, principally because the
music, which was written for an entirely different one, is not adapted to
it. The latest version is that of the Rev. J. Troutbeck, prepared for the
Leeds festivals, in which the Saviour is again introduced.




                                BENNETT.


William Sterndale Bennett, one of the most gifted and individual of
English composers, was born at Sheffield, April 13, 1816. His musical
genius displayed itself early, and in his tenth year he was placed in the
Royal Academy of Music, of which in his later years he became principal.
He received his early instruction in composition from Lucas and Dr.
Crotch, and studied the piano with Cipriani Potter, who had been a pupil
of Mozart. The first composition which gained him distinction was the
Concerto in D minor, written in 1832, which was followed by the Capriccio
in D minor. During the next three years he produced the overture to
"Parisina," the F minor Concerto, and the "Naïades" overture, the success
of which was so great that a prominent musical house in London offered to
send him to Leipsic for a year. He went there, and soon won his way to
the friendship of Schumann and Mendelssohn. With the latter he was on
very intimate terms, which has led to the erroneous statement that he was
his pupil. In 1840 he made a second visit to Leipsic, where he composed
his Caprice in E, and "The Wood Nymphs" overture. In 1842 he returned to
England, and for several years was busily engaged with chamber concerts.
In 1849 he founded the Bach Society, arranged the "Matthew Passion" music
of that composer, as well as the "Christmas Oratorio," and brought out
the former work in 1854. The previous year he was offered the
distinguished honor of the conductorship of the Gewandhaus concerts at
Leipsic, but did not accept. In 1856 he was appointed conductor of the
Philharmonic Society, and filled the position for ten years, resigning it
to take the head of the Royal Academy of Music. In the same year he was
elected musical professor at Cambridge, where he received the degree of
Doctor of Music and other honors. In 1858 his beautiful cantata, "The May
Queen," was produced at the Leeds Festival, and in 1862 the "Paradise and
the Peri" overture, written for the Philharmonic Society. In 1867 his
oratorio, or, as he modestly terms it, "sacred cantata," "The Woman of
Samaria," was produced with great success at the Birmingham Festival. In
1870 he was honored with a degree by the University of Oxford, and a year
later received the empty distinction of knighthood. His last public
appearance was at a festival in Brighton in 1874, where he conducted his
"Woman of Samaria." He died Feb. 1, 1875, and was buried in Westminster
Abbey with distinguished honors. His musical ability was as widely
recognized in Germany as in England,--indeed his profound musical
scholarship and mastery of problems in composition were more appreciated
there. Mr. Statham, in an admirable sketch, pronounces him a born
pianist, and says that his wonderful knowledge of the capabilities of the
piano, and his love for it, developed into favoritism in some of his
concerted music. A friend of the composer, recalling some reminiscences
of him in "Fraser," says that his music is full of beauty and expression,
displays a remarkable fancy, a keen love of Nature, and at times true
religious devotion, but that it does not contain a single note of
passion. His only sacred music is the short oratorio, "The Woman of
Samaria," and four anthems: "Now, my God, let, I beseech Thee," "Remember
now thy Creator," "O that I knew," and "The Fool hath said in his Heart."
It has been well said of him: "In his whole career he never condescended
to write a single note for popular effect, nor can a bar of his music be
quoted which in style and aim does not belong to what is highest in
musical art."




                          The Woman of Samaria.


"The Woman of Samaria," a short, one-part oratorio, styled by its
composer a "sacred cantata," was first produced at the Birmingham
Festival, Aug. 27, 1867; though one of his biographers affirms that as
early as 1843 he was shown a chorus for six voices, treated antiphonally,
which Bennett himself informed him was to be introduced in an oratorio he
was then contemplating, and that this chorus, if not identical with
"Therefore they shall come," in "The Woman of Samaria," is at least the
foundation of it.

The work is written for four solo voices, chorus, and orchestra. The
soprano takes the part of the Woman of Samaria, the other parts being
impersonal. The music for the contralto is mainly declamatory. Tha tenor
has a single aria, while the bass, with one exception, has the part of
Narrator, the words of our Saviour being attributed to him and invariably
introduced in the third personal form,--which is a striking proof of the
devotional spirit of the composer, as in all other instances, after the
announcement by the Narrator, the Woman sings her own words. The chorus,
as in the passion-music of Bach, has the reflective numbers and moralizes
on the various situations as they occur, except in one number, "Now we
believe," where it declaims the words as a part of the narrative itself.
The text for chorus is selected from appropriate parts of the Scriptures
which are in keeping with the events forming the groundwork of its
reflections.

The story is taken from the fourth chapter of the Gospel according to
Saint John, and follows literally the narrative of the journey of the
Saviour into Samaria,--his rest at Jacob's well, his meeting with the
woman who came thither to draw water, and the conversation which
followed; the only interruptions being the reflections, not only by the
chorus, but also by the contralto and tenor, these episodes being taken
mostly from the Prophecies and Psalms.

The oratorio opens with a brief instrumental introduction and chorale
("Ye Christian People, now rejoice") for sopranos alone, the melody of
which first appeared in the "Geistliche Lieder," issued at Wittenberg in
1535. The words are a translation of the old hymn, "Nun freut euch,
lieben Christen G'mein," to which the tune was formerly sung in Germany.
The treatment of this chorale, by combining it with the instrumental
movement in opposing rhythms, shows the powerful influence which the
composer's close study of Bach had upon him. Its effect in introducing
the scenes which follow reminds one of the grace before the feast. It
dies away in slow and gentle numbers, and then follows the opening
recitative of the oratorio proper ("Then cometh Jesus to a City of
Samaria"), sung by the contralto, and leading up to an arioso chorus
("Blessed be the Lord God of Israel"), the words taken from the Gospel of
Saint Luke. The next number is a very graceful and artistic combination,
opening with recitative for contralto, bass, and soprano, leading to an
adagio solo for bass ("If thou knewest the Gift of God"), and ending with
a closely harmonious chorus in the same rhythm ("For with Thee is the
Well of Life"), the words from the Psalms. The dialogue between Jesus and
the Woman is then resumed, leading to a solo by the latter ("Art Thou
greater than our Father Jacob?"). The question is sung and repeated in
declamatory tones constantly increasing in power and expressive of
defiance. Bennett was a bitter opponent of Wagner; but in the unvocal and
declamatory character of this solo, and in the dramatic force he has
given to it, to the sacrifice of melody, he certainly ventured some
distance in the Wagnerian direction. The next number, the reply of Jesus
("Whosoever drinketh"), sung, as usual, by the bass voice, is in striking
contrast with the question. Instead of full orchestra, it has the
accompaniment of the strings and first and second horns only, reminding
one of Bach's method of accompanying the part assigned to Jesus in his
St. Matthew Passion. This number is followed by a spirited fortissimo
chorus ("Therefore with Joy shall ye draw Water"), sung to the full
strength of voice and orchestra. After the dialogue in which Jesus
acquaints the Woman with the incidents of her past life, the contralto
voice has an exquisite solo ("O Lord, Thou hast searched me out"), full
of tenderness and expression, in which the opening phrase is repeated in
the finale and gains intensity by a change of harmony. The dialogue, in
which the divine character of Jesus becomes apparent to the Woman, is
resumed, and leads to a beautifully constructed chorus in six parts
("Therefore they shall come and sing"), followed by an impressive and
deeply devotional quartet for the principals, unaccompanied ("God is a
Spirit"),--to which an additional interest is lent from the fact that it
was sung in Westminster Abbey upon the occasion of the composer's
funeral. A few bars of recitative lead to a chorus in close, solid
harmony ("Who is the Image of the Invisible God"), with organ
accompaniment only, which in turn, after a few more bars of recitative
for contralto and soprano, is followed by the chorus ("Come, O Israel"),
sung pianissimo and accompanied by entire orchestra. The next number, as
the oratorio is now performed, is one which has been introduced. It is a
soprano aria, "I will love Thee, O Lord," which was found among the
composer's manuscripts after his death. The preface to the revised
edition of the oratorio has the following reference to this number:--

  "In justification of so bold a step as the introduction of a new
  number, it is interesting to point out that the composer felt the Woman
  of Samaria ought to sing a song of conversion in the portion of the
  cantata in which the new air is placed. It is clear from the original
  preface[2] that he thought of her as an impulsive woman who would
  naturally be carried from worldliness into the opposite extreme of
  religious devotion."

The introduction of the air also gives more importance to the soprano
part and relieves the succession of choral movements in the close of the
work. The remaining numbers are the beautiful chorale, "Abide with me,
fast falls the Eventide;" the chorus, "Now we believe," one of the most
finished in the whole work; a short tenor solo ("His Salvation is nigh
them that fear Him"),--the only one in the oratorio for that voice; the
chorus, "I will call upon the Lord;" and the final imposing fugue,
"Blessed be the Lord God of Israel." The last number is a fitting close
to a work which is not only highly descriptive of its subject throughout,
but also full of feeling and devotional reverence.

[2] "With regard to the Woman of Samaria herself, it will be plainly seen
  that the composer has treated her as a secular and worldly character,
  though not without indications here and there of that strong intuitive
  religious feeling which has never been denied to her. This feeling is
  especially shown when she says: 'I know that Messias cometh; when He is
  come He will tell us all things.' Also, towards the end of the
  narrative, where she passionately exclaims to the Samaritans: 'Come,
  see a man who told me all the things that ever I did: is not this the
  Christ?'"--_Original Preface_.




                                BERLIOZ.


Hector Berlioz, one of the most renowned of modern French composers, and
an acute critic and skilful conductor as well, was born, Dec. 11, 1803,
at La Côte St. André, in France. His father was a physician, and intended
him for the same profession. He reluctantly went to Paris and began the
study of medicine; but music became his engrossing passion, and medicine
was abandoned. He entered the Conservatory as a pupil of Lesueur, and
soon showed himself superior to all his masters, except Cherubini,--which
aroused a strong opposition to him and his compositions. It was only
after repeated trials that he took the first prize, with his cantata,
"Sardanapale," which entitled him to go to Italy for three years. On his
return to Paris he encountered renewed antipathy. His music was not well
received, and he was obliged to support himself by conducting at concerts
and writing articles for the press. As a final resort he organized a
concert tour through Germany and Russia, the details of which are
contained in his extremely interesting Autobiography. At these concerts
his own music was the staple of the programmes, and it met with great
success, though not always played by the best of orchestras, and not
always well by the best, as his own testimony shows; for his compositions
are very exacting, and call for every resource known to the modern
orchestra. The Germans were quick in appreciating his music, but it was
not until after his death that his ability was conceded in France. In
1839 he was appointed librarian of the Conservatory, and in 1856 was made
a member of the French Academy. These were the only honors he received,
though he long sought to obtain a professorship in the Conservatory. A
romantic but sad incident in his life was his violent passion for Miss
Smithson, an Irish actress, whom he saw upon the Paris stage in the
_rôle_ of Ophelia, at a time when Victor Hugo had revived an admiration
for Shakspeare among the French. He married her, but did not live with
her long, owing to her bad temper and ungovernable jealousy; though after
the separation he honorably contributed to her support out of the
pittance he was earning. Among his great works are the opera, "Benvenuto
Cellini;" the symphony with chorus, "Romeo and Juliet;" "Beatrice and
Benedict;" "Les Troyens," the text from Virgil's "Æneid;" the symphony,
"Harold in Italy;" the symphony, "Funèbre et Triomphale;" the "Damnation
of Faust;" a double chorused "Te Deum;" the "Symphony Fantastique;" the
"Requiem;" and the sacred trilogy, "L'Enfance du Christ." Berlioz stands
among all other composers as the foremost representative of "programme
music," and has left explicit and very detailed explanations of the
meaning of his works, so that the hearer may listen intelligently by
seeing the external objects his music is intended to picture. In the
knowledge of individual instruments and the grouping of them for effect,
in warmth of imagination and brilliancy of color, and in his daring
combinations and fantastic moods, which are sometimes carried to the very
verge of eccentricity, he is a colossus among modern musicians. He died
in Paris, March 8, 1869.




                              The Requiem.


Ferdinand Hiller writes in his "Künstlerleben:" "Hector Berlioz does not
belong to our musical solar system; he does not belong to the planets,
neither to the large nor to the small. He was a comet, shining far,
somewhat eerie to look at, soon again disappearing; but his appearance
will remain unforgotten." The Requiem ("Messe des Morts") exemplifies
Hiller's words. It is colossal, phenomenal, and altogether unique. It is
not sacred, for it never came from the heart. It is not solemn, though it
is a drama of death. It is a combination of the picturesque, fantastic,
and sublime, in a tone-poem dedicated to the dead.

In 1836 Berlioz was requested by M. de Gasparin, Minister of the
Interior, to write a requiem commemorating the victims of the July
Revolution; but the work was not given to the public until 1837, when it
was sung at the Invalides in memory of General Damremont and the soldiers
killed at the siege of Constantina. It was subsequently asserted by
Berlioz that Cherubini had conspired with others in the Conservatory to
prevent its performance and to secure that of his own, by virtue of the
precedence which his position gave him. The charge, however, must have
been a mere fancy on his part, as he had already written a letter to
Cherubini, saying:--

  "I am deeply touched by the noble abnegation which leads you to refuse
  your admirable Requiem for the ceremony of the Invalides. Be convinced
  of my heartiest gratitude."

The work embraced ten numbers: I. Requiem and Kyrie ("Requiem æternam
dona eis"); II., III., IV., V., and VI., including different motives
taken from the hymn, "Dies Iræ;" VII. "Offertorium;" VIII. "Hostias et
Preces;" IX. "Sanctus;" X. "Agnus Dei." It will be observed that the
composer has not followed the formal sequences of the Mass, and that he
has not only omitted some of the parts, but has also frequently taken
license with those which he uses. This may be accounted for in two ways.
First, he was not of a religious nature. Hiller, in the work already
quoted, says of him:

  "Of his Catholic education every trace had disappeared. Doubts of all
  sorts had possession of him, and the contempt of what he called
  'prejudice' bordered on the monstrous. Berlioz believed neither in a
  God nor in Bach."

Second, it is evident from the construction of the work throughout that
it was his purpose simply to give free rein to his fancy and to express,
even at the risk of being theatrical, the emotions of sublimity, terror,
and awe called up by the associations of the subject. This he could not
have done with a free hand had he been bound down to the set forms of the
Mass.

After a brief but majestic instrumental introduction, the voices enter
upon the "Requiem,"--a beautiful and solemn strain. The movement is built
upon three melodies set to the words, "Requiem æternam," "Tu decet
Hymnus," and the "Kyrie," the accompaniment of which is very descriptive
and characteristic. The "Kyrie" is specially impressive, the chant of the
sopranos being answered by the tenors and basses in unison, and the whole
closing with a dirge-like movement by the orchestra.

The "Dies Iræ" is the most spirited as well as impressive number of the
work. It is intensely dramatic in its effects, indeed it might be called
theatrical. Berlioz seems to have fairly exhausted the resources of
instruments to produce the feeling of awful sublimity and overwhelming
power, even to the verge of the most daring eccentricity and, as one
prominent critic expressed it, "terrible cataclysms." The first part of
the "Dies Iræ" will always be remarkable for the orchestral arrangement.
After the climax of the motive, "Quantus tremor est futurus," there is a
pause which is significant by its very silence; it is the hush before the
storm. Suddenly from either angle of the stage or hall, in addition to
the principal orchestra in front, four smaller bands of trombones,
trumpets, and tubas crash in with overwhelming power in the announcement
of the terrors of the day of judgment. The effect is like that of peal
upon peal of thunder. At its culmination the bass voices enter in unison
upon the words, "Tuba mirum," in the midst of another orchestral storm,
which is still further heightened by an unusual number of kettledrums.
From the beginning to the close, this part of the "Dies Iræ" is simply
cyclopean; words cannot describe its overwhelming power. It is a relief
when the storm has passed over, and we come to the next verse ("Quid sum
miser"), for the basses and tenors, though mostly for the first tenors.
It is a breathing spell of quiet delight. It is given in the softest of
tone, and is marked in the score to be sung with "an expression of
humility and awe." It leads to the andante number ("Rex tremendæ
majestatis"), which is sung fortissimo throughout, and accompanied with
another tremendous outburst of harmonious thunder in crashing chords,
which continues up to the last eight bars, when the voices drop suddenly
from the furious fortissimo to an almost inaudible pianissimo on the
words "Salve me." The next verse ("Quærens me") is an unaccompanied
six-part chorus in imitative style, of very close harmony. The "Dies Iræ"
ends with the "Lachrymosa," the longest and most interesting number in
the work. It is thoroughly melodic, and is peculiarly strengthened by a
pathetic and sentimental accompaniment, which, taken in connection with
the choral part against which it is set, presents an almost inexhaustible
variety of rhythms and an originality of technical effects which are
astonishing. Its general character is broad and solemn, and it closes
with a return to the "Dies Iræ," with full chorus and all the orchestras.
This finishes the "Dies Iræ" section of the work.

The next number is the "Offertorium," in which the voices are limited to
a simple phrase of two notes, A alternating with B flat, which is never
varied throughout the somewhat long movement. It never becomes
monotonous, however, so rich and varied is the instrumentation. The
"Hostias et Preces,"--sustained by the tenors and basses, a very solemn
and majestic movement,--displays another of Berlioz's eccentricities, the
accompaniment at the close of the first phrase being furnished by three
flutes and eight tenor trombones, which one enemy of the composer says
represents the distance from the sublime to the ridiculous. The
"Sanctus," a tenor solo with responses by the sopranos and altos, is full
of poetical, almost sensuous beauty, and is the most popular number in
the work. It closes with a fugue on the words "Hosanna in Excelsis." The
final number is the "Agnus Dei," a chorus for male voices, in which the
composer once more employs the peculiar combination of flutes and tenor
trombones. In this number he also returns to the music of the opening
number, "Requiem æternam," and closes it with an "Amen" softly dying
away. Thus ends the Requiem,--a work which will always be the subject of
critical dispute, owing to its numerous innovations on existing musical
forms and the daring manner in which the composer has treated it.

The following sketch of the first performance of the Requiem, taken from
Berlioz's Autobiography, will be found interesting in this connection. It
is necessary to preface it with the statement that the director of the
Beaux-Arts had insisted that Habeneck should conduct the work. As Berlioz
had quarrelled with the old conductor, and had not been on speaking terms
with him for three years, he at first refused; but subsequently
consented, on condition that he should conduct at one full rehearsal.
Berlioz says:--

  "The day of the performance arrived in the Church of the Invalides,
  before all the princes, peers, and deputies, the French press, the
  correspondents of foreign papers, and an immense crowd. It was
  absolutely essential for me to have a great success; a moderate one
  would have been fatal, and a failure would have annihilated me
  altogether.

  "Now, listen attentively.

  "The various groups of instruments in the orchestra were tolerably
  widely separated, especially the four brass bands introduced in the
  'Tuba mirum,' each of which occupied a corner of the entire orchestra.
  There is no pause between the 'Dies Iræ' and 'Tuba mirum,' but the pace
  of the latter movement is reduced to half what it was before. At this
  point the whole of the brass enters, first altogether, and then in
  passages, answering and interrupting, each a third higher than the
  last. It is obvious that it is of the greatest importance that the four
  beats of the new tempo should be distinctly marked, or else the
  terrible explosion which I had so carefully prepared, with combinations
  and proportions never attempted before or since, and which, rightly
  performed, gives such a picture of the Last Judgment as I believe is
  destined to live, would be a mere enormous and hideous confusion.

  "With my habitual mistrust, I had stationed myself behind Habeneck,
  and, turning my back on him, overlooked the group of kettledrums, which
  he could not see, when the moment approached for them to take part in
  the general _mêlée_. There are perhaps one thousand bars in my Requiem.
  Precisely in that of which I have just been speaking, when the movement
  is retarded and the wind instruments burst in with their terrible
  flourish of trumpets; in fact, just in _the_ one bar where the
  conductor's motion is absolutely indispensable,--Habeneck _puts down
  his baton, quietly takes out his snuffbox_, and proceeds to take a
  pinch of snuff. I always had my eye in his direction, and instantly
  turned rapidly on one heel, and, springing before him, I stretched out
  my arm and marked the four great beats of the new movement. The
  orchestras followed me each in order. I conducted the piece to the end,
  and the effect which I had longed for was produced. When, at the last
  words of the chorus, Habeneck saw that the 'Tuba Mirum' was saved, he
  said: 'What a cold perspiration I have been in! Without you we should
  have been lost.' 'Yes, I know,' I answered, looking fixedly at him. I
  did not add another word.... Had he done it on purpose?... Could it be
  possible that this man had dared to join my enemy, the director, and
  Cherubini's friends, in plotting and attempting such rascality? I don't
  wish to believe it ... but I cannot doubt it. God forgive me if I am
  doing the man injustice!

  "The success of the 'Requiem' was complete, in spite of all the
  conspiracies--cowardly, atrocious, officious, and official--which would
  fain have hindered it."




                                 BRAHMS.


Johannes Brahms, one of the most eminent of living German composers, was
born at Hamburg, May 7, 1833. His father was a double-bass player in the
orchestra in that city, and devoted his son at a very early age to his
own profession. His first piano teacher was Cossell; but to Eduard
Marxsen, the Royal Music Director, he owes his real success as a
composer. Brahms remained in Hamburg until 1853, when he went upon a
concert-tour with Reményí, the eccentric and somewhat sensational
Hungarian, who has been a familiar figure upon the American
concert-stage. He remained with him, however, but a very short time, for
in October of that year they parted company. Brahms had attracted the
notice of Liszt and Joachim; and it may have been through their advice
that the musical partnership was dissolved. In any event, soon after
leaving Reményí he went to Düsseldorf and visited Schumann. It was the
latter who announced him to the world in such strong words as these:--

  "In following with the greatest interest the paths of these elect
  [Joachim, Naumann, Norman, Bargiel, Kirchner, Schäffer, Dietrich, and
  Wilsing], I thought that after such forerunners there would, and must
  at last, all on a sudden appear one whose mission it would be to utter
  the highest expression of his time in an ideal manner,--one who would
  attain mastery, not by degrees, but, like Minerva, would at once spring
  completely armed from the head of Cronion.... May the highest genius
  give him strength for that of which there is hope, as in him dwells
  also another genius, that of modesty! We bid him welcome as a strong
  champion."

The next year (1854) appeared his first works,--three sonatas, a trio,
scherzo for piano, and three books of songs. After a visit to Liszt at
Weimar, he settled down as chorus-conductor and music-teacher at the
court of Lippe-Detmold, where he remained a few years. During this period
he devoted himself assiduously to composition. After leaving Detmold, he
successively resided in Hamburg, Zürich, and Baden-Baden, though most of
his time has been spent in Vienna, where he has directed the Singakademie
and the concerts of the Gesellschaft der Musikfreunde. Schumann's
prophecy has been made good; Brahms is to-day one of the most eminent of
living musicians. Among his most famous compositions are a Funeral Hymn
for chorus and wind-band; the "German Requiem;" "Triumphlied," for
double-chorus and orchestra; "Schicksallied," for chorus and orchestra;
five symphonies; variations on a theme of Haydn, for orchestra; the
Tragic and Academic overtures; and several trios, quartets, quintets,
sextets, concertos, and sonatas.




                           The German Requiem.


The "German Requiem," so called, is not a requiem in its sentiment, nor
in any sense a religious service. The poem is full of consolation for the
mourner, of assurances of joy hereafter, of warnings against the pomps
and vanities of the world, and closes with the victory of the saints over
death and the grave. It might with more propriety be called "a sacred
cantata." The work has seven numbers,--two baritone solos and chorus,
soprano solo and chorus, and four separate choruses. It was first
performed at Bremen on Good Friday, 1868, and in 1873 was first heard in
England. It was also given at the Cincinnati festival of 1884, under Mr.
Thomas's direction.

The opening chorus ("Blessed are they that go mourning") is beautifully
written, and is particularly noticeable for the richness of its
accompaniment. In the Funeral March, which follows, a very graphic
resemblance to the measured tread of the cortège is accomplished by the
use of triple time. In this, as well as in numerous other instances, the
composer cuts loose from ordinary methods, and in pure classical form and
by the use of legitimate musical processes achieves what others seek to
effect by sensuous or purely imitative music. The third number ("Lord,
make me to know the Measure of my Days on Earth") opens with a baritone
solo, followed by two choral fugues, which are solidly constructed,
though they are extremely difficult to sing, and call for a chorus of
unusual discipline and intelligence. The fourth, for chorus ("How lovely
is Thy Dwelling-place, O Lord of Hosts"), is in striking contrast with
its predecessor, being a slow movement, and very melodious in style. The
fifth ("Ye now are sorrowful, grieve not"), for soprano solo and chorus,
shows the composer's unusual power as a song-writer, as well as his
melodious attractiveness when melody answers his purpose. In the next
number, set for chorus with baritone solo responses ("Here on Earth we
have no continuing Place, we seek now a heavenly one"), the character of
the music changes again, and the resurrection of the dead is pictured in
fugal passages of tremendous power and difficulty. After the storm comes
the calm again in the finale ("Blessed are the Faithful who in the Lord
are sleeping"), which contains a reminiscence of the opening number, and
closes the work in a gentle, but deeply serious strain. It was the
"German Requiem" which first made Brahms famous; it confirmed all that
Schumann had said of him. Its great difficulties require an extraordinary
chorus and orchestra; but when these can be had, the power and beauty of
the work will always be conceded.




                                 COSTA.


Michael Costa, the eminent conductor and composer, was born at Naples,
Feb. 4, 1810. Having displayed musical aptitude at a very early age, he
was placed in the Royal Academy of Music. Before his twenty-first year he
had composed several works, among them a mass for four voices, a "Dixit
Dominus," three symphonies, an oratorio, "La Passione," the ballet music
to "Kenilworth," and the operas, "Il Delitto punito," "Il Sospetto
funesto," "Il carcere d' Ildegonda," and "Malvina,"--the last for the San
Carlo at Naples. In 1829 he was sent to England by his master Zingarelli
to conduct one of the latter's compositions at Birmingham; and that
country thereafter became his home. The next year he was engaged at the
King's Theatre, now known as Her Majesty's, as piano-master, and two
years later became the musical director. He was the first to bring the
band to its proper place, though he had to make a hard fight against the
ballet, which at that time threatened to absorb both singers and
orchestra, and to sweep the musical drama from the stage. He succeeded,
however, and did much also to improve the composition of the orchestra.
While holding this position he wrote the ballets, "Une heure à Naples"
and "Sir Huon" for Taglioni, and "Alma" for Cerito, the beautiful
quartet, "Ecco quel fiero istante," and the operas "Malek Adhel" for
Paris in 1837, and "Don Carlos" for London in 1844. He remained at Her
Majesty's Theatre for fifteen years, during which time he did a great
work for singers and band, and reduced the ballet to its proper rank. In
1846 he left his position and went to the new Italian opera at Covent
Garden, where he remained for a quarter of a century, absolute in his
musical supremacy and free to deal with all works as he pleased, among
them those of Meyerbeer, at that time the most prominent composer in the
operatic world; for Wagner as yet was scarcely known. It is to Costa that
Meyerbeer owes his English reputation. In the same year (1846) he took
the direction of the Philharmonic orchestra, and two years later that of
the Sacred Harmonic Society, which he held until his death, and as
conductor of which he also directed the Handel festivals. In 1849 he was
engaged for the Birmingham festivals, and also conducted them until his
death. In 1854 he resigned his position with the Philharmonic, and his
successor, for a brief time only, was Richard Wagner. His oratorio,
"Eli," was composed for the Birmingham Festival of 1855, and his second
oratorio, "Naaman," for the same festival in 1864. In 1869 he was
knighted, and shortly afterwards, when his "Eli" was produced at
Stuttgart, it won for him the royal order of Frederick from the King of
Würtemberg. He also had decorations from the sovereigns of Germany,
Turkey, Italy, and the Netherlands, in recognition of his musical
accomplishments. In 1871 he returned again to Her Majesty's Opera in the
capacity of "director of the music, composer, and conductor;" but a few
years ago he again dissolved his connection with it, and devoted himself
entirely to the private management and public direction of the Sacred
Harmonic Society, with which he was identified for over thirty years. He
died in April, 1884.




                                  Eli.


The oratorio of "Eli," the text taken from the first book of Samuel, and
adapted by William Bartholomew, was first performed at the Birmingham
Festival, Aug. 29, 1855, under Costa's own direction, with Mesdames
Viardot and Novello and Messrs. Sims Reeves and Carl Formes in the
principal parts. The characters are Eli, Elkanah, Hannah, Samuel, the Man
of God, Saph the Philistine warrior, Hophni and Phinehas the sons of Eli,
and the Priests and Philistines as chorus. The story is not very
consistent in its outlines, and is fragmentary withal, the narrative of
the child Samuel being the central theme, around which are grouped the
tribulations of Elkanah and Hannah, the service of Eli the priest, the
revels of his profligate sons, and the martial deeds of the Philistines.

The overture opens with a pianissimo prelude for organ in chorale form,
followed by an orchestral fugue well worked up, but very quiet in
character. Indeed, the whole overture is mostly pianissimo. In striking
contrast follows the opening recitative for bass ("Blow ye the Trumpet"),
which is the signal for those instruments, and introduces the first
chorus ("Let us go to pray before the Lord"), beginning with a soft
staccato which gradually works up to a jubilant climax on the words "Make
a joyful Noise." A tenor solo for Elkanah is interwoven with the chorus,
which closes with broad, flowing harmony. The next number, a bass air
with chorus ("Let the People praise Thee"), is somewhat peculiar in its
construction. It begins with the air, which is slow and tender, and at
the close the chorus takes it in canon form. Then Eli intones
benedictions in chorale style, and the chorus responds with "Amens" in
full harmony at the end of each, making a very impressive effect. It is
followed by a very elaborate chorus ("Blessed be the Lord"), closing with
a fugue on the word "Amen," which is very clear and well worked up. The
next number is the sorrowful prayer of the barren and grieving Hannah
("Turn Thee unto me"), which is very expressive in its mournful
supplication, and splendidly contrasted with her joyous song after the
birth of Samuel, of which mention will be made in its proper connection.
Eli rebukes her, and a dialogue ensues, interrupted by the tender chorus,
"The Lord is good." The dialogue form is again renewed, this time by
Elkanah and Hannah, leading to a beautiful duet between them ("Wherefore
is thy Soul cast down?").

The character of the music now changes as we enter upon a long
drinking-chorus, with solos by the two revellers, Hophni and Phinehas
("For everything there is a Season"). The change from the seriousness of
the preceding numbers is very abrupt, and the music of the chorus is
decidedly of the conventional Italian drinking-song character. Eli
appears and rebukes them, and after a cantabile aria ("Thou shouldst mark
Iniquities"), a short chorus of Levites, for tenors and basses, ensues,
introducing a simple, but well-sustained chorale for full chorus ("How
mighty is Thy Name"). At this point the "Man of God" appears, rebuking
the Levites for their polluted offerings. His denunciations are declaimed
in strong, spirited phrases, accompanied by the chorus of the people
("They have profaned it"), beginning in unison. The scene now changes to
the camp of the Philistines, where Saph, their man of war, shouts out his
angry and boisterous defiance in his solo ("Philistines, hark, the
Trumpet sounding"). It is followed by a choral response from the
Philistines ("Speed us on to fight"), which is in the same robust and
stirring style, though the general effect is theatrical and somewhat
commonplace. Combined with it is a choral response by the priests of
Dagon, of an Oriental character. After this clash of sound follows an air
of a sombre style by Eli ("Hear my Prayer, O Lord"), the introduction and
accompaniment of which are very striking. The "Man of God" once more
appears, announcing the approaching death of Eli's sons to a weird,
sepulchral accompaniment of the reeds and trombones, and leading up to a
very effective duet between them ("Lord, cause Thy Face to shine upon Thy
Servant"). Another chorale ensues ("O make a joyful Noise"), and after a
brief recitative Hannah has a most exultant song, overflowing with love
and gratitude at the birth of Samuel ("I will extol Thee, O Lord"). The
first part closes with a brief recitative between Hannah and Eli,
preluding a fugued chorus ("Hosanna in the highest"), built up on two
motives and one of the most elaborate numbers in the oratorio.

The second part opens with a chaste and lovely melody, the morning prayer
of the child Samuel ("Lord, from my Bed again I rise"), followed with
some pretty recitative between the child and his parents, and an
unaccompanied quartet, set to the same choral theme that was heard in the
organ prelude to the overture. The next number is the long and showy
instrumental march of the Israelites, followed by two very striking
choruses,--the first ("Hold not Thy Peace and be not still, O God") of
which appeals for divine help against the enemy, and the second, an
allegro ("O God, make them like a Wheel"), leads into a fugue ("So
persecute them"), which is very energetic in character, and closes with
the martial hymn, "God and King of Jacob's Nation," sung to the melody of
the preceding march.

The oratorio abounds in contrasts, and here occurs another, the evening
prayer of Samuel ("This Night I lift my Heart to Thee"),--a pure, quiet
melody, gradually dying away as he drops asleep, and followed by an angel
chorus for female voices with harp accompaniment ("No Evil shall befall
thee"), the effect of which is very beautiful, especially in the
decrescendo at the close. A messenger suddenly arrives, announcing the
defeat of Israel by the Philistines, upon which the chorus bursts out
with one of the most telling numbers, both in the voice parts and the
descriptiveness of the accompaniment ("Woe unto us, we are spoiled!").
Some very dramatic recitative between Samuel and Eli follows, after which
the Levites join in the chorus, "Bless ye the Lord," opening with the
tenors and closing in four parts, with the call of Eli intervening
("Watchmen, what of the Night?"). A long recitative by Samuel ("The Lord
said"), foreshadowing the disasters to the house of Eli; an air by Eli
("Although my House be not with God"); a funeral chorus by the Israelites
("Lament with a doleful Lamentation"); further phrases of recitative
announcing more defeats of Israel, the capture of the ark, the death of
Eli and his sons, and an appeal by Samuel to blow the trumpet, calling a
solemn assembly to implore the pity of the Lord,--prepare the way for the
final chorus ("Blessed be the Lord"), closing with a fugue on the word
"Hallelujah."

The oratorio was first given in this country by the Boston Handel and
Haydn Society, Feb. 15, 1857, under the direction of Carl Zerrahn, with
Mr. Thomas Ball as Eli and also as Saph, Mr. Wilde as the Man of God, Mr.
C. R. Adams as Elkanah, Mrs. Long as Hannah, and Miss Hawley in the
contralto part of Samuel. Writing of that performance, Mr. Dwight, the
careful and discriminating critic, summed up the work as follows: "As a
whole, 'Eli' is a noble and impressive oratorio. The composition is
learned and musician-like, and generally appropriate, tasteful,
dignified, often beautiful, and occasionally grand. It is by no means a
work of genius, but it is a work of high musical culture, and indicates a
mind imbued with the best traditions and familiar with the best masters
of the art, and a masterly command of all the modern musical resources,
except the 'faculty divine,'"--which, we may be permitted to say, is not
included in "modern musical resources." The characterization of the
oratorio, however, is thoroughly pertinent and complete. It is somewhat
remarkable that a work so excellent and having so many elements of
popularity should not be given more frequently in this country.




                              ANTON DVORÁK.


Anton Dvorák, the Bohemian composer who has risen so suddenly into
prominence, was born at Mülhausen, near Prague, Sept. 8, 1841. His father
combined the businesses of tavern-keeper and butcher, and young Dvorák
assisted him in waiting upon customers, as well as in the slaughtering
business. As the laws of Bohemia stipulate that music shall be a part of
common-school education, Dvorák learned the rudiments in the village
school, and also received violin instruction. At the age of thirteen he
went to work for an uncle who resided in a village where the schoolmaster
was a proficient musician. The latter, recognizing his ability, gave him
lessons on the organ, and allowed him to copy music. Piano-lessons
followed, and he had soon grounded himself quite thoroughly in
counterpoint. At the age of sixteen he was admitted to the organ-school
at Prague, of which Joseph Pitsch was the principal. Pitsch died shortly
after, and was succeeded by Kreyci, who made Dvorák acquainted with the
music of Mozart, Beethoven, and Mendelssohn. The first orchestral work
which he heard was Beethoven's "Ninth Symphony," during its rehearsal
under Spohr's direction. In 1860, being then in his nineteenth year, he
obtained an engagement, with the meagre salary of $125 a year, as
violinist in a band that played at cafés and dances. Two years later he
secured a position in the Bohemian Opera-House at Prague, then under the
direction of Mayer, where he remained until 1871, in which year he left
the theatre and devoted himself to teaching, with the prospect of earning
$250 a year. These were hard days for the young musician; but while he
was thus struggling for a bare subsistence he continued writing
compositions, though he had no prospect of selling them or of having them
played. One writer remarks on this point: "It is far from difficult to
compare him in this respect with that marvellous embodiment of patience
and enthusiasm, Franz Schubert; only, more fortunate than the Viennese
master, the Bohemian has lived to receive his reward. Between these two
men another point of resemblance appears. Neither can be charged with
pushing or intriguing himself into prominence. Schubert had plenty of
artistic ambition, but of personal ambition none; while the quality he so
entirely lacked cannot be accredited to Dvorák, who spent the best part
of his life in the enjoyment of merely local fame." About this time he
wrote his "Patriotic Hymn" and the opera "König und Köhler." The latter
was rejected after an orchestral trial; but he continued his work,
undaunted by failure. Shortly after this he received the appointment of
organist at the Adelbert Church, Prague, and fortune began to smile upon
him. His symphony in F was laid before the Minister of Instruction in
Vienna, and upon the recommendation of Herbeck secured him a grant of
$200. When Brahms replaced Herbeck on the committee which reported upon
artists' stipends, he fully recognized Dvorák's ability, and not only
encouraged him, but also brought him before the world by securing him a
publisher and commending him to Joachim, who still further advanced his
interests by securing performances of his works in Germany and England.
Since that time he has risen rapidly, and is now recognized as one of the
most promising of living composers. Among his works which have been
produced during the past few years are the "Stabat Mater," the cantata
"The Spectre Bride," three operas in the Czechist dialect, three
orchestral symphonies, several Slavonic rhapsodies, overtures, violin and
piano concertos, an exceedingly beautiful sextet, and numerous songs.




                            The Stabat Mater.


Dvorák's "Stabat Mater" was written in 1875. It was sent to the Austrian
Minister of Instruction, but was not deemed worthy of the grant of $200
which the composer had expected. Its merit was subsequently recognized by
Brahms and Joachim, and the latter secured a hearing of it in London in
1883. It immediately made its composer famous. The Philharmonic Society
invited him to London, and the work was given with great success at the
Albert Hall, and later at the Worcester and Hereford festivals. It was in
England indeed that his celebrity was established, and for that country
all his new works are now written.

The "Stabat Mater" is written for soli, chorus, and orchestra, and
comprises ten numbers. The first is the quartet and chorus, "Stabat Mater
dolorosa," and carries the old Latin hymn as far as the "Quis est homo."
After an orchestral introduction which gives out the principal motives on
which the number is based, the vocal quartet begins. The materials of
which it is composed are very simple, but they are worked up with great
technical skill. The general effect is tragic rather than pathetic, as if
the composer were contemplating not so much the grief of the Virgin
Mother at the foot of the Cross as the awful nature of the tragedy itself
and its far-reaching consequences.

The second number is the quartet "Quis est homo." After a short
introduction, the theme is taken by the alto, followed by the tenor and
bass, and lastly by the soprano, the general structure growing more
elaborate at each entrance. After the second subject is introduced a
splendid climax is reached, and in the coda the voices whisper the words
"vidit suum" to an accompaniment of wind instruments in sustained and
impressive chords.

The third number, "Eia Mater," is built up on an exceedingly brief
motive, which is augmented with surprising power in choral form. It is a
work of scholarly skill, and yet is full of charm and grace, and will
always commend itself even to the untutored hearer by its tenderness and
pathetic beauty.

The fourth number, "Fac ut ardeat cor meum," for bass solo and chorus,
like the third is most skilfully constructed out of small materials, and
has a fine contrast between the solo and the chorus, which at its
entrance is assigned to the female voices only, with organ accompaniment.

The fifth number is the chorus "Tui nati vulnerati," which is remarkable
for the smooth and flowing manner in which its two subjects are treated.

The sixth number, "Fac me vere tecum flere," for tenor solo and chorus,
is very elaborate in its construction. A stately theme is given out by
the tenor, repeated in three-part harmony by male voices, the
accompaniment being independent in form; the subject then returns, first
for solo, and then for male voices, in varying harmonies. After a brief
vocal episode the subject reappears in still different form, and,
followed by the episode worked up at length in a coda, brings the number
to its close.

The seventh number, "Virgo, virgonum præclara," for full chorus, is
marked by great simplicity and tenderness, and will always be one of the
most popular sections of the work.

The eighth number, "Fac ut portem," is a duet for soprano and tenor,
responsive in character, and constructed on very simple phrases presented
in varying forms both by the voices and orchestra.

The ninth number, "Inflammatus et accensus," is one of the most masterly
in the whole work. It is an alto solo composed of two subjects, the first
very majestic, and the second pathetic in character, forming a contrast
of great power and beauty.

The tenth and closing number, "Quando corpus morietur," for quartet and
chorus, is constructed substantially upon the same themes which appeared
in the "Stabat Mater," and closes with an "Amen" of a massive character,
exhibiting astonishing contrapuntal skill. One of the best English
critics says of the whole work:--

  "The 'Stabat Mater' approaches as near to greatness as possible, if it
  be not actually destined to rank among world-renowned masterpieces. It
  is fresh and new, while in harmony with the established canons of art;
  and though apparently labored and over-developed in places, speaks with
  the force and directness of genius."




                                 GOUNOD.


Charles François Gounod was born in Paris, June 17, 1818. His fame has
been made world-wide by the extraordinary success of his opera "Faust,"
and yet more than almost any other operatic composer of modern times he
has devoted himself to sacred music. His earlier studies were pursued in
Paris at the Conservatory, under the tuition of Paër and Lesueur, and in
1839 the receipt of the Grand Prix gave him the coveted opportunity to go
to Italy. In the atmosphere of Rome religious influences made a strong
impression upon him. He devoted himself assiduously to the study of
Palestrina, and among his first important compositions were a mass
performed at the Church of San Luigi dei Francesi in 1841, and a second,
written without accompaniment, which was given in Vienna two years later.
On his return to Paris, religious ideas still retained their sway over
him, and he became organist and conductor at the Missions étrangères. He
even contemplated taking orders, and attended a theological course for
two years. In 1846 he became a pupil at the Séminaire; but at last he
gave up his priestly intentions and devoted himself wholly to musical
composition, though he has been, if not a devotee, a religious enthusiast
all his life, and that too in the midst of a peculiarly worldly career.
It was about this period that he wrote his "Messe Solenelle" in G,--the
first of his compositions that was ever produced in England. It was
cordially received, and he was universally recognized as a promising
musician. For many years succeeding this event he devoted himself mainly
to secular music, and opera after opera rapidly came from his
pen,--"Sappho" (1851); "Nonne Sanglante" (1854); "Le Médecin malgré lui"
(1858); "Faust," his greatest work, and one of the most successful of
modern operas (1859); "Philémon et Baucis" (1860); "Reine de Saba"
(1862); "Mireille" (1864); "La Colombe" (1866); "Roméo et Juliette"
(1867); "Cinq Mars" (1877), and "Polyeucte" (1878). Notwithstanding the
attention he gave to opera and to much other secular music, he found
ample time for the composition of sacred works. In 1852, while in Paris,
he became conductor of the Orphéon, and for the pupils of that
institution he composed two masses. He has also written a great number of
pieces for choir use which are very popular, and deservedly so,
particularly the beautiful song "Nazareth." Among his larger works are a
"Stabat Mater," with orchestral accompaniment; the oratorio "Tobie;" a
"De Profundis" and an "Ave Verum;" and the two oratorios, "The
Redemption," performed at Birmingham in 1882, and "Mors et Vita," brought
out at the same place in 1885. The composer is now engaged upon the
scheme of a new oratorio, the career of Joan of Arc being its subject. It
may be said in closing this sketch, which has been mainly confined to a
consideration of his sacred compositions, as his operatic career has been
fully treated in "Standard Operas," that in 1873 he wrote the incidental
music to Jules Barbier's tragedy, "Jeanne d'Arc," which may have inspired
his determination to write an oratorio on the same subject.




                             The Redemption.


"The Redemption, a Sacred Trilogy," is the title which Gounod gave to
this work, and on its opening page he wrote: "The work of my life." In a
note appended to his description of its contents he says:--

  "It was during the autumn of the year 1867 that I first thought of
  composing a musical work on the Redemption. I wrote the words at Rome,
  where I passed two months of the winter 1867-68 with my friend Hébert,
  the celebrated painter, at that time director of the Academy of France.
  Of the music I then composed only two fragments: first, 'The March to
  Calvary' in its entirety; second, the opening of the first division of
  the third part, 'The Pentecost.' Twelve years afterwards I finished the
  work, which had so long been interrupted, with a view to its being
  performed at the festival at Birmingham in 1882."

It was brought out, as he contemplated, in August of that year, and the
production was a memorable one. It was first heard in this country in the
winter of 1883-84 under Mr. Theodore Thomas's direction, and was one of
the prominent works in his series of festivals in the latter year.

Gounod himself has prefaced the music with an admirably concise
description of the text and its various subjects. Of its general contents
he says:

  "This work is a lyrical setting forth of the three great facts on which
  depends the existence of the Christian Church. These facts are,--first,
  the passion and the death of the Saviour; second, his glorious life on
  earth from his resurrection to his ascension; third, the spread of
  Christianity in the world through the mission of the Apostles. These
  three parts of the present trilogy are preceded by a prologue on the
  creation, the fall of our first parents, and the promise of a
  redeemer."

The divisions of the work are as follows:--

  Prologue.--The Creation.
  Part I.--Calvary.
  Part II.--From the Resurrection to the Ascension.
  Part III.--The Pentecost.

The prologue comprises the Mosaic account of the creation and fall of
man, involving the necessity of divine mediation, the promise of
redemption, and the annunciation of the mystery of the incarnation of the
Holy Virgin. After a brief instrumental introduction, descriptive of
chaos, the tenor Narrator announces the completion of creation in
recitative, followed by a similar declamation from the bass Narrator
announcing the fall of man, the tenor Narrator answering with the
announcement of the Redeemer's advent ("But of the Spotless Lamb"), in
which we have for the first time a genuine Wagnerian _leit motif_, which
runs through the music of the oratorio whenever allusion is made to the
divine atonement. This typical melody is heard nine times,--three times
in the prologue, twice in the scene of the crucifixion, once in our
Saviour's promise to the thieves on the cross, once in his appearance to
the holy women, and twice in the ascension. It is first given out as a
violin solo, and at the close of the tenor recitative is repeated by all
the strings, leading to the mystic chorale, "The Earth is my Possession,"
to be sung by a celestial choir of twenty-eight voices. At its close the
typical melody is introduced in responsive form between flute and
clarinet. To the first, the angelic message of the annunciation, Gounod
has affixed the title, "Ave, gratia plena;" and to the second, the reply
of Mary, "Fiat mihi secundum verbum tuum."

The first part includes the march to Calvary, which is divided into six
separate numbers, yet so connected as to make a single musical
series,--the crucifixion, Mary at the foot of the cross, the dying
thieves, the death of Jesus, and the confession of his divinity by the
centurion. It opens with the story of the condemnation of the Man of
Sorrows by Pilate, told by the bass Narrator, the words of Jesus himself,
however, being used invariably in the first person, and sung by the
baritone voice, as when he says, "If my Deeds have been evil,"
immediately following the bass recitative. After another monologue by the
Narrator, ensues the march to the cross,--an instrumental number which is
brilliant in its color effects and somewhat barbaric in tone. Without any
break, the sopranos enter with the words, "Forth the Royal Banners go,"
set to a melody from the Roman Catholic liturgy; after which the march is
resumed. The bass Narrator tells the story of the women who followed
lamenting, interrupted by a semi-chorus of sopranos singing the lament,
and by the words of Jesus, "Ye Daughters of Israel, weep not for me."
Again the march is heard, and the sopranos resume ("Forth the Royal
Banners go"). The tenor Narrator recites the preparation for the
crucifixion, accompanied by very descriptive music, and followed by a
stormy chorus of the People ("Ha! thou that didst declare"), and the
mocking cries of the priests ("Can he now save himself?"), sung by a male
chorus. In a pathetic monologue Jesus appeals for their pardon, which
leads to an elaborate concerted number for chorus or quartet, called "The
Reproaches." A conversation ensues between Jesus and Mary, followed by
the quartet, "Beside the Cross remaining," in canon form, preluding the
chorale, "While my Watch I am keeping," at first sung by Mary, and then
taken up by the full chorus, accompanied by organ, trombones, and
trumpets. The next scene is that between Jesus and the two Thieves, which
also leads to a chorale ("Lord Jesus, thou to all bringest Light and
Salvation"). This number contains the last touch of brightness in the
first part. Immediately the bass Narrator announces the approach of the
awful tragedy. The gathering darkness is pictured by a vivid passage for
strings and clarinet, succeeded by the agonizing cries of the Saviour.
The bass Narrator declares the consummation of the tragedy, and then with
the tenor Narrator describes the throes of Nature ("And then the Air was
filled with a Murmur unwonted"), the rending of the veil of the Temple,
the breaking of the rocks, the earthquake, and the visions of the saintly
apparitions. The last number is the conviction of the centurion, followed
by a short chorale ("For us the Christ is made a Victim availing").

The second part includes the announcement of the doctrine of the
resurrection by the mystic chorus, the appearance of the Angel to the
Holy Women at the sepulchre, that of Jesus to them while on the way to
Galilee, the consternation of the Sanhedrim when it is learned that the
tomb is empty, the meeting of the Holy Women and the Apostles, the
appearance of Jesus to the latter, and his final ascension. It opens with
a chorus for the mystic choir ("Saviour of Men"), followed by a short
pastorale with muted strings and leading to a trio for the three Women
("How shall we by ourselves have Strength to roll away the Stone?").
Their apprehensions are removed by the tenor Narrator and the message of
the Angel interwoven with the harp and conveyed in the beautiful aria,
"Why seek ye the Living among the Dead?" Jesus at last reveals himself to
the Women with the words, "All hail! Blessed are ye Women," accompanied
by the typical melody, of which mention has already been made. The three
Women disappear on the way to convey his message to the Disciples, and
the scene changes to the Sanhedrim, where, in a tumultuous and agitated
chorus for male voices ("Christ is risen again"), the story of the empty
tomb is told by the Watchers. The bass Narrator relates the amazement of
the priests and elders, and their plot to bribe the guard, leading to the
chorus for male voices ("Say ye that in the Night his Disciples have come
and stolen him away"), at the close of which ensues a full, massive
chorus ("Now, behold ye the Guard, this, your Sleep-vanquished Guard"),
closing with the denunciation in unison ("For Ages on your Heads shall
Contempt be outpoured"). The tenor and bass Narrators in duet tell of the
sorrow of the Disciples, which prepares the way for a lovely trio for
first and second soprano and alto ("The Lord he has risen again"). The
next number is one of the most effective in the whole work,--a soprano
obligato solo, accompanied by the full strength of chorus and orchestra,
to the words:

      "From thy love as a Father,
      O Lord, teach us to gather
      That life will conquer death.
      They who seek things eternal
      Shall rise to light supernal
      On wings of lovely faith."

In the close the effect is sublime, the climax reaching to C in alt with
the full power of the accompanying forces. Then follows a dialogue
between the Saviour and his Apostles, in which he gives them their
mission to the world. The finale then begins with a massive chorus
("Unfold, ye Portals everlasting"). The celestial chorus above,
accompanied by harps and trumpets, inquire, "But who is he, the King of
Glory?" The answer comes in a stately unison by the terrestrial chorus,
"He who Death overcame." Again the question is asked, and again it is
answered; whereupon the two choirs are massed in the jubilant chorus,
"Unfold! for lo the King comes nigh!" the full orchestra and organ
sounding the Redemption melody, and the whole closing with a fanfare of
trumpets.

The third part includes the prophecy of the millennium, the descent of
the Holy Ghost to the Apostles, the Pentecostal manifestations, and the
Hymn of the Apostles. The latter is so important that the composer's own
analysis is appended:--

  "This division of the third part of the work, the last and one of the
  most highly developed of the trilogy, comprises seven numbers, and
  gives a summary of the Christian faith.

  "1. The Apostles first proclaim the three great doctrines of the
  Incarnation of the Word, his eternal generation, and his continual
  presence with his Church. This first number is written in a style which
  is intended to recall the form and rhythm of the chants called 'Proses'
  in the Catholic liturgy.

  "2. Quartet and Chorus. 'By faith salvation comes, and by peace
  consolation.'

  "3. Chorus. His power manifested by miracles.

  "4. Quartet. 'O come to me, all ye that are sad and that weep.'

  "5. Semi-Chorus. The Beatitudes.

  "6. Repetition of the theme of No. 1, with the whole choir, the
  orchestra, and the great organ.

  "7. Final Coda. Glorification of the Most Holy Trinity throughout all
  ages."

This part of the oratorio, after a short instrumental prelude, opens with
a brief chorus ("Lovely appear over the Mountains"), followed by a
soprano solo, the only distinct number of that kind in the work, set to
the words, "Over the barren Wastes shall Flowers have possession," at its
close the chorus resuming in unison, "Lovely appear over the Mountains."
The next number is "The Apostles in Prayer," an instrumental sketch,
followed by the Narrators relating the descent of the Holy Spirit.
Without break, the Apostles' Hymn begins, tenors and basses in unison
("The Word is Flesh become") leading into the quartet of solo voices ("By
Faith Salvation comes, and by Peace, Consolation"). The chorus responds
antiphonally, and again the solo voices are heard in a lovely quartet
("He has said to all the Unhappy"), followed by a small choir of thirty
voices ("Blessed are the poor in Spirit"), at the end of which all the
voices are massed on the Apostles' Hymn, which closes in fugal form on
the words, "He like the Holy Ghost is one with the Father, an everlasting
Trinity," the whole ending in massive chords.




                              Mors et Vita.


The oratorio "Mors et Vita" ("Death and Life") is the continuation of
"The Redemption," and, like that work also, is a trilogy. It was first
performed at the Birmingham Festival, Aug. 26, 1885, under the direction
of Herr Hans Richter, the principal parts being sung by Mesdames Albani
and Patey and Messrs. Santley and Lloyd. Its companion oratorio, "The
Redemption," was dedicated to Queen Victoria, and itself to His Holiness
Pope Leo XIII. In his preface to the work, Gounod says:--

  "It will perhaps be asked why, in the title, I have placed death before
  life, although in the order of temporal things life precedes death.
  Death is only the end of that existence which dies each day; it is only
  the end of a continual 'dying.' But it is the first moment, and, as it
  were, the birth of that which dies no more. I cannot here enter into a
  detailed analysis of the different musical forms which express the
  meaning and idea of this work. I do not wish to expose myself to the
  reproach either of pretension or subtlety. I shall therefore confine
  myself to pointing out the essential features of the ideas I have
  wished to express,--that is to say, the tears which death causes us to
  shed here below; the hope of a better life; the solemn dread of
  unerring justice; the tender and filial trust in eternal love."

The composer further calls attention in his preface to the use of
representative themes, an illustration of which was also noted in "The
Redemption." The first one, consisting of four notes, presenting a
sequence of three major seconds, is intended to express "the terror
inspired by the sense of the inflexibility of justice and, in
consequence, by that of the anguish of punishment. Its sternness gives
expression both to the sentences of divine justice and the sufferings of
the condemned, and is found in combination throughout the whole work,
with melodic forms which express sentiments altogether different, as in
the 'Sanctus' and the 'Pie Jesu' in the 'Requiem,' which forms the first
part." It is first heard in the opening chorus, and for the last time in
the quartet of the third part. The second melodic form, expressive of
sorrow and tears, by the change of a single note and the use of the major
key is made to express consolation and joy. "The third," says Gounod, "by
means of threefold superposition, results in the interval of an augmented
fifth, and announces the awakening of the dead at the terrifying call of
the angelic trumpets, of which Saint Paul speaks in one of his epistles
to the Corinthians."

The oratorio is divided into a prologue and three parts, the Latin text
being used throughout. The first part is entitled "Mors," and opens with
the prologue, which is brief, followed by the "Requiem," interspersed
with texts of a reflective character commenting upon the sentiment. The
second part is entitled "Judicium" ("Judgment"), and includes (1) The
Sleep of the Dead; (2) The Trumpets at the Last Judgment; (3) The
Resurrection of the Dead; (4) The Judge; (5) The Judgment of the Elect;
(6) The Judgment of the Rejected. The third part is entitled "Vita," and
includes the vision of Saint John, the text being taken from the
Apocalypse; the work closing with an "Hosanna in Excelsis," exulting in
the glorious vision of the heavenly Jerusalem.

The prologue, which is sustained by the chorus and baritone solo,
declares the terrors of death and the judgment. The chorus intones the
words, "It is a Fearful Thing to fall into the Hands of the Living God,"
and in this phrase is heard the chief motive, heavily accented by the
percussion instruments,--the motive which typifies death both of the body
and of the unredeemed soul. Immediately after follows the baritone voice,
that of Jesus, in the familiar words, "I am the Resurrection and the
Life." The chorus repeats the declaration, and the Requiem Mass then
begins, divided into various sections, of which the "Dies Iræ" is the
most important; this in turn subdivided in the conventional form. After
an adagio prelude and the intonation of the "Requiem æternam," an
interpolated text occurs ("From the Morning Watch till the Evening"), set
as a double chorus without accompaniment, in the genuine Church style of
the old masters.  It leads directly to the "Dies Iræ," in which the death
motive already referred to frequently occurs. It is laid out in duets,
quartets, and arias, with and without chorus, very much in the same tempo
and of the same character of melody. The verse, "Ah! what shall we then
be pleading?" for quartet and chorus, is remarkable for its attractive
melody. It is followed by a soprano solo and chorus ("Happy are we, with
such a Saviour") of a reflective character, which gives out still another
very tuneful melody. The hymn is then resumed with the verse, "Faint and
worn, thou yet hast sought us," for duet and chorus, which is of the same
general character. The next verse, "Lord, for Anguish hear us moaning,"
for quartet and chorus, is very effective and elaborate in its
construction, particularly as compared with that immediately following
("With the Faithful deign to place us"), a tenor solo of a quaint and
pastoral character. The next number for chorus ("While the wicked are
confounded") affords still another striking contrast, being in the
grandiose style and very dramatic, closing with phrases for the solo
voices expressive of submission and contrition. Up to this point the
"Dies Iræ" has been monotonous in its sameness of general style; but the
next verse ("Day of Weeping, Day of Mourning") is a beautiful and
thoroughly original number of very striking effect. It leads directly to
the offertory ("O Lord Jesus Christ, King of Glory"), which is composed
of a chorus for eight parts, a soprano solo ("But, Lord, do thou bring
them evermore"), a chorus ("Which once to Abraham"), and a second chorus
("Sacrifice of Prayer and Praise"). The soprano solo is a delightful
melody, sung to a delicate accompaniment of the strings, with occasional
chords on the harp, and based upon the beautiful second typical motive,
which the composer styles "The Motive of Happiness." The chorus, "Which
once to Abraham," is set in fugue form, which is the conventional style
among composers with this number; but, as in "The Redemption," whenever
Gounod employs the fugue form, he drops it as soon as the four voices
have fairly launched themselves.

The next number is the "Sanctus,"--a beautiful tenor aria with chorus,
full of that sweetness which is so characteristic of Gounod. It is
followed by the quartet, "Mighty Saviour, Jesus blest," which is deeply
religious in character; the lovely soprano solo and chorus, "Agnus Dei;"
and the chorus, "Lord, forever let Light Eternal." The first part is
rounded off with an epilogue, an interlude for full orchestra and organ,
based upon the first and second typical melodies, forming a consistent
and stately finale to this part of the work.

The second part is peculiar for the prominence which the composer assigns
to the orchestra. It opens with a well-sustained, gentle adagio movement,
entitled "The Sleep of the Dead," which at times is somewhat harshly
interrupted by the third typical melody, announcing the awakening of the
dead at the terrifying call of the angelic trumpets. This is specially
noticeable in that part of the prelude called "The Trumpet of the Last
Judgment," in which the trombones, trumpets, and tubas are employed with
extraordinary effect. Still a third phrase of the prelude occurs,--"The
Resurrection of the Dead,"--which is smooth and flowing in its style, and
peculiarly rich in harmony. A brief recitative by baritone ("But when the
Son of Man") intervenes, immediately followed by another instrumental
number, entitled "Judex" ("The Judge"),--one of the most effective pieces
of orchestration in the oratorio, based upon the motive which indicates
the tempering of justice with mercy, given out by the strings in unison.
It preludes a short chorus ("Sitting upon the Throne"), the previous
melody still continuing in the orchestra. The "Judgment of the Elect"
follows, pronounced by the baritone voice in recitative, and leading
directly to the soprano solo, "The Righteous shall enter into Glory
eternal,"--the most exquisite solo number in the work,--followed by an
effective chorale ("In Remembrance everlasting"). Then follows "The
Judgment of the Rejected," consisting of baritone solos and chorus,
closing the second part.

The third part celebrates the delights of the celestial city as pictured
in the apocalyptic vision of Saint John, and is in marked contrast to the
gloom and sombreness of the Requiem music, as well as the terrors of the
Judgment. It is bright, jubilant, and exultant throughout. The title of
the prelude is "New Heaven, New Earth." The baritone intones the
recitative ("And I saw the New Heaven"), which is followed by another
delightful sketch for the orchestra ("Celestial Jerusalem"),--a most
vivid and graphic picture of the subject it describes. The remaining
prominent numbers are the "Sanctus" chorus, the celestial chorus ("I am
Alpha and Omega"), and the final chorus ("Hosanna in Excelsis"), which
closes this remarkable work.

The weakest part of the oratorio is the "Requiem," which suffers from the
monotony of its divisions, especially when compared with the treatment of
requiems by the great composers who have made them a special study. As
compared with the "Redemption," however, it is more interesting, because
it is more melodious and less cumbered with recitative. It is also
peculiarly noticeable for the free manner in which the composer uses the
orchestra, and the skill with which the typical melodies are employed, as
compared with which the solitary "Redemption" motive seems weak and thin.
Both works are full of genuine religious sentiment, and taken together
cover almost the entire scope of human aspiration so far as it relates to
the other world. No composer has conceived a broader scheme for oratorio.
Though Gounod does not always reach the sublime and majestic heights of
the old masters in sacred music, yet the feeling manifested in these
works is never anything but religious; the hearer is always surrounded by
an atmosphere of devotion.




                                 HANDEL.


George Frederick Handel was born at Halle, in Lower Saxony, Feb. 23,
1685, and, like many another composer, revealed his musical promise at a
very early age, only to encounter parental opposition. His father
intended him to be a lawyer; but Nature had her way, and in spite of
domestic antagonism triumphed. The Duke of Saxe-Weissenfels recognized
his ability and overcame the father's determination. Handel began his
studies with Zachau, organist of the Halle cathedral. After the death of
his father, in 1697, he went to Hamburg, and for a time played in the
orchestra of the German opera. It was during his residence in that city
that he wrote his first opera, "Almira" (1705). In the following year he
went to Italy, where he remained several months under the patronage of
the Grand Duke of Florence. During the next two years he visited Venice,
Rome, and Naples, and wrote several operas and minor oratorios. In 1709
he returned to Germany, and the Elector of Hanover, subsequently George
I. of England, offered him the position of Capellmeister, which he
accepted upon the condition that he might visit England, having received
many invitations from that country. The next year he arrived in London
and brought out his opera of "Rinaldo," which proved a great success. At
the end of six months he was obliged to return to his position in
Hanover; but his English success made him impatient of the dulness of the
court. In 1712 he was in London again, little dreaming that the Elector
would soon follow him as king. Incensed with him for leaving Hanover, the
King at first refused to receive him; but some music which Handel
composed for an aquatic fête in his honor brought about the royal
reconciliation. In 1718 he accepted the position of chapel-master to the
Duke of Chandos, for whom he wrote the famous Chandos Te Deum and
Anthems, the serenata "Acis and Galatea," and "Esther," his first English
oratorio. In 1720 he was engaged as director of Italian opera by the
society of noblemen known as the Royal Academy of Music, and from that
time until 1740 his career was entirely of an operatic character. Opera
after opera came from his pen. Some were successful, others failed. At
first composer, then director, he finally became _impresario_, only to
find himself confronted with bitter rivalry, especially at the hands of
Buononcini and Porpora. Cabals were instituted against him. Unable to
contend with them alone, he formed a partnership with Heidegger,
proprietor of the King's Theatre, in 1729. It was broken in 1734, and he
took the management of Covent Garden. The Italian conspiracies against
him broke out afresh. He failed in his undertaking, and became a
bankrupt. In eight years he had lost $51,000 in Italian opera. Slanders
of all sorts were circulated against him, and his works were no longer
well received. In the midst of his adversity sickness overtook him,
ending with a partial stroke of paralysis. When sufficiently recovered,
he went to the Continent, where he remained for a few months. On his
return to London he brought out some new works, but they were not
favorably received. A few friends who had remained faithful to him
persuaded him to give a benefit concert, which was a great success. It
inspired him with fresh courage; but he did not again return to the
operatic world. Thenceforward he devoted himself to oratorio, in which he
made his name famous for all time. He himself said: "Sacred music is best
suited to a man descending in the vale of years." "Saul" and the colossal
"Israel in Egypt," written in 1740, head the list of his wonderful
oratorios. In 1741 he was invited to visit Ireland. He went there in
November, and many of his works were produced during the winter and
received with great enthusiasm. In April, 1742, his immortal "Messiah"
was brought out at Dublin. It was followed by "Samson," "Joseph,"
"Semele," "Belshazzar," and "Hercules," which were also successful; but
even in the midst of his oratorio work his rivals did not cease their
conspiracies against him, and in 1744 he was once more a bankrupt. For
over a year his pen was idle. In 1746 the "Occasional Oratorio" and
"Judas Maccabæus" appeared, and these were speedily followed by "Joshua,"
"Solomon," "Susanna," "Theodora," and "Jephtha." It was during the
composition of the last-named work that he was attacked with the illness
which finally proved fatal. He died April 14, 1759, and was buried in
Westminster Abbey. During the last few days of his life he was heard to
express the wish that he "might breathe his last on Good Friday, in hopes
of meeting his good God, his sweet Lord and Saviour, on the day of his
resurrection." The wish was granted him; for it was on Good Friday that
he passed away, leaving behind him a name and fame that will be cherished
so long as music retains its power over the human heart.




                            Israel in Egypt.


"Israel in Egypt," the fifth of the nineteen oratorios which Handel
composed in England, was written in 1738. The Exodus, which is now the
second part, was written between the 1st and the 11th of October, and was
superscribed, "Moses' Song, Exodus, Chap. xv., begun Oct. 1, 1738;" and
at the close was written, "Fine, Oct. 11, 1738." It is evident from this
that the work was at first written as a cantata, but that Handel on
reflection decided that the plagues of Egypt would not only be a good
subject, but would also prove a logical historical introduction to the
second part. Four days later he began the first part, and finished it on
the 1st of November,--the composition of the whole of this colossal work
thus occupying but twenty-seven days. It was first performed as "Israel
in Egypt," April 4, 1739, at the King's Theatre, of which Handel was then
manager. It was given the second time April 11, "with alterations and
additions," the alterations having been made in order to admit of the
introduction of songs. The third performance took place April 17, upon
which occasion the "Funeral Anthem," which he had written for Queen
Caroline, was used as a first part and entitled, "Lamentations of the
Israelites for the Death of Joseph." During the lifetime of Handel the
oratorio was only performed nine times, for in spite of its excellence,
it was a failure. For many years after his death it was produced in
mutilated form; but in 1849 the Sacred Harmonic Society of London gave it
as it was originally written and as we know it now, without the Funeral
Anthem or any of the songs which had been introduced.

The text of the oratorio is supposed to have been written by Handel
himself, though the words are taken literally from the Bible. Schoelcher
says:

  "The manuscript does not contain any of the names of the personages.
  Nevertheless, the handbook, which includes the extracts from Solomon
  for the first parts, has in this part the names of personages (High
  Priest, Joseph, Israelite woman, Israelite man), as if the composer
  wished to throw it into a dramatic form. The words in their Biblical
  simplicity form a poem eminently dramatic."

The first part opens with the wail of the Israelites over the burdens
imposed upon them by their Egyptian taskmasters, and then in rapid
succession follow the plagues,--the water of the Nile turned to blood,
the reptiles swarming even into the king's chambers, the pestilence
scourging man and beast, the insect-cloud heralding the locusts, the
pelting hail and the fire running along the ground, the thick darkness,
and the smiting of the first-born. Then come the passage of the Red Sea
and the escape from bondage, closing the first part. The second part
opens with the triumphant song of Moses and the Children of Israel
rejoicing over the destruction of Pharaoh's host, and closes with the
exultant strain of Miriam the prophetess, "Sing ye to the Lord, for He
hath triumphed gloriously; the Horse and his Rider hath He thrown into
the Sea."

"Israel in Egypt" is essentially a choral oratorio. It comprises no less
than twenty-eight massive double choruses, linked together by a few bars
of recitative, with five arias and three duets interspersed among them.
Unlike Handel's other oratorios, there is no overture or even prelude to
the work. Six bars of recitative for tenor ("Now there arose a new King
over Egypt which knew not Joseph") suffice to introduce it, and lead
directly to the first double chorus ("And the Children of Israel
sighed"), the theme of which is first given out by the altos of one choir
with impressive pathos. The chorus works up to a climax of great force on
the phrase, "And their Cry came up unto God," the two choruses developing
with consummate power the two principal subjects,--first, the cry for
relief, and second, the burden of oppression; and closing with the phrase
above mentioned, upon which they unite in simple but majestic harmony.
Then follow eight more bars of recitative for tenor, and the long series
of descriptive choruses begins, in which Handel employs the imitative
power of music in the boldest manner. The first is the plague of the
water turned to blood, "They loathed to drink of the River,"--a single
chorus in fugue form, based upon a theme which is closely suggestive of
the sickening sensations of the Egyptians, and increases in loathsomeness
to the close, as the theme is variously treated. The next number is an
aria for mezzo soprano voice ("Their Land brought forth Frogs"), the air
itself serious and dignified, but the accompaniment imitative throughout
of the hopping of these lively animals. It is followed by the plague of
insects, whose afflictions are described by the double chorus. The tenors
and basses in powerful unison declare, "He spake the Word," and the reply
comes at once from the sopranos and altos, "And there came all Manner of
Flies," set to a shrill, buzzing, whirring accompaniment, which increases
in volume and energy as the locusts appear, but bound together solidly
with the phrase of the tenors and basses frequently repeated, and
presenting a sonorous background to this fancy of the composer in insect
imitation. From this remarkable chorus we pass to another still more
remarkable, the familiar Hailstone Chorus ("He gave them Hailstones for
Rain"), which, like the former, is closely imitative. Before the two
choirs begin, the orchestra prepares the way for the on-coming storm.
Drop by drop, spattering, dashing, and at last crashing, comes the storm,
the gathering gloom rent with the lightning, the "fire that ran along
upon the ground," and the music fairly quivering and crackling with the
wrath of the elements. But the storm passes, the gloom deepens, and we
are lost in that vague, uncertain combination of tones where voices and
instruments seem to be groping about, comprised in the marvellously
expressive chorus, "He sent a Thick Darkness over all the Land." From the
oppression of this choral gloom we emerge, only to encounter a chorus of
savage, unrelenting retribution ("He smote all the First-born of Egypt").
Chorley admirably describes the motive of this great fugue:--

  "It is fiercely Jewish. There is a touch of Judith, of Jael, of Deborah
  in it,--no quarter, no delay, no mercy for the enemies of the Most
  High; 'He smote.' And when for variety's sake the scimitar-phrase is
  transferred from orchestra to voices, it is admirable to see how the
  same character of the falchion--of hip-and-thigh warfare, of victory
  predominant--is sustained in the music till the last bar. If we have
  from Handel a scorn-chorus in the 'Messiah,' and here a disgust-chorus,
  referred to a little while since,[3] this is the execution, or revenge
  chorus,--the chorus of the unflinching, inflexible, commissioned Angels
  of the Sword."

After their savage mission is accomplished, we come to a chorus in
pastoral style ("But as for His People, He led them forth like Sheep"),
slow, tender, serene, and lovely in its movement, and grateful to the ear
both in its quiet opening and animated, happy close, after the terrors
which have preceded it. The following chorus ("Egypt was glad"), usually
omitted in performance, is a fugue, both strange and intricate, which it
is claimed Handel appropriated from an Italian canzonet by Kerl. The next
two numbers are really one. The two choruses intone the words, "He
rebuked the Red Sea," in a majestic manner, accompanied by a few massive
chords, and then pass to the glorious march of the Israelites, "He led
them through the Deep,"--a very elaborate and complicated number, but
strong, forcible, and harmonious throughout, and held together by the
stately opening theme with which the basses ascend. It is succeeded by
another graphic chorus ("But the Waters overwhelmed their Enemies"), in
which the roll and dash of the billows closing over Pharaoh's hosts are
closely imitated by the instruments, and through which in the close is
heard the victorious shout of the Israelites, "There was not one of them
left." Two more short choruses,--the first, "And Israel saw that Great
Work," which by many critics is not believed to be a pure Handel number,
and its continuation, "And believed the Lord," written in church style,
close this extraordinary chain of choral pictures.

The second part, "The Song of Moses,"--which, it will be remembered, was
written first,--opens with a brief but forcible orchestral prelude,
leading directly to the declaration by the chorus, "Moses and the
Children of Israel sang this Song," which, taken together with the
instrumental prelude, serves as a stately introduction to the stupendous
fugued chorus which follows ("I will sing unto the Lord, for He hath
triumphed gloriously; the Horse and his Rider hath He thrown into the
Sea"). It is followed by a duet for two sopranos ("The Lord is my
Strength and my Song") in the minor key,--an intricate but melodious
number, usually omitted. Once more the chorus resumes with a brief
announcement, "He is my God," followed by a fugued movement in the old
church style ("And I will exalt Him"). Next follows the great duet for
two basses, "The Lord is a Man of War,"--a piece of superb declamatory
effect, full of vigor and stately assertion. The triumphant announcement
in its closing measures, "His chosen Captains also are drowned in the Red
Sea," is answered by a brief chorus, "The Depths have covered them,"
which is followed by four choruses of triumph,--"Thy Right Hand, O Lord,"
an elaborate and brilliant number; "And in the Greatness of Thine
Excellency," a brief but powerful bit; "Thou sendest forth Thy Wrath;"
and the single chorus, "And with the Blast of Thy Nostrils," in the last
two of which Handel again returns to the imitative style with wonderful
effect, especially in the declaration of the basses, "The Floods stood
upright as an Heap, and the Depths were congealed." The only tenor aria
in the oratorio follows these choruses, a bravura song, "The Enemy said,
I will pursue," and this is followed by the only soprano aria, "Thou
didst blow with the Wind." Two short double choruses ("Who is like unto
Thee, O Lord," and "The Earth swallowed them") lead to the duet for
contralto and tenor, "Thou in Thy Mercy," which is in the minor, and very
pathetic in character. It is followed by the massive and extremely
difficult chorus, "The People shall hear and be afraid." Once more, after
this majestic display, comes the solo voice, this time the contralto, in
a simple, lovely song, "Thou shalt bring them in." A short double chorus
("The Lord shall reign for ever and ever"), a few bars of recitative
referring to the escape of Israel, the choral outburst once more
repeated, and then the solo voice declaring, "Miriam the prophetess took
a timbrel in her hand, and all the women went out after her with timbrels
and with dances; and Miriam answered them," lead to the final song of
triumph,--that grand, jubilant, overpowering expression of victory which,
beginning with the exultant strain of Miriam, "Sing ye to the Lord, for
He hath triumphed gloriously," is amplified by voice upon voice in the
great eight-part choir, and by instrument upon instrument, until it
becomes a tempest of harmony, interwoven with the triumph of Miriam's cry
and the exultation of the great host over the enemy's discomfiture, and
closing with the combined power of voices and instruments in harmonious
accord as they once more repeat Miriam's words, "The Horse and his Rider
hath He thrown into the Sea."

[3] The second chorus, "The Plague of the Water turned to Blood," and the
  loathing of the Egyptians.




                                  Saul.


The oratorio of "Saul" was written by Handel in 1738. He began it, says
Schoelcher, on the 3d of July, and finished it on the 27th of September;
thus occupying eighty-six days. This, however, is evidently an error, as
Rockstro says: "The score, written in a thick quarto volume, on paper
quite different from that used for the operas, is dated at the beginning
of the first chorus, July 23, 1738." The next date is August 28, at the
end of the second part, and the last, at the end of the work, September
27,--which would give two months and four days as the time in which it
was written. But even this period, short as it is, seems brief when
compared with that devoted to the composition of "Israel in Egypt," which
Handel began four days after "Saul" was completed, and finished in
twenty-seven days.

It has already been said, in the analysis of the last named-work, that in
January, 1739, Handel took the King's Theatre in the Haymarket, his
purpose being to give oratorios twice a week. "Saul" was the first of the
series; and in this connection the following advertisement, which
Schoelcher reprints from the London "Daily Post" of Jan. 3, 1739, will be
of interest:--

  "We hear that on Tuesday se'en night the King's Theatre will be opened
  with a new oratorio composed by Mr. Handel, called 'Saul.' The pit and
  boxes will be put together, the tickets delivered on Monday the 15th
  and Tuesday 16th (the day of performance), at half a guinea each.
  Gallery 5_s._ The gallery will be opened at 4; the pit and boxes at 5.
  To begin at 6."

The first performance took place as announced, and the second on the 23d,
"with several new concertos on the organ,"--which instrument also plays a
conspicuous part in the oratorio itself, not only in amplifying the
accompaniment, but also in solo work. In 1740 it was performed by the
Academy of Ancient Music in London, and in 1742 in Dublin. Selections
were also given from it in the great Handel Commemoration at Westminster
Abbey in 1784, and in 1840 it was revived by the Sacred Harmonic Society
of London, since which time it has occupied an important place in the
oratorio repertory.

The story closely follows the Biblical narrative of the relations between
David and Saul. The words have been attributed both to Jennens and
Marell; but the balance of evidence favors the former,--a poet who lived
at Gopsall. The overture, marked "Symfonie" in the original manuscript,
is the longest of all the Handel introductions. It is in four movements,
the first an allegro, the second a largo (in which the organ is used as a
solo instrument), the third an allegro, and the fourth a minuetto. It is
an exceedingly graceful and delicate prelude, and makes a fitting
introduction to the dramatic story which follows. The characters
introduced are Saul, king of Israel; Jonathan, his son; Abner, captain of
the host; David; the apparition of Samuel; Doeg, a messenger; an
Amalekite; Abiathar, Merab, and Michal, daughters of Saul; the Witch of
Endor; and the Israelites. The very dramatic character of the narrative
admirably adapts it to its division into acts and scenes.

The first act is triumphant in its tone and expressive of the exultation
of the Israelites at their victory over the Philistines. The second gives
a story of the passions,--Saul's jealousy of David, the love of Michal,
and the ardent friendship between David and Jonathan. The last act is
sombre in its character, opening with the weird incantations of the
Witch, and closing with David's grief over Saul and Jonathan.

The first scene opens in the Israelitish camp by the valley of Elah,
where the people join in an Epinicion, or Song of Triumph, over Goliah
and the Philistines. It is made up of a chorus ("How excellent Thy Name,
O Lord"), which is a stirring tribute of praise; an aria ("An Infant
raised by Thy Command"), describing the meeting of David and Goliah; a
trio, in which the Giant is pictured as the "monster atheist," striding
along to the vigorous and expressive music; and three closing choruses
("The Youth inspired by Thee," "How excellent Thy Name," and a jubilant
"Hallelujah"), ending in plain but massive harmony.

The second scene is in Saul's tent. Two bars of recitative prelude an
aria by Michal, Saul's daughter, who reveals her love for David ("O
godlike Youth!"). Abner presents David to Saul, and a dialogue ensues
between them, in which the conqueror announces his origin and Saul pleads
with him to remain, offering the hand of his daughter Merab as an
inducement. David (whose part is sung by a contralto) replies in a
beautiful aria, in which he attributes his success to the help of the
Lord alone. In the next four numbers the friendship of Jonathan and David
is cemented, which is followed by a three-verse hymn ("While yet thy Tide
of Blood runs high"), of a very stately character, sung by the High
Priest. In a few bars of recitative Saul betroths his daughter Merab to
David; but the girl replies in a very powerful aria ("My Soul rejects the
Thought with Scorn"), in which she declares her intention of frustrating
the scheme to unite a plebeian with the royal line. It is followed by a
plaintive but vigorous aria ("See with what a scornful Air"), sung by
Michal, who again gives expression to her love for David.

The next scene is entitled "Before an Israelitish City," and is prefaced
with a short symphony of a jubilant character. A brief recitative
introduces the maidens of the land singing and dancing in praise of the
victor, leading up to one of Handel's finest choruses, "Welcome, welcome,
Mighty King,"--a fresh, vigorous semi-chorus accompanied by the
carillons, in which Saul's jealousy is aroused by the superiority of
prowess attributed to David. It is followed by a furious aria, "With Rage
I shall burst, his Praises to hear." Jonathan laments the imprudence of
the women in making comparisons, and Michal suggests to David that it is
an old malady which may be assuaged by music, and in the aria, "Fell Rage
and black Despair passest," expresses her belief that the monarch can be
cured by David's "persuasive lyre."

The next scene is in the King's house. David sings an aria ("O Lord,
whose Mercies numberless"), followed by a harp solo; but it is in vain.
Jonathan is in despair, and Saul, in an aria ("A Serpent in my Bosom
warmed"), gives vent to his fury and hurls his javelin at David. The
latter escapes; and in furious recitative Saul charges his son to destroy
him. The next number is an aria for Merab ("Capricious Man, in Humor
lost"), lamenting Saul's temper; and Jonathan follows with a very
dramatic recitative and aria, in which he refuses to obey his father's
behest. The High Priest appeals to Heaven ("O Lord, whose Providence") to
protect David, and the first part closes with a powerful chorus,
"Preserve him for the Glory of Thy Name."

The second act is laid in the palace, and opens with a powerfully
descriptive chorus ("Envy, Eldest-born of Hell!"). In a noble song ("But
sooner Jordan's Stream, I swear") Jonathan assures David he will never
injure him. In a colloquy between them, David is informed that Saul has
bestowed the hand of the haughty Merab on Adriel, and Jonathan pleads the
cause of the lovely Michal. Saul approaches, and David retires. Saul
inquires of Jonathan whether he has obeyed his commands, and in a simple,
sweet, and flowing melody ("Sin not, O King, against the Youth") he seems
to overcome the wrath of the monarch, who dissembles and welcomes David,
bidding him to repel the insults of the Philistines, and offering him his
daughter Michal as a proof of his sincerity.

In the second scene Michal declares her love for David, and they join in
a rapturous duet ("O fairest of ten thousand fair"), which is followed by
a chorus in simple harmony ("Is there a Man who all his Ways"). A long
symphony follows, preparing the way for the attempt on David's life.
After an agitated duet with Michal ("At Persecution I can laugh"), David
makes his escape just as Doeg, the messenger, enters with instructions to
bring David to the King's chamber. He is shown the image in David's bed,
which he says will only enrage the King still more. Michal sings an
exultant aria, "No, let the Guilty tremble," and even Merab, won over by
David's qualities, pleads for him in a beautiful aria, "Author of peace."
Another symphony intervenes, preluding the celebration of the feast of
the new moon in the palace, to which David has been invited. Jonathan
again interposes with an effort to save David's life, whereupon Saul, in
a fresh outburst of indignation, hurls his javelin at his son, and the
chorus bursts out in horror, "Oh, fatal Consequence of Rage."

The third act opens with the intensely dramatic scene with the Witch of
Endor, the interview being preluded by the powerful recitative, "Wretch
that I am!" The second scene is laid in the Witch's abode, where the
incantation is practised that brings up the Apparition of Samuel. The
whole scene is very dramatic, and the instrumentation powerful, although
the effect, vigorous as it is, is made simply by oboes, bassoons, and
strings, instead of by the brass instruments which other composers employ
so vigorously in similar scenes. This scene closes with an elegy
foreboding the coming tragedy.

The third scene opens with the interview between David and the Amalekite
who brings the tidings of the death of Saul and Jonathan. It is followed
by that magnificent dirge, the "Dead March," whose simple yet solemn and
majestic strains are familiar to every one. The trumpets and trombones
with their sonorous pomp and the wailing oboes and clarinets make an
instrumental pageant which is the very apotheosis of grief. The effect of
the march is all the more remarkable when it is considered that, in
contradistinction to all other dirges, it is written in the major key.
The chorus, "Mourn, Israel, mourn thy Beauty lost," and the three arias
of lament sung by David, which follow, are all characterized by feelings
of the deepest gloom. A short chorus ("Eagles were not so swift as they")
follows, and then David gives voice to his lament over Jonathan in an
aria of exquisite tenderness ("In sweetest Harmony they lived"), at the
close of which he joins with the chorus in an obligato of sorrowful
grandeur ("O fatal Day, how low the Mighty lie!"). In an exultant strain
Abner bids the "Men of Judah weep no more," and the animated martial
chorus, "Gird on thy Sword, thou Man of Might," closes this great
dramatic oratorio.




                                 Samson.


The oratorio of "Samson" was written in 1741, and begun immediately after
the completion of "The Messiah," which was finished September 14 of that
year. The last chorus was dated October 29; but in the following year
Handel added to it "Let the bright Seraphim" and the chorus, "Let their
celestial Concerts." The text was compiled by Newburgh Hamilton from
Milton's "Samson Agonistes," "Hymn on the Nativity," and "Lines on a
Solemn Musick." The oratorio was first sung at Covent Garden, Feb. 18,
1743, the principal parts being assigned as follows: Samson, Mr.
Beard;[4] Manoah, Mr. Savage; Micah, Mrs. Cibber; Delilah, Mrs. Clive.
The aria, "Let the bright Seraphim," was sung by Signora Avolio, for whom
it was written, and the trumpet obligato was played by Valentine Snow, a
virtuoso of that period. The performance of "Samson" was thus announced
in the London "Daily Advertiser" of Feb. 17, 1743:--

  "By subscription. At the Theatre Royal in Covent Garden, to-morrow, the
  18th inst., will be performed a new oratorio, called _Sampson_. Tickets
  will be delivered to subscribers (on paying their subscription money)
  at Mr. Handel's house in Brooke Street, Hanover Square. Attendance will
  be given from nine o'clock in the morning till three in the afternoon.
  Pit and boxes to be put together, and no person to be admitted without
  tickets, which will be delivered that day at the office in Covent
  Garden Theatre at half a guinea each; first gallery 5_s._; upper
  gallery, 3_s._ 6_d._"

The representation was greeted with extraordinary enthusiasm, and
"Samson" soon became so popular that many had to be turned away;
notwithstanding which, the ill-natured Horace Walpole could write, in a
letter dated Feb. 24, 1743:--

  "Handel has set up an oratorio against the opera, and succeeds. He has
  hired all the goddesses from the farces, and the singers of roast beef
  from between the acts at both theatres, with a man with one note in his
  voice, and a girl without ever an one; and so they sing and make brave
  hallelujahs, and the good company encore the recitative if it happens
  to have any cadence like what they call a tune."

The text, as we have said, was adapted from Milton by Hamilton, who says
in his preface to the handbook, or libretto:--

  "That poem indeed was never divided by Milton into acts or scenes, nor
  designed for the stage, but given only as the plan of a tragedy with
  choruses, after the manner of the ancients. But as Mr. Handel had so
  happily introduced here oratorios, a musical drama, whose subject must
  be scriptural, and in which the solemnity of church music is agreeably
  united with the most pleasing airs of the stage, it would have been an
  irretrievable loss to have neglected the opportunity of that great
  master's doing justice to this work; he having already added new life
  and spirit to some of the finest things in the English language,
  particularly that inimitable ode[5] of Dryden's which no age nor nation
  ever excelled."

The characters introduced are Samson; Micah, his friend; Manoah, his
father; Delilah, his wife; Harapha, a giant of Gath; Israelitish woman;
priests of Dagon; virgins attendant upon Delilah; Israelites, friends of
Samson; Israelitish virgins; and Philistines. After a brilliant overture,
closing, like that to "Saul," with a minuet movement, the scene opens
before the prison in Gaza, with Samson blind and in chains. His opening
recitative, setting forth his release from toil on account of the feast
to Dagon, introduces a brilliant and effective chorus by the priests with
trumpets ("Awake the Trumpet's lofty Sound"), after which a Philistine
woman in a bright, playful melody invites the men of Gaza to bring "The
merry Pipe and pleasing String;" whereupon the trumpet chorus is
repeated. After the tenor aria ("Loud is the Thunder's awful Voice"), the
chorus recurs again, showing Handel's evident partiality for it. The
Philistine Woman has another solo ("Then free from Sorrow"), whereupon in
a pathetic song ("Torments, alas!") Samson bewails his piteous condition.
His friend Micah appears, and in the aria, "O Mirror of our fickle
State," condoles with him. In answer to his question, "Which shall we
first bewail, thy Bondage, or lost Sight?" Samson replies in a short, but
exquisitely tender aria, "Total Eclipse: no Sun, no Moon, all dark amidst
the Blaze of Noon,"--a song which brought tears to the eyes of the blind
Handel himself when he listened to it long afterwards. The next chorus
("O first-created Beam") is of more than ordinary interest, as it treats
the same subject which Haydn afterwards used in "The Creation." It begins
in a soft and quiet manner, in ordinary time, develops into a strong
allegro on the words, "Let there be Light," and closes with a spirited
fugue on the words, "To Thy dark Servant Life by Light afford." A
dialogue follows between Manoah and Micah, leading up to an intricate
bravura aria for bass ("Thy glorious Deeds inspired my Tongue"), closing
with an exquisite slow movement in broad contrast to its first part.
Though comforted by his friends, Samson breaks out in furious
denunciation of his enemies in the powerfully dramatic aria, "Why does
the God of Israel sleep?" It is followed up in the same spirit by the
chorus, "Then shall they know,"--a fugue on two vigorous subjects, the
first given out by the altos, and the second by the tenors. Samson's
wrath subsides in the recitative, "My genial Spirits droop," and the
first act closes with the beautifully constructed chorus, "Then round
about the starry Throne," in which his friends console him with the joys
he will find in another life.

The second act, after a brief recitative, opens with an aria by Manoah
("Just are the Ways of God to Man"), in which he conjures Samson to
repose his trust in God. It is followed by the beautiful prayer of Micah
("Return, return, O God of Hosts"), emphasized by the chorus to which it
leads ("To Dust his Glory they would tread"), with which the prayer is
interwoven in obligato form. From this point, as Delilah appears, the
music is full of bright color, and loses it sombre tone. In a short
recitative, she excuses her misdeed, and then breaks out in an aria of
sensuous sweetness, "With plaintive Notes and am'rous Moan, thus coos the
Turtle left alone." Its bewitching grace, however, makes little
impression upon Samson, who replies with the aria, "Your Charms to Ruin
led the Way." In another enticing melody, "My Faith and Truth, O Samson,
prove," she seeks to induce his return to her house, and a chorus of
Virgins add their entreaties. A last effort is made in the tasteful and
elegant aria, "To fleeting Pleasures make your Court;" but when that also
fails, Delilah reveals her true self. Samson rebukes her "warbling
charms," her "trains and wiles," and counts "this prison-house the house
of liberty to thine;" whereupon a highly characteristic duet ensues
("Traitor to Love"). An aria for Micah follows ("It is nor Virtue, Valor,
Wit"), leading up to a powerful dissertation on masculine supremacy in a
fugued chorus which is treated in a spirited manner, and in which we may
well fancy that the woman-hating composer gave free rein to his spite:--

      "To man God's universal law
      Gave power to keep his wife in awe.
      Thus shall his life be ne'er dismayed,
      By female usurpation swayed."

The giant Harapha now appears, and mocks Samson with the taunt that had
he met him before he was blind, he would have left him dead on the field
of death, "where thou wrought'st wonders with an ass' jaw." His first
number ("Honor and Arms scorn such a Foe") is one of the most spirited
and dashing bass solos ever written. Samson replies with the majestic
aria, "My Strength is from the living God." The two solos reach their
climax in the energetic duet between the giants, "Go, baffled Coward,
go." Micah then suggests to Harapha that he shall call upon Dagon to
dissolve "those magic spells that gave our hero strength," as a test of
his power. The recitative is followed by an impressive six-part chorus
("Hear, Jacob's God") in the true church style. Its smooth, quiet flow of
harmony is refreshing as compared with the tumult of the giants' music
which precedes, and the sensuousness of the chorus ("To Song and Dance we
give the Day") which follows it. The act closes with the massive double
chorus ("Fixed in His everlasting Seat") in which the Israelites and
Philistines celebrate the attributes of their respective deities and
invoke their protection, and in which also the composer brings out with
overwhelming effect the majesty and grandeur of God as compared with the
nothingness of Dagon.

The third act opens with a dialogue in which Harapha brings the message
to Samson that he must repair to the feast of Dagon to delight the
Philistines with some of his feats of strength. Upon Samson's refusal,
Harapha sings the threatening aria, "Presuming Slave!" The Israelites
invoke the protection of God in the spirited chorus, "With Thunder
armed," closing with a prayer which changes to wild and supplicating
entreaty. Samson at last yields in a tender, pathetic aria ("Thus when
the Sun"), which seems to anticipate his fate. In a song of solemn
parting ("The Holy One of Israel be thy Guide"), accompanied by the
chorus ("To Fame immortal go"), his friends bid him farewell. The
festivities begin, and in an exultant chorus ("Great Dagon has subdued
our Foe") the Philistines are heard exulting over Samson's discomfiture.
Micah and Manoah, hearing the sounds, are filled with anxiety, and the
latter expresses his solicitude in the tender aria, "How willing my
paternal Love." But the scene suddenly changes. In a short, crashing
presto the coming destruction is anticipated. The trembling Israelites
express their alarm in the chorus, "Hear us, our God," and appeal to
Heaven for protection. A Messenger rushes upon the scene and announces
that Samson is dead and has involved the destruction of his enemies in
the general calamity. Micah gives expression to his grief in the touching
aria, "Ye Sons of Israel, now lament," followed by the Israelites in a
sorrowful wail, "Weep, Israel, weep." A funeral march, in the major key,
intervenes, full of tender expression of sorrow,--for which, after the
first two representations Handel substituted the Dead March from "Saul;"
and both marches are now printed in the scores for general use. As at
first written, the oratorio closed with the effective chorus and solo,
"Bring the Laurels;" but, as has been already said, a year afterwards
Handel made a different ending. Manoah calls upon the people to cease
their lamentation, and the funeral pageant is followed by the magnificent
trumpet aria, "Let the bright Seraphim,"--a song worthy only of the
greatest artists, both with voice and instrument,--and the equally
magnificent chorus, "Let their celestial Concerts," which closes the
great oratorio with triumphant exultation.

[4] "John Beard, a quondam chorister of the Chapel Royal, under Bernard
  Gates, and afterwards the greatest English tenor singer of his day,
  achieved one of his brightest triumphs in the part of Samson. His
  history was romantic. In 1732 he married the Lady Henrietta, daughter
  of James, Earl of Waldegrave, and widow of Lord Edward Herbert, second
  son of the Marquis of Powis. In 1759 he took as his second wife
  Charlotte, daughter of John Rich, the harlequin."--_Rockstro._

[5] Alexander's Feast; or, the Power of Music.




                              The Messiah.


The "Messiah" represents the ripened product of Handel's genius, and
reflects the noblest aspirations and most exalted devotion of mankind.
Among all his oratorios it retains its original freshness, vigor, and
beauty in the highest degree, in that it appeals to the loftiest
sentiment and to universal religious devotion, and is based upon the most
harmonious, symmetrical, and enduring forms of the art.

It was begun on the 22d day of August, 1741. The first part was concluded
August 28, the second, September 6, the third, September 12, and the
instrumentation, September 14. It is an illustration of Handel's almost
superhuman capacity for work, that at the age of fifty-six he should have
written his masterpiece in twenty-three days. The text was taken from the
literal words of Scripture, and the libretto arranged by Charles Jennens,
who, singularly enough, was not satisfied with the music which has
satisfied the world. In a letter written at that time, he says:--

  "I shall show you a collection I gave Handel, called 'Messiah,' which I
  value highly. He has made a fine entertainment of it, though not near
  so good as he might and ought to have done. I have with great
  difficulty made him correct some of the grossest faults in the
  composition; but he retained his overture obstinately, in which there
  are some passages far unworthy of Handel, but much more unworthy of the
  'Messiah.'"

For two or three years prior to the appearance of the "Messiah," Handel
had been harassed by cabals set on foot by rival opera-managers in
London, who, by importing Italian singers, drew off the patronage of the
nobility, and ultimately succeeded in reducing him to the condition of an
insolvent debtor. While in this wretched plight an invitation came to him
from the Duke of Devonshire, then Lord Lieutenant of Ireland, to visit
Dublin. He eagerly accepted it, and in the correspondence which passed
between them promised to contribute a portion of whatever might accrue
from his music to charitable institutions, and also agreed to give an
oratorio "for the benefit and enlargement of poor distressed prisoners
for debt in the several marshalseas of the city of Dublin." He left
London early in November, arriving in that city, after many delays, on
the 18th. On the 23d of December he began a series of six musical
entertainments, which was completed February 10. His success was so great
that he was induced to begin a second series February 17, a fortnight
before the close of which appeared the following advertisement:--

  "For the Relief of the Prisoners in the several Gaols, and for the
  Support of Mercer's Hospital, in Stephen's Street, and of the
  Charitable Infirmary on the Inn's Quay, on Monday, the 12th of April,
  will be performed at the Musick Hall in Fishamble-street, _Mr.
  Handel's_ new Grand _Oratorio, called the Messiah_, in which the
  Gentlemen of the Choirs of both Cathedrals will assist, with some
  Concertos on the Organ by Mr. Handel."

The first rehearsal took place on the 8th of April, in the presence of "a
most Grand, Polite, and Crowded Audience," as we are informed by
"Faulkner's Journal." The same paper, referring to the first public
performance, which took place on Tuesday, April 13, 1742, says:--

  "At the desire of several persons of distinction, the above performance
  is put off to Tuesday next. The doors will be opened at eleven, and the
  performance begins at twelve. Many ladies and gentlemen who are
  well-wishers to this noble and grand charity, for which this oratorio
  was composed, request it as a favor that the ladies who honor this
  performance with their presence would be pleased to come without hoops,
  as it would greatly increase the charity by making room for more
  company."

Gentlemen were also requested to come without their swords. "In this
way," it is said, "the stewards" were able to seat seven hundred persons
in the room instead of six hundred. The principal parts in the
performance were assigned to Signora Avolio, Mrs. Cibber, and Messrs.
Church and Ralph Roseingrane; and Mrs. Cibber's delivery of the aria "He
was despised" is said to have been so touching that Dr. Delany, the
companion of Swift, exclaimed, as she closed: "Woman, for this be all thy
sins forgiven."

The "Messiah" was performed thirty-four times during the composer's life,
but never upon a scale commensurate with its merits until the Handel
Commemoration at Westminster Abbey in 1784, when the largest choir and
band that had ever assembled before, with the renowned Madame Mara at the
head of the soloists, first gave the "Messiah" to the world in accordance
with the grand ideal of the composer. The orchestra was composed as
follows: First violins, 40; second violins, 47; tenors, 26; first oboes,
13; second oboes, 13; flutes, 6; violoncellos, 21; double-basses, 15;
bassoons, 26; double-bassoon, 1; trumpets, 12; trombones, 6; horns, 12;
kettledrums, 3; double-kettledrum, 1: total, 242. The choir was made up
as follows: Sopranos, 60, of whom 45 were choir-boys; counter-tenors
(altos), 40; tenors, 83; basses, 84: making the entire number of singers
267. Of the performance of the band upon this occasion, Burney quaintly
says:--

  "Dante in his _Paradiso_ imagines nine circles, or choirs, of cherubs,
  seraphs, patriarchs, prophets, martyrs, saints, angels, and archangels,
  who with hand and voice are eternally praising and glorifying the
  Supreme Being, whom he places in the centre, taking the idea from _Te
  Deum laudamus_, where it is said: 'To Thee Cherubim and Seraphim
  continually do cry,' etc. Now, as the orchestra in Westminster Abbey
  seemed to ascend into the clouds and unite with the saints and martyrs
  represented on the painted glass in the west window, which had all the
  appearance of a continuation of the Orchestra, I could hardly refrain,
  during the performance of the Allelujah, to imagine that this
  Orchestra, so admirably constructed, filled, and employed, was a point
  or segment of one of these celestial circles. And perhaps no band of
  mortal musicians ever exhibited a more respectable appearance to the
  eye, or afforded a more ecstatic and affecting sound to the ear, than
  this."

He is equally enthusiastic over the chorus; and of Madame Mara's singing
of the aria, "I know that my Redeemer liveth," he says:--

  "Her power over the sensibility of the audience seemed equal to that of
  Mrs. Siddons. There was no eye within my view which did not 'silently a
  gentle tear let fall,' nor, though long hackneyed in music, did I find
  myself made of stronger earth than others."

The oratorio is divided into three parts. The first illustrates the
longing of the world for the Messiah, prophesies his coming, and
announces his birth; the second part is devoted to the sufferings, death,
and exaltation of Christ, and develops the spread and ultimate triumph of
the Gospel; while the third is occupied with the declaration of the
highest truths of doctrine,--faith in the existence of God, the surety of
immortal life, the resurrection, and the attainment of an eternity of
happiness.

The first part opens with an overture, or rather orchestral prelude, of
majestic chords, leading to a short fugue, developed with severe
simplicity and preparing the way for the accompanied recitative, "Comfort
ye My People," and the aria for tenor, "Every Valley shall be exalted,"
which in turn leads to the full, strong chorus, "And the Glory of the
Lord shall be revealed,"--the three numbers in reality forming one. The
prophecy is announced, only to be followed by the human apprehension in
the great aria for bass ("But who may abide the Day of His coming"),
written in the Sicilian pastoral style,--a form of which, Burney affirms,
Handel was very fond. The aria leads to the exquisitely constructed
number, "And He shall purify," a fugued chorus closing in simple harmony.
Once more the prophet announces, "Behold, a Virgin shall conceive,"
followed by the alto solo, "O Thou that tellest," which preludes a chorus
in the same tempo. The next aria ("The People that walked in Darkness"),
with its curious but characteristic modulations, leads to one of the most
graphic fugued choruses in the whole work ("For unto us a Child is
born"), elegantly interwoven with the violin parts, and emphasized with
sublime announcements of the names of the Messiah in full harmony and
with the strongest choral power. The grand burst of sound dies away,
there is a significant pause, and then follows a short but exquisite
Pastoral Symphony for the strings, which with the four succeeding bits of
recitative tells the message of the Angels to the Shepherds on the plains
of Bethlehem. Suddenly follows the chorus of the heavenly hosts ("Glory
to God"), which is remarkably expressive, and affords sharp contrasts in
the successive clear responses to the fugue. The difficult but very
brilliant aria for soprano, "Rejoice greatly," the lovely aria, "He shall
feed His Flock," originally written entire for soprano, in which Handel
returns again to the pastoral style, and a short chorus ("His Yoke is
easy"), close the first part.

The second part is the most impressive portion of the work. It begins
with a majestic and solemn chorus ("Behold the Lamb of God"), which is
followed by the aria for alto, "He was despised,"--one of the most
pathetic and deeply expressive songs ever written, in which the very
key-note of sorrow is struck. Two choruses--"Surely He hath borne our
Griefs," rather intricate in harmony, and "With His Stripes we are
healed," a fugued chorus written _a capella_ upon an admirable
subject--lead to the spirited and thoroughly interesting chorus, "All we
like Sheep have gone astray," closing with an adagio of great beauty
("And the Lord hath laid on Him the Iniquity of us all"). This is
followed by several short numbers,--a choral fugue ("He trusted in God"),
the accompanied recitative ("Thy Rebuke hath broken His Heart"), a short
but very pathetic aria for tenor ("Behold and see if there be any
Sorrow"), and an aria for soprano ("But Thou didst not leave His Soul in
Hell"),--all of which are remarkable instances of the musical expression
of sorrow and pity. These numbers lead to a triumphal shout in the chorus
and semi-choruses, "Lift up your Heads, O ye Gates," which reach a climax
of magnificent power and strongly contrasted effects. After the chorus,
"Let all the Angels of God worship Him," a fugue constructed upon two
subjects, the aria, "Thou art gone up on high," and the chorus, "The Lord
gave the Word," we reach another pastoral aria of great beauty, "How
beautiful are the Feet." This is followed by a powerfully descriptive
chorus ("Their Sound is gone out into all Lands"), a massive aria for
bass ("Why do the Nations"), the chorus, "Let us break their Bonds
asunder," and the aria, "Thou shalt break them," leading directly to the
great Hallelujah Chorus, which is the triumph of the work and its real
climax. It opens with exultant shouts of "Hallelujah." Then ensue three
simple phrases, the middle one in plain counterpoint, which form the
groundwork for the "Hallelujah." These phrases, seemingly growing out of
each other, and reiterated with constantly increasing power, interweaving
with and sustaining the "Hallelujah" with wonderful harmonic effects,
make up a chorus that has never been  excelled, not only in  musical
skill, but also in grandeur and sublimity. After listening to its
performance, one can understand Handel's words: "I did think I did see
all heaven before me, and the great God himself." This number closes the
second part. It is worthy of note in this connection that when the
oratorio was first performed at Covent Garden, London, in 1743, the whole
audience, with the King at its head, arose during the singing of the
"Hallelujah" and remained standing until it was finished,--a custom which
is still observed, not only in England, but also in this country.

If the oratorio had closed at this point it would not have disturbed the
unities; but Handel carried it into a third part with undiminished
interest, opening it with that sublime confession of faith, "I know that
my Redeemer liveth,"--an aria which will never be lost. It is followed by
two quartets in plain counterpoint with choral responses, "Since by Man
came Death," and "For as in Adam all die," in which the effects of
contrast are very forcibly brought out. The last important aria in the
work ("The Trumpet shall sound"), for bass with trumpet obligato, will
always be admired for its beauty and stirring effect. The oratorio closes
with three choruses, all in the same key and of the same general
sentiment,--"Worthy is the Lamb," a piece of smooth, flowing harmony;
"Blessing and Honor," a fugue led off by the tenors and bassos in unison,
and repeated by the sopranos and altos on the octave, closing with full
harmony on the words "for ever and ever" several times reiterated; and
the final, "Amen" chorus, which is treated in the severest style, and in
which the composer evidently gave free rein to his genius, not being
hampered with the trammels of words.

Other oratorios may be compared one with another; the "Messiah" stands
alone, a majestic monument to the memory of the composer, an imperishable
record of the noblest sentiments of human nature and the highest
aspirations of man.




                            Judas Maccabæus.


The oratorio of "Judas Maccabæus" was written in thirty-two days, between
July 9 and Aug. 11, 1746, upon the commission of Frederic, Prince of
Wales, to celebrate the return of the Duke of Cumberland from Scotland
after the decisive victory of Culloden, April 16, 1746. The words were
written by the Rev. Thomas Morell, D.D., a learned Greek scholar of that
time, the plot being taken from the narrative of the exploits of the
Jewish deliverer contained in the first book of Maccabees and in the
twelfth book of Josephus' "Antiquities of the Jews." In his dedication,
Dr. Morell says:--

  "To His Royal Highness Prince William, Duke of Cumberland, this faint
  portraiture of a truly wise, valiant, and virtuous commander as the
  possessor of the like noble qualities is, with the most profound
  respect and veneration, inscribed by His Royal Highness' most obedient
  and most devoted servant the author."

To what extremes of adulation even a doctor of divinity may go, is well
shown in Schoelcher's pithy comment: "This is addressed to a man who
pitilessly murdered as many prisoners after the battle as his courage had
slain enemies during the combat." It is but just to the composer,
however, to say that the great success of this oratorio had little to do
with the political causes which led to its composition. It was first
performed at Covent Garden, April 1, 1747, and was repeated six times
that year. Handel himself conducted it thirty-eight times with ever
growing popularity, to which the Jews contributed greatly, as it
glorified an episode in their national history.

The characters represented are Judas Maccabæus; Simon, his brother; an
Israelitish Messenger; and Israelitish Men and Women. The story may be
gathered from the following summary of the plot as prepared for the
Birmingham Festival of 1861:--

  Part I.--Lamentations for the death of Mattathias (the father of Judas
  Maccabæus and Simon), by whom the Jewish people had been roused to
  resist the cruelties and oppressions of Antiochus Epiphanes, the Syrian
  king, in his attempt to suppress their religion and liberties.--The
  divine favor invoked.--Judas recognized as leader.--Appeal to the
  patriotism of the people, and their response.--The value of
  liberty.--Preparations for war.--Pious trust in God, and heroic resolve
  to conquer or die.

  Part II.--Celebration of the victories gained over the armies of
  Apollonius, the governor of Samaria and Seron, the Deputy Governor of
  Coelesyria, and the valor of Judas.--Renewal of war by a division of
  the Syrian array from Egypt, under Gorgias, and the despondency it
  occasions among the Israelites.--Judas again arouses the failing
  courage of the people, and they set out to meet the enemy.--Those who
  remain behind utter their detestation of the heathen idolatries, by
  which the sanctuary at Jerusalem had been desecrated, and their
  determination only to worship the God of Israel.

  Part III.--Feast of the dedication at Jerusalem, after Judas and his
  followers had recovered and restored the sanctuary, and re-established
  the liberties of his country.--Return of Judas from his final victory
  over Nicanor and his confederates.--Celebration of peace, and national
  thanksgiving.

The first scene introduces the Israelitish Men and Women lamenting the
death of the father of Judas in the sorrowful chorus, "Mourn, ye
afflicted Children," which, after a duet for soprano and tenor, is
followed by still another chorus in a similar strain ("For Zion
Lamentation make"), but much more impressive, and rising to a more
powerful climax. After a brief and simple soprano solo ("Pious Orgies"),
the chorus sings the prayer, "O Father, whose Almighty Power," closing
with a characteristic fugue on the words, "And grant a Leader." After a
short recitative, Simon (bass) breaks out in the heroic and sonorous
aria, "Arm, arm, ye brave," which has always retained its popularity,
notwithstanding its antique bravura. It is followed by the chorus in the
brief, but stirring number, "We come in bright array." Five arias, a
duet, and two choruses, nearly all of which are now omitted in
performances, being of the same general character, and mainly apostrophes
to liberty, lead to the great chorus closing the first part, "Hear us, O
Lord." It is intricate in its construction, but when properly sung
resolves itself into one of the most vigorous and impressive choruses
Handel has written.

The second part opens with the Israelites celebrating the return of Judas
from the victories over Apollonius and Seron. An instrumental prelude,
picturing the scenes of battle, leads directly to the great chorus, the
best in the work, "Fallen is the Foe." The triumphant declaration is made
over and over with constantly increasing energy, finally leading to a
brilliant fugue on the words, "Where warlike Judas wields his righteous
Sword;" but interwoven with it are still heard those notes of victory,
"Fallen is the Foe," and the response, "So fall Thy Foes." The
Israelitish Man sings a vigorous tribute to Judas ("So rapid thy Course
is"). The triumphant strain, "Zion now her Head shall raise," is taken by
two voices, closing with the soprano alone; but before her part ends, the
whole chorus takes it and joins in the pæan, "Tune your Harps," and the
double number ends in broad, flowing harmony. In a florid number ("From
mighty Kings he took the Spoil") the Israelitish Woman once more sings
Judas's praise. The two voices unite in a welcome ("Hail Judæa, happy
Land"), and finally the whole chorus join in a simple but jubilant
acclaim to the same words. The rejoicings soon change to expressions of
alarm and apprehension as a Messenger enters and announces that Gorgias
has been sent by Antiochus to attack the Israelites, and is already near
at hand. They join in a chorus expressive of deep despondency ("Oh,
wretched Israel"); but Simon, in a spirited aria ("The Lord worketh
Wonders"), bids them put their trust in Heaven, and Judas rouses their
courage with the martial trumpet song, "Sound an Alarm," which, though
very brief, is full of vigor and fire. After the departure of Judas to
meet the foe, Simon, the Israelitish Man, and the Israelitish Woman
follow each other in denunciation of the idolatries which have been
practised by the heathen among them, and close with the splendid chorus,
"We never will bow down to the rude Stock or sculptured Stone," in which
vigorous repetitions of the opening phrase lead to a chorale in broad,
impressive harmony, with which is interwoven equally vigorous repetitions
of the phrase, "We worship God alone."

The third part opens with the impressive prayer, "Father of Heaven, from
Thy eternal Throne," sung by the Priest. As the fire ascends from the
altar, the sanctuary having been purified of its heathen defilement, the
Israelites look upon it as an omen of victory and take courage. A
Messenger enters with tidings of Judas's triumph over all their enemies.
The Israelitish Maidens and Youths go out to meet him, singing the
exultant march chorus, "See the Conquering Hero comes," which is familiar
to every one by its common use on all occasions, from Handel's time to
this, where tribute has been paid to martial success and heroes have been
welcomed. It is the universal accompaniment of victory, as the Dead March
in "Saul" is of the pageantry of death. It is very simple in its
construction, like many others of Handel's most effective numbers. It is
first sung as a three-part chorus, then as a duet or chorus of Virgins,
again by the full power of all the voices, and gradually dies away in the
form of an instrumental march. The chorus did not originally belong to
"Judas Maccabæus," but to "Joshua," in which oratorio it is addressed to
Othniel when he returns from the capture of Debir. Handel frequently made
transfers of that kind, and this was a permanent one; for the celebrated
chorus is now unalterably identified with the work in which he placed it,
and in which also the setting is still more imposing. A very elaborate
chorus ("Sing unto God"), a florid aria with trumpet solo for Judas
("With Honor let Desert be crowned"), the chorus, "To our Great God," a
pastoral  duet with exquisite accompaniment ("O Lovely Peace"), and a
Hallelujah in the composer's customary exultant style, close this very
brilliant and dramatic oratorio.




                         The Dettingen Te Deum.


On the 27th of June, 1743, the British army and its allies, under the
command of King George II. and Lord Stair, won a victory at Dettingen, in
Bavaria, over the French army, commanded by the Maréchal de Noailles and
the Duc de Grammont. It was a victory plucked from an expected defeat,
and aroused great enthusiasm in England. On the King's return, a day of
public thanksgiving was appointed, and Handel, who was at that time
"Composer of Musick to the Chapel Royal," was commissioned to write a Te
Deum and an anthem for the occasion. The original score, a large folio
volume in the Royal Collection, is headed "Angefangen Juli 17, 1743."
There is no date at the end; but as the beginning of the Dettingen Anthem
is dated July 30, it is probable that the Te Deum was finished between
the 17th and 30th. Both works were publicly rehearsed at the Chapel
Royal, Whitehall, on the 18th and 25th of the ensuing November, and
formed part of the thanksgiving services on the 27th at the Chapel Royal
of St. James, in the presence of the King and royal family.

The Dettingen Te Deum has been universally considered as one of the
masterpieces among Handel's later works. Never was a victory more
enthusiastically commemorated in music. It is not a Te Deum in the strict
sense, but a grand martial panegyric, and, as Rockstro says:--

  "It needs no great stretch of the imagination to picture every drum and
  trumpet in the realm taking part in the gorgeous fanfare of its opening
  chorus, while the whole army, with the King at its head, joins the
  assembled nation in a shout of praise for the escape which was so
  unexpectedly changed into a memorable victory."

Schoelcher, in his reference to this work, notes that Handel set the hymn
of St. Ambrose to music five different times in thirty years, and always
with new beauty and fresh color, though it is somewhat remarkable that he
gave each time a plaintive character to the verse, "To Thee all angels
cry aloud,"--a fact also observed by Burney, who says:--

  "There is some reason to suspect that Handel, in setting his grand Te
  Deum for the peace of Utrecht, as well as in this, confined the meaning
  of the word 'cry' to a sorrowful sense, as both the movements to the
  words 'To Thee all angels cry aloud' are not only in a minor key, but
  slow and plaintive."

Burney further says, speaking of its performance at the great Handel
Commemoration in Westminster Abbey in 1784:--

  "As it was composed for a military triumph, the fourteen trumpets, two
  pairs of common kettledrums, two pairs of double drums from the Tower,
  and a pair of double-bass drums made expressly for this occasion, were
  introduced with great propriety; indeed, these last drums, except the
  destruction, had all the effect of the most powerful artillery."

The Te Deum contains eighteen short solos and choruses, mostly of a
brilliant, martial character, the solos being divided between the alto,
baritone, and bass. After a brief instrumental prelude, the work opens
with the triumphant, jubilant chorus with trumpets and drums, "We praise
Thee, O God," written for five parts, the sopranos being divided into
firsts and seconds, containing also a short alto solo leading to a
closing fugue. The second number ("All the Earth doth worship Thee") is
also an alto solo with five-part chorus of the same general character. It
is followed by a semi-chorus in three parts ("To Thee all Angels cry
aloud"), plaintive in style, as has already been observed, and leading to
the full chorus ("To Thee Cherubim and Seraphim"), which is majestic in
its movement and rich in harmony. The fifth number is a quartet and
chorus ("The glorious Company of the Apostles praise Thee"), dominated by
the bass, with responses from the other parts, and followed by a short
full chorus ("Thine adorable, true, and only Son"). The seventh number is
a stirring bass solo with trumpets ("Thou art the King of Glory"),
leading without break into a stately choral enunciation of the same
words. The eighth is a slow and plaintive bass solo, usually sung by a
tenor ("When Thou tookest upon Thee to deliver Man"), followed by a grave
and impressive chorus ("When Thou hadst overcome the Sharpness of
Death"). The next number is a trio for alto, tenor, and bass ("Thou
sittest at the Right Hand of God"), closing with a beautiful adagio
effect. A fanfare of trumpets introduces the next four numbers, all
choruses, set to four verses of the hymn:--

  "We therefore pray Thee, help Thy servants: Whom Thou hast redeemed
      with Thy precious blood.
  "Make them to be numbered with Thy Saints: in glory everlasting.
  "O Lord, save Thy people: and bless Thine heritage.
  "Govern them: and lift them up forever.
  "Day by day: we magnify Thee:
  "And we worship Thy Name! ever, world without end."

In this group of choruses the art of fugue and counterpoint is splendidly
illustrated, but never to the sacrifice of brilliant effect, which is
also heightened by the trumpets in the accompaniments. An impressive bass
solo ("Vouchsafe, O Lord") intervenes, and then the trumpets sound the
stately symphony to the final chorus, "O Lord, in Thee have I trusted."
It begins with a long alto solo with delicate oboe accompaniment that
makes the effect very impressive when voices and instruments take up the
phrase in a magnificent outburst of power and rich harmony, and carry it
to the close.




                                 HAYDN.


Joseph Haydn, the creator of the symphony and the stringed quartet, was
born at Rohrau, a little Austrian village on the river Leitha, March 31,
1732. His father was a wheelwright and his mother a cook, in service with
Count Harrach. Both the parents were fond of music, and both sang, the
father accompanying himself upon the harp, which he played by ear. The
child displayed a voice so beautiful that in his sixth year he was
allowed to study music, and was also given a place in the village
church-choir. Reutter, the capellmeister of St. Stephen's, Vienna, having
heard him, was so impressed with the beauty of his voice that he offered
him a position as chorister. Haydn eagerly accepted it, as it gave him
opportunities for study. While in the service of St. Stephen's he had
lessons on the violin and piano, as well as in composition. When his
voice broke, and his singing was of no further value, he was thrown upon
the tender mercies of the world. Fortune favored him, however. He
obtained a few pupils, and gave himself up to composition. He made the
acquaintance of Metastasio, Porpora, and Gluck. His trios began to
attract attention, and he soon found himself rising into prominence. In
1759, through the influence of a wealthy friend and amateur, he was
appointed to the post of musical director and composer in the service of
Count Morzin, and about this time wrote his first symphony. When the
Count dismissed his band, Prince Paul Anton Esterhazy received him as his
second capellmeister, under Werner. When the latter died, in 1766, Haydn
took his place as sole director. His patron, meanwhile, had died, and was
succeeded by his brother Nicolaus, between whom and Haydn there was the
utmost good feeling. Up to this time Haydn had written thirty symphonies,
a large number of trios, quartets, and several vocal pieces. His
connection with the Prince lasted until 1790, and was only terminated by
the latter's death. But during this period of twenty-eight years his
musical activity was unceasing; and as he had an orchestra of his own,
and his patron was ardently devoted to music, the incentive to
composition was never lacking. Anton succeeded Nicolaus, and was generous
enough to increase Haydn's pension; but he dismissed the entire chapel,
and the composer took up his abode in Vienna. He was hardly established
before he received a flattering proposition from Salomon, the manager, to
go to England. He had already had many pressing invitations from others,
but could not accept them, owing to his engagement at Esterhazy. Now that
he was free, he decided to make the journey. On New Year's Day, 1791, he
arrived in London. Success greeted him at once. He became universally
popular. Musicians and musical societies paid him devoted attention. He
gave a series of symphony concerts which aroused the greatest enthusiasm.
He was treated with distinguished courtesy by the royal family. Oxford
gave him the honorary degree of Doctor of Music. The nobility entertained
him sumptuously. After a year of continuous fêtes, he returned to
Germany, where he remained two years, during a portion of which time
Beethoven was his pupil. In 1794 he made his second journey to England,
where his former successes were repeated, and fresh honors were showered
upon him. In 1804 he was notified by Prince Esterhazy that he was about
to reorganize his chapel, and wished him for its conductor again. Haydn
accordingly returned to his old position, where he remained during the
rest of his life. He was already an old man, but it was during this
period that his most remarkable works were produced, among them the
Austrian National Hymn ("Gott erhalte Franz den Kaiser"), the "Seven
Words," the "Creation," the "Seasons," and many of his best trios and
quartets. He died May 31, 1809, a few days after the occupation of Vienna
by the French, and among the mourners at his funeral were many French
officers. Funeral services were held in all the principal European
cities. Honored and respected all over Europe, he was most deeply loved
by his own countrymen, who still affectionately speak of him as "Papa"
Haydn.




                              The Creation.


Haydn was sixty-five years of age when he undertook the great work of his
life. It was begun in 1796, and finished in 1798. When urged to bring it
to a conclusion more rapidly, he replied, "I spend much time over it,
because I intend it to last a long time." Shortly before his final
departure from London, Salomon, his manager, brought him a poem for music
which had been compiled by Lydley from Milton's "Paradise Lost," for use
by Handel, though the latter had not availed himself of it. Haydn took it
with him to Vienna, and submitted it to the Baron van Swieten, the
Emperor's librarian, who was not only a very learned scholar, but also
something of a musician and composer. The Baron suggested that he should
make an oratorio of it, and to encourage him, not only translated the
text into German, but added a number of arias, duets, and choruses,
particularly those of the descriptive kind. Several of the nobility also
guaranteed the expenses of preparation and performance. His friend
Griesinger writes:--

  "Haydn wrote 'The Creation' in his sixty-fifth year with all the spirit
  that usually dwells in the breast of youth. I had the good fortune to
  be a witness of the deep emotions and joyous enthusiasm which several
  performances of it under Haydn's own direction aroused in all
  listeners. Haydn also confessed to me that it was not possible for him
  to describe the emotions with which he was filled as the performance
  met his entire expectation, and his audience listened to every note.
  'One moment I was as cold as ice, and the next I seemed on fire, and
  more than once I feared I should have a stroke.'"

On another occasion Haydn remarked: "Never was I so pious as when
composing 'The Creation.' I knelt down every day and prayed God to
strengthen me for the work." That he sought this inspiration in his old
age more than once, we may infer from another remark to Griesinger: "When
composition does not get on well, I go to my chamber, and with rosary in
hand say a few _aves_, and then the ideas return." It was first performed
in private at the Schwartzenberg Palace, April 29, 1798; and Bombet, the
celebrated French critic, who was present, says in one of his letters:

  "Who can describe the applause, the delight, the enthusiasm of this
  society? I was present, and I can assure you I never witnessed such a
  scene. The flower of the literary and musical society of Vienna were
  assembled in the room, which was well adapted to the purpose, and Haydn
  himself directed the orchestra. The most profound silence, the most
  scrupulous attention, a sentiment, I might almost say, of religious
  respect, were the dispositions which prevailed when the first stroke of
  the bow was given. The general expectation was not disappointed. A long
  train of beauties, to that moment unknown, unfolded themselves before
  us; our minds, overcome with pleasure and admiration, experienced
  during two successive hours what they had rarely felt,--a happy
  existence, produced by desires, ever lively, ever renewed, and never
  disappointed."

The first public performance was given at the National Theatre, March 19,
1799, Haydn's name-day, and the next by the Tonkünstler Societät. On the
9th of March he conducted it at the palace of Ofen before the Archduke
Palatine Joseph of Hungary. Its success was immediate, and rivalled that
of "The Messiah." It was performed all over Europe, and societies were
organized for the express purpose of producing it. In London rival
performances of it were given at Covent Garden and the King's Theatre
during the year 1800.

The oratorio opens with an overture representing chaos. Its effect is at
first dull and indefinite, its utterances inarticulate, and its notes
destitute of perceptible melody. It is Nature in her chaotic state,
struggling into definite form. Gradually instrument after instrument
makes an effort to extricate itself, and as the clarinets and flutes
struggle out of the confusion, the feeling of order begins to make itself
apparent. The resolutions indicate harmony. At last the wonderful
discordances settle, leaving a misty effect that vividly illustrates "the
Spirit of God moving upon the face of the waters." Then, at the fiat of
the Creator, "Let there be Light," the whole orchestra and chorus burst
forth in the sonorous response, "And there was Light." A brief passage by
Uriel (tenor) describes the division of light from darkness, and the end
of chaos, introducing a fugued chorus, in which the rage of Satan and his
hellish spirits, as they are precipitated into the abyss, is described
with tremendous discords and strange modulations; but before it closes,
the music relates the beauties of the newly created earth springing up
"at God's command." Raphael describes the making of the firmament, the
raging of the storms, the flashing lightning and rolling thunders, the
showers of rain and hail, and the gently falling snow, to an
accompaniment which is closely imitative in character. The work of the
second day forms the theme of "The Marvellous Work," for soprano obligato
with chorus,--a number characterized by great joyousness and spirit. This
leads to the number, "Rolling in foaming Billows," in which the music is
employed to represent the effect of water, from the roaring billows of
the "boisterous seas," and the rivers flowing in "serpent error," to "the
limpid brook," whose murmuring ripple is set to one of the sweetest and
most delicious of melodies. This leads the way to the well-known aria,
"With Verdure clad," of which Haydn himself was very fond, and which he
recast three times before he was satisfied with it. It is followed by a
fugued chorus ("Awake the Harp"), in which the Angels praise the Creator.
We next pass to the creation of the planets. The instrumental prelude is
a wonderful bit of constantly developing color, which increases "in
splendor bright," until the sun appears. It is followed by the rising of
the moon, to an accompaniment as tender as its own radiance; and as the
stars appear, "the Sons of God" announce the fourth day, and the first
part closes with the great chorus, "The Heavens are telling," in which
the entire force of band and singers is employed in full, broad harmony
and sonorous chords, leading to a cadence of magnificent power.

The second part opens with the aria, "On mighty Pens," describing in a
majestic manner the flight of the eagle, and then blithely passes to the
gayety of the lark, the tenderness of the cooing doves, and the
plaintiveness of the nightingale, in which the singing of the birds is
imitated as closely as the resources of music will allow. A beautiful
terzetto describes with inimitable grace the gently sloping hills covered
with their verdure, the leaping of the fountain into the light, and the
flights of birds, and a bass solo in sonorous manner takes up the
swimming fish, closing with "the upheaval of Leviathan from the deep,"
who disports himself among the double-basses. This leads to a powerful
chorus, "The Lord is great." The next number describes the creation of
various animals; and perhaps nothing that art contains can vie with it in
varied and vivid description. It begins with the lion, whose deep roar is
heard among the wind-instruments. The alertness of the "flexible tiger"
is shown in rapid flights by the strings. A presto ingeniously represents
the quick movements of the stag. The horse is accompanied by music which
prances and neighs. A quiet pastoral movement, in strong contrast with
the preceding abrupt transitions, pictures the cattle seeking their food
"on fields and meadows green." A flutter of sounds describes the swarms
of insects in the air, and from this we pass to a long, undulating thread
of harmony, representing "the sinuous trace" of the worm. This
masterpiece of imitative music is contained in a single recitative. A
powerful and dignified aria, sung by Raphael ("Now Heaven in fullest
Glory shone"), introduces the creation of man, which is completed in an
exquisitely beautiful aria ("In Native Worth ") by Uriel, the second part
of which is full of tender beauty in its description of the creation of
Eve, and closes with a picture of the happiness of the newly created
pair. A brief recitative ("And God saw everything that He had made")
leads to the chorus, "Achieved is the glorious Work,"--a fugue of great
power, superbly accompanied. It is interrupted by a trio ("On Thee each
living Soul awaits"), but soon returns with still greater power and
grandeur, closing with a Gloria and Hallelujah of magnificent
proportions.

The third part opens with a symphonic introduction descriptive of the
first morning of creation, in which the flutes and horns, combined with
the strings, are used with exquisite effect. In a brief recitative ("In
rosy Mantle appears") Uriel pictures the joy of Adam and Eve, and bids
them sing the praise of God with the angelic choir, which forms the theme
of the succeeding duet and chorus ("By Thee with Bliss"); to which the
answering choir replies with a gentle and distant effect, as if from the
celestial heights, "Forever blessed be His Power." Again Adam and Eve in
successive solos, finally uniting, join with the choir in extolling the
goodness of God; and as they close, all take up the beautiful and
majestic pæan, "Hail, bounteous Lord! Almighty, hail!" As the angelic
shout dies away, a tender, loving dialogue ensues between Adam and Eve,
leading to the beautiful duet, "Graceful Consort," which is not only the
most delightful number in the work, but in freshness, sweetness, and
tenderness stands almost unsurpassed among compositions of its kind.
After a short bit of recitative by Uriel ("O happy Pair"), the chorus
enters upon the closing number ("Sing the Lord, ye Voices all"),
beginning slowly and majestically, then developing into a masterly fugue
("Jehovah's Praise forever shall endure"), and closing with a Laudamus of
matchless beauty, in which the principal voices in solo parts are set off
against the choral and orchestral masses with powerful effect.

Haydn's last appearance in public was at a performance of the "Creation,"
which took place in 1808, when it was given in Italian under the
direction of Salieri. Dies says of this remarkable scene:--

  "On alighting from the Prince's carriage, he was received by
  distinguished personages of the nobility and by his scholar, Beethoven.
  The crowd was so great that the military had to keep order. He was
  carried, sitting in his arm-chair, into the hall, and was greeted upon
  his entrance with a flourish of trumpets and joyous shouts of 'Long
  live Haydn!' He occupied a seat next his Princess, the Prince being at
  court that day; and on the other side sat his favorite scholar,
  Fräulein Kurzbeck. The highest people of rank in Vienna selected seats
  in his vicinity. The French ambassador noticed that he wore the medal
  of the Paris Concert des Amateurs. 'Not only this, but all the medals
  which have been awarded in France, you ought to have received,' said
  he. Haydn thought he felt a little draught; the Princess threw her
  shawl about him, many ladies following her example, and in a few
  moments he was completely wrapped in shawls. Poems by Collin and
  Carpani, the adapter of the text, were presented to him. He could no
  longer conceal his feelings. His overburdened heart sought and found
  relief in tears. When the passage, 'And there was Light,' came, and the
  audience broke out into tumultuous applause, he made a motion of his
  hands towards heaven, and said, 'It came from thence.' He remained in
  such an agitated condition that he was obliged to take his leave at the
  close of the first part. As he went out, the audience thronged about
  him to take leave of him, and Beethoven kissed his hand and forehead
  devoutly. His departure completely overcame him. He could not address
  the audience, and could only give expression to his heartfelt gratitude
  with broken, feeble utterances and blessings. Upon every countenance
  there was deep pity, and tearful eyes followed him as he was taken to
  his carriage."

He lived but a short time longer, but long enough to witness the success
of his scholar, Beethoven, in the same year.




                              The Seasons.


"The Seasons," written two years after "The Creation," was Haydn's last
oratorio. The music was composed between April, 1798, and April, 1801. It
is not an oratorio in the strict sense of the term, as it partakes of the
form and qualities, not only of the oratorio, but also of the opera and
cantata. The words were compiled by Baron van Swieten from Thomson's
well-known poem of "The Seasons," but it was a long time before he could
persuade Haydn to undertake the task of composing an oratorio on the
subject. His old age and infirmities made him averse to the work. He was
greatly annoyed by the text, and still more so by its compiler, who
insisted upon changes in the music which Haydn testily declined to make.
He was frequently irritated over the many imitative passages, and it was
to relieve his own feelings and vary the monotony of the sentiment that
he introduced the rollicking bacchanal chorus in the third part. He
expressed his feelings to a friend in the remark: "My head was so full of
the nonsensical stuff that it all went topsy-turvy, and I therefore
called the closing fugue the 'drunken fugue.'" Notwithstanding his many
objections, when once he started, he worked hard,--so hard, indeed, that
this continuous labor induced brain-fever and intense suffering, and he
never entirely rallied from its effects. A weakness followed, which
constantly increased. To one friend he remarked: "The 'Seasons' have
brought this trouble upon me. I ought not to have written it. I have
overdone;" and to another: "I have done; my head is no longer what it
was. Formerly ideas came to me unsought: I am now obliged to seek for
them; and for this I feel I am not formed." It is a sad picture, that of
the old composer sitting down to work in his seventieth year, distrustful
of his own powers, with an uncongenial text before him; but no
indications of age or weakness are to be found in this music, which from
its first note to the last is fresh, original, bright, and graceful,--a
treasure-house of ideas to which subsequent composers have gone time
after time when they would write of Nature or attempt to picture her
moods.

The "Seasons" was first performed at the Schwartzenberg Palace, Vienna,
April 24, 1801, and was repeated on the 27th and on the 1st of May. On
the 29th of May Haydn himself conducted it in public at the Redoutensaal,
for his own benefit. Though some of the critics disparaged it, and
Beethoven was not overpleased with it, it met with a great popular
success, and Haydn himself was delighted with the work that had cost him
so much trouble. Bombet, the French critic, who was present at the first
performance, says of it:--

  "The best critique that has been given of the work is that which Haydn
  himself addressed to me when I went to give him an account of the
  performance of it in the Palace Schwartzenberg. The applause had been
  universal, and I hastened out to congratulate the author. Scarcely had
  I opened my lips when the honest composer stopped me: 'I am happy to
  find that my music pleases the public; but I can receive no compliment
  on this work from you. I am convinced that you feel yourself that it is
  not the "Creation;" and the reason is this: in the "Creation" the
  actors are angels; here they are peasants.'"

The work is divided into four parts,--Spring, Summer, Autumn, and
Winter,--and the characters introduced are Simon, a farmer; Jane, his
daughter; Lucas, a young countryman and shepherd; and a chorus of Country
People and Hunters. A vivacious overture, expressing the passage from
winter to spring, and recitatives by Simon, Lucas, and Jane, who in turn
express their delight at the close of the one season and the approach of
the other, lead to the opening chorus ("Come, gentle Spring, ethereal
Mildness, come"),--a fresh and animated number, which is familiar to
every one. Simon trolls out a pastoral aria ("With Joy the impatient
Husbandman"), full of the very spirit of quiet, peace, and happiness,--a
quaint melody which will inevitably recall to opera-goers the "Zitti,
Zitti" from Rossini's "Barber of Seville," the essential difference
between the two pieces being that in the latter the time is greatly
accelerated. This aria is followed by a trio and chorus ("Be propitious,
bounteous Heaven"), a free fugue, in which all beseech a blessing upon
the sowing of the seed. The next number is a duet for Jane and Lucas,
with chorus ("Spring her lovely Charms unfolding"), which is fairly
permeated with the delicate suggestions of opening buds and the delights
of the balmy air and young verdure of spring. As its strains die away,
all join in the cheerful fugued chorus, "God of Light," which closes the
first part.

After a brief adagio prelude, the second part, "Summer," opens with a
charming aria by Simon ("From out the Fold the Shepherd drives"), which
gives us a delightful picture of the shepherd driving his flock along the
verdant hillside, then leaning upon his staff to watch the rising sun. As
it appears, it is welcomed by trio and chorus with the exultant shout,
"Hail, O glorious Sun!" As noon approaches, the music fairly becomes
radiant. A series of recitatives and arias follow, bringing out in a
vivid and picturesque manner the oppressive, exhaustive heat and the
longing for rest and shade, leading at last to an ominous silence as the
clouds begin to gather and the sky darkens. A short recitative prepares
the way. A crash of thunder is heard upon the drums: it is the prelude to
the storm-chorus ("Hark! the deep tremendous Voice"), which has been the
model for nearly all the storm-descriptions written since Haydn's time.
It is worked up to a tremendous climax of tumult and terror, of pouring
rain, flashing lightning, and pealing thunder. At last the tempest dies
away, and in the trio and chorus, "Now cease the Conflicts," night comes
on, with its song of the quail,--which Beethoven subsequently utilized in
his Pastoral Symphony,--the chirp of the crickets, the croaking of the
frogs, the distant chime of the evening bells, and the invocation to
sleep. Of the frog episode, Nohl says:--

  "He particularly disliked the croaking of the frogs, and realized how
  much it lowered his art. Swieten showed him an old piece of Grétry's in
  which the croak was imitated with striking effect. Haydn contended that
  it would be better if the entire croak were omitted, though he yielded
  to Swieten's importunities. He declared afterwards, however, that the
  frog passage was not his own. 'It was urged upon me,' he said, 'to
  write this French croak. In the orchestral setting it is very brief,
  and it cannot be done on the piano. I trust the critics will not treat
  me with severity for it. I am an old man, and liable to make
  mistakes.'"

After a quaintly melodious prelude the third part opens with a terzetto
and chorus ("Thus Nature ever kind rewards"), an invocation to virtue and
industry, and a quaintly sentimental duet ("Ye gay and painted Fair").
The next number, an aria by Simon ("Behold along the dewy Grass"),--which
gives us a picture of the hunter and his dog pursuing a bird,--prepares
the way for the great hunting chorus ("Hark! the Mountains resound"), one
of the most graphic and stirring choruses of this description ever
written. The whole scene,--the vales and forests resounding with the
music of the horns, the finding of the quarry, the flying stag
outstripping the wind, the pack at fault, but starting in again as they
find the scent, the tally-ho of the hunters, the noble animal at bay, his
death, and the shouts of the crowd,--are all pictured with a freshness
and genuine out-door feeling which seem almost incredible considering
Haydn's age. This remarkable number is separated from its natural
companion, the bacchanalian chorus, by a recitative extolling the wealth
of the vintage. This chorus ("Joyful the Liquor flows") is in two
parts,--first a hymn in praise of wine, sung by the tippling revellers,
and second, a dance tempo, full of life and beauty, with imitations of
the bagpipe and rustic fiddles, the melody being a favorite Austrian
dance-air. With this rollicking combination, for the two movements are
interwoven, the third part closes.

A slow orchestral prelude, "expressing the thick fogs at the approach of
winter," introduces the closing part. In recitative Simon describes the
on-coming of the dreary season, and Jane reiterates the sentiment in the
cavatina, "Light and Life dejected languish." In Lucas's recitative we
see the snow covering the fields, and in his following aria, "The
Traveller stands perplexed," a graphic tone-picture of the wanderer lost
in the snow is presented. At last he espies the friendly light in the
cottage. "Melodious voices greet his ears," and as he enters he beholds
the friendly circle, the old father telling over his stories of the past,
the mother plying the distaff, the girls spinning, and the young people
making the night merry with jest and sport. At last they join in a
characteristic imitative chorus ("Let the Wheel move gayly"). After the
spinning they gather about the fire, and Jane sings a charming love-story
("A wealthy Lord who long had loved"), accompanied by chorus. Simon
improves the occasion to moralize on the sentiment of the seasons in the
aria, "In this, O vain, misguided Man," impressing upon us the lesson
that "Nought but Truth remains;" and with a general appeal to Heaven for
guidance through life, this quaint and peaceful pastoral poem in music
draws to its close. It was the last important work of the aged Haydn, but
it has all the charm and freshness of youth.




                                 LISZT.


Franz Liszt, the most eminent pianist of his time, who also obtained
world-wide celebrity as a composer and orchestral conductor, was born at
Raiding, Hungary, Oct. 22, 1811. His father was an accomplished amateur,
and played the piano and violoncello with more than ordinary skill. He
was In his ninth year Liszt played for the first noblemen encouraged him
to continue his studies, and guaranteed him sufficient to defray the
expenses of six years' tuition. He went to Vienna at once and studied the
piano with Czerny, besides taking lessons in composition from Salieri and
Randhartinger. It was while in that city that his first composition, a
variation on a waltz of Diabelli, appeared. In 1823 he went to Paris,
hoping to secure admission to the Conservatory; but Cherubini refused it
on account of his foreign origin, though Cherubini himself was a
foreigner. Nothing daunted, young Liszt continued his studies with Reicha
and Paer, and two years afterwards brought out a one-act opera entitled
"Don Sancho," which met with a very cordial reception. The slight he had
received from Cherubini aroused popular sympathy for him. His wonderful
playing attracted universal attention and gained him admission into the
most brilliant Parisian salons. He soon became known as the
"wonder-child," and was a favorite with every one, especially with the
ladies. For two or three years he made artistic tours through France,
Switzerland, and England, accompanied by his father, and everywhere met
with the most brilliant success. In 1827 the father died, leaving him
alone in the world; but good fortune was on his side. During his stay in
Paris he had made the friendship of Victor Hugo, George Sand, Lamartine,
and other great lights in literature and music, and their influence
prepared the way for his permanent success. Notwithstanding that he was
in many senses a Bohemian and a man of the world, he had a strong
religious tendency. For a time he became deeply interested in the
doctrines of Saint-Simon; but his adherence to that system did not last
long. He speedily returned to the Roman Church, and some years afterwards
went to Rome, at the suggestion of the Pontiff took orders, and set
himself about the work of reforming the church music,--a task, however,
which he soon abandoned; too many obstacles stood in his way. He expected
to become Capellmeister at the Sistine Chapel; but, as he himself said:
"I was thwarted by the lack of culture among the cardinals; and besides,
most of the princes of the Church were Italian." The Abbé was soon in
Germany again, where he resided until the close of his life. From 1839 to
1847 he travelled from one city to another, arousing the most
extraordinary enthusiasm; his progress was one continued ovation. In 1849
he went to Weimar and accepted the post of conductor at the Court
Theatre. He made Weimar the musical centre of Europe. It was there that
his greatest compositions were written, that the school of the music of
the future was founded, and that Wagner's operas first gained an
unprejudiced hearing; and it is from Weimar that his distinguished
pupils, like Von Bülow, Tausig, Bendel, Bronsart, Klindworth,
Winterberger, Reubke, and many others date their success. In 1859 he
resigned his position, and after that time resided at Rome, Pesth, and
Weimar, working for the best interests of his beloved art, and
encouraging young musicians to reach the highest standards. Few men of
this century have had such a powerful influence upon music, or have done
so much to elevate and purify it. His most important works were the
"Divina Commedia" and "Faust" symphonies, the twelve symphonic poems, the
six Hungarian rhapsodies, the "Graner Mass," the "Hungarian Coronation
Mass," and the oratorios "Christus" and "The Legend of the Holy
Elizabeth." Besides these he wrote a large number of orchestral pieces,
songs, and cantatas, and a rich and varied collection of pianoforte
solos, transcriptions, and arrangements. He died July 31, 1886.




                    The Legend of the Holy Elizabeth.


The oratorio, "Legend of the Holy Elizabeth," was written in 1864, and
first produced Aug. 15, 1865, upon the occasion of the twenty-fifth
anniversary of the Conservatory of Pesth-Ofen. The text is by Otto
Roquette, and was inspired by Moritz von Schwind's frescos at the
Wartburg representing scenes in the life of the saint. A brief allusion
to her history will still further elucidate the story which Liszt has
treated so powerfully. She was the daughter of King Andreas II. of
Hungary, and was born in 1207. At the age of four she was betrothed to
Ludwig, son of the Landgrave Hermann of Thuringia, whom she married in
1220. After his death, in 1227, she was driven from the Wartburg and
forced to give up the regency by her cruel and ambitious mother-in-law.
After long wanderings and many privations she retired to Bamberg, where
her uncle, the bishop, dwelt; but shortly afterwards her rights were
restored to her. She renounced them in favor of her son, Hermann II., and
died in 1231. Four years later she was canonized at Marpurg by order of
Pope Gregory IX. Her life was devoted to the relief of the poor and
suffering.

The characters introduced in the oratorio are Saint Elizabeth, Landgrave
Ludwig, Landgrave Hermann, Landgravine Sophie, a Hungarian Magnate, the
Seneschal, and the Emperor Frederick II. The last three _rôles_ are
usually assigned to Ludwig, thus reducing the number of solo-singers to
four. The work is laid out in two parts, each having three scenes
corresponding in subjects with Von Schwind's six frescos. The first
describes the arrival of Elizabeth at the Wartburg, and the welcome she
receives. In the second she is married, and her husband, Ludwig, has
succeeded to the throne. His devotion to knight-errantry leads him from
home. During his absence a famine breaks out, and Elizabeth in her
devotion to the sufferers impoverishes herself and incurs the wrath of
her mother-in-law, the Landgravine Sophie. While carrying a basket of
bread and wine one day to the victims of the scourge, she is met by her
husband, who has unexpectedly returned. Amazed at the absence of her
attendants, he questions her, and she excuses herself with the plea that
she has been gathering flowers. Doubting the truth of her statement, he
snatches the basket from her. She confesses her falsehood; but upon
examining the basket it is found to be full of roses. The Lord has
performed a miracle. Overcome with remorse for doubting her, Ludwig begs
her forgiveness, and the two join in prayer that the Lord may continue
His goodness to them. The third scene opens at Schmalkald, on the borders
of Thuringia, where Ludwig has assembled his knights and nobles who are
to accompany him to the Holy Land. They declare their allegiance to
Ludwig as their leader, and he calls upon them also to swear fealty to
his wife. After a sad farewell Ludwig rides away at the head of his
Crusaders. The fourth scene opens with the news of Ludwig's death. The
Landgravine claims the castle as her inheritance, compels Elizabeth to
abandon the regency, and drives her out in the midst of a furious storm.
In the fifth scene we find her at a hospital which she has founded, and
notwithstanding her own troubles and sufferings still ministering to
others in like affliction. This scene closes with her death, and in the
last we have the ceremonies of her canonization at Marpurg.

The first scene opens with a long orchestral introduction, working up to
a powerful climax, and based mainly upon a theme from the old church
service, which is Elizabeth's motive, and is frequently heard throughout
the work. An animated prelude which follows it introduces the opening
chorus ("Welcome the Bride"). A brief solo by Landgrave Hermann
("Welcome, my little Daughter") and another of a national character by
the Hungarian Magnate attending the bride intervene, and again the chorus
break out in noisy welcome. After a dignified solo by Hermann and a brief
dialogue between Ludwig and Elizabeth, a light, graceful allegretto
ensues, leading up to a children's chorus ("Merriest Games with thee
would we play"), which is delightfully fresh and joyous in its character.
At its close the chorus of welcome resumes, and the scene ends with a
ritornelle of a plaintive kind, foreboding the sorrow which is fast
approaching.

The second scene, after a short prelude, opens with Ludwig's hunting-song
("From the Mists of the Valleys"), which is written in the conventional
style of songs of this class, although it has two distinct movements in
strong contrast. As he meets Elizabeth, a dialogue ensues, including the
scene of the rose miracle, leading up to a brief chorus ("The Lord has
done a Wonder"), and followed by an impressive duet in church style ("Him
we worship and praise this Day"). The scene closes with an ensemble, a
duet with full choral harmony, worked up with constantly increasing power
and set to an accompaniment full of rich color and brilliant effect.

The third scene opens with the song of the Crusaders, an impetuous and
brilliant chorus ("In Palestine, the Holy Land"), the accompaniment to
which is an independent march movement. The stately rhythm is followed by
a solo by the Landgrave, bidding farewell to Elizabeth and appealing to
his subjects to be loyal to her. The chorus replies in a short number,
based upon the Hungarian melody which has already been heard. Elizabeth
follows with a tender but passionate appeal to her husband ("Oh, tarry!
oh, shorten not the Hour"), leading to a solo ("With Grief my Spirit
wrestles"), which is full of the pain of parting. A long dialogue follows
between them, interrupted here and there by the strains of the Crusaders,
in which finally the whole chorus join with great power in a martial but
sorrowful style. As it comes to a close, the orchestra breaks out into
the Crusaders' march,--a brilliant picture of the knightly pageant, the
time gradually accelerating as well as the force, until it reaches a
tremendous climax. The trio of the march is based upon a religious melody
which was sung in the time of the Crusaders; but the remainder follows
the Gregorian intonation. The chorus once more resumes its shout of
jubilee, and the brilliant scene comes to an end. So vividly colored is
this music that one can well fancy the sorrowful Elizabeth as she stands
gazing at the band of knights, with Ludwig at their head, slowly riding
away, pennons fluttering in the breeze, and lances and mail glittering in
the sunlight.

In the fourth scene a slow and mournful movement, followed by an allegro
ominous and agitated in style, introduces the Landgravine Sophie, the
evil genius of the Wartburg. The tidings of the death of Ludwig have
come, and with fierce declamation she orders Elizabeth away from the
castle. The latter replies in an aria ("O Day of Mourning, Day of
Sorrow") marked by sorrowful lamentation. Sophie again hurls her
imprecations, and a very dramatic dialogue ensues, which takes the trio
form as the reluctant Seneschal consents to enforce the cruel order. Once
more Elizabeth tenderly appeals to her in the aria, "Thou too art a
Mother." Sophie impatiently and fiercely exclaims, "No longer tarry!" The
scene comes to an end with Elizabeth's lament as she goes out into the
storm, which is vividly described in an orchestral movement, interspersed
with vocal solos. These have little bearing upon the subject-matter,
however, which is mainly described by the band with overwhelming power.

The fifth scene opens with a long declamatory solo by Elizabeth,--full of
tenderness and pathos, in which she recalls the dream of
childhood,--closing with an orchestral movement of the same general
character. It is followed by the full chorus ("Here 'neath the Roof of
Want"), which after a few bars is taken by the sopranos and altos
separately, closing with chorus again and soprano solo ("Elizabeth, thou
holy one"). The death-scene follows ("This is no earthly Night"). Her
last words, "Unto mine End Thy Love has led me," are set to music full of
pathos, and as she expires, the instrumentation dies away in peaceful,
tranquil strains. A semi-chorus, which can also be sung by three solo
voices ("The Pain is over"), closes the sad scene, the ritornelle at the
end being made still more effective by the harps, which give it a
celestial character.

The last scene opens with an interlude which gathers up all the motives
of the oratorio,--the Pilgrim's Song, the Crusaders' March, the Church
Song, and the Hungarian Air, and weaves them into a rich and varied
texture for full orchestra, bells, and drums, forming the funeral song of
the sainted Elizabeth,--the same effect, and produced in the same manner,
which Wagner subsequently used with such magnificent power in the dirge
of Siegfried. It is followed by a solo from the Emperor, "I see assembled
round the Throne,"--a slow and dignified air, leading to the great
ensemble closing the work, and descriptive of the canonization of
Elizabeth. It begins as an antiphonal chorus ("Mid Tears and Solemn
Mourning"), the female chorus answering the male and closing in unison.
Once more the Crusaders' March is heard in the orchestra as the knights
sing, "O Thou whose Life-blood streamed." The church choir sings the
chorale, "Decorata novo flore," the Hungarian and German bishops intone
their benedictions, and then all join in the powerful and broadly
harmonious hymn, "Tu pro nobis Mater pia," closing with a sonorous and
majestic "Amen."




                                Christus.


"Christus, oratorio, with texts from the Holy Scriptures and the Catholic
Liturgy," as Liszt entitles his work, was finished in 1866. At the outset
the composer selected the "Hymn of Praise" and "Pater Noster" from
Rüchert's "Evangelical Harmony;" and upon these and one or two other
detached numbers for a background, he built up a series of religious
events connected with the offices of the Church according to the Vulgate
and its Liturgy. These events are laid out in three divisions,--"The
Christmas Oratorio," "After Epiphany," and "The Passion and
Resurrection;" the separate parts of which are as follows: (1) The
Introduction. (2) Pastoral and Vision of the Angels. (3) Stabat Mater
speciosa. (4) Song of the Shepherds in the Manger. (5) The Anointing of
the three Kings. (6) Hymn of Praise. (7) Pater Noster. (8) The
Establishment or Foundation of the Christian Church. (9) The Storm on the
Lake. (10) The Entry into Jerusalem. (11) Tristis est anima mea. (12)
Stabat Mater dolorosa. (13) Easter Hymn. (14) Resurrection of Christ. The
motive of the work is announced in Saint Paul's words to the Ephesians:
"But speaking the truth in love, may grow up into him in all things,
which is the head, even Christ."

The long instrumental introduction is constructed upon a theme
representative of a text from Isaiah, "Resound, ye Heavens above," many
times repeated, and leading to a pastoral which prepares the way for the
angelic announcement to the shepherds. This announcement is made in the
simple collect music by a soprano solo, and replied to by a female
chorus, first accompanied by string quartet, and then by full orchestra,
and leading to the full chorus, "Gloria in excelsis," a series of mighty
shouts, closing with a stately Hallelujah and a return of the orchestra
to the pastoral movement. The next division is the old Latin hymn,
"Stabat Mater speciosa," the Virgin at the cradle of our Lord,--a
six-part chorus in church style, accompanied by the organ, with solo
variations interspersed through it, and characterized by a lofty feeling
of devotion, especially in the "Inflammatus" and the majestic final
"Amen." The remaining numbers of the first part are entirely
instrumental, including the "Shepherd's Song at the Manger," a pastoral
full of beautiful effects, and "the Three Holy Kings," a march which is
majestic in its style and broad in its rhythm, and full of characteristic
color. The two numbers close the part in a brilliant and jubilant manner.

The second part opens with the "Seligkeiten" ("Hymn of Praise"), a grand
declamatory solo for baritone, accompanied by a six-part chorus, which,
like the next number, was written by Liszt in his younger days and
utilized in its present setting. The hymn is accompanied by organ
throughout, and is followed by the "Pater Noster," also with organ,--a
fervent, almost passionate, offering of prayer by the precentors and
congregation, closing with a mighty "Amen." In the next number--the
founding of the Church ("Tu es Petrus"), beginning with male chorus--the
orchestra resumes its work. The voices move on in stately manner until
the words, "Simon, son of Jona, lovest thou me?" are reached, when the
full chorus comes in with imposing effect. Of this number, Nohl says in
his fine analysis of "Christus:"--

  "The perishable, sinful world in all its aspects is here contrasted
  with an undoubting faith in an everlastingly constant higher ideal, to
  give it this name. That it is the spirit of the subject, not its mere
  perishable husk, is shown by the nature of the melody, which rises to
  the most powerful expression of the final victory of this spirit of
  love. Now again the full orchestra joins the double chorus; for the
  world, the whole world, is meant."

The next scene, entitled "The Wonder," is purely instrumental, and is a
marvellous picture of the storm upon the lake, which Nohl also
characterizes with reference to its inner meanings:--

  "The ninth scene is a marvel. 'The storms rage in contention,'--not the
  storms of the sea, but the storm of desires to which the weak of faith
  are exposed. It is not the outward marvel or superstition that is to be
  strengthened, but the faith of human nature in itself and its higher
  power and destiny. Hence the actual inner tranquillity when, after the
  raging orchestral tumult, 'a great stillness' succeeds Christ's words,
  which is ingeniously introduced with the motive of the 'Seligkeit,'
  because such inner purity alone bestows upon mankind effective power
  over the savage forces of the world."

"The Entrance into Jerusalem," a graphic instrumental prelude, introduces
a "Hosanna" for full chorus, followed by a "Benedictus" for mezzo-soprano
with chorus,--a splendidly constructed number, which closes the second
part in a style full of beauty and majesty.

The third part opens with the sorrowful scene, "Tristis est anima mea,"
Christ's sad words in the walk to Gethsemane,--an unutterably pathetic
solo, with an accompaniment which is a marvel of expressive
instrumentation. The next number is the old Middle-Age hymn, "Stabat
Mater dolorosa," in which Liszt has combined voices and instruments in a
manner, particularly in the "Inflammatus," almost overpowering. Solos,
duets, quartets, choruses, orchestra, and organ are all handled with
consummate skill. It has been aptly characterized as having the
dimensions of the "Last Judgment" in the Sistine Chapel. After the great
hymn is ended, another begins. It is the old Easter song, "O Filii et
Filiæ," written to be sung by boys with harmonium,--a joyous, sunny
chorus, dispersing the gloom of the "Stabat Mater." The last scene, "The
Resurrection," is a powerful and massive chorus, full of mighty accords,
typical of the final triumph of Christianity, and closing with a majestic
"Amen" built up on the opening motive of the original introduction. "It
is," says Nohl, "a cycle of scenes such as only the victorious mastery of
the subject by inward perception can give, and such as only the artist
can draw who dominates all the conditions apart like a king, and has
reconciled his soul with the absolute truth and power of the Eternal."




                               MACFARREN.


George Alexander Macfarren, one of the most prominent of modern English
composers, was born in London, March 2, 1813. He began the study of music
in 1827 under the tuition of Charles Lucas. Two year's later he entered
the Royal Academy of Music, and in 1834 became one of its professors. The
latter year dates the beginning of his career as a composer, his first
work having been a symphony in F minor. During the next thirty years his
important works were as follows: overture "Chevy Chase" (1836); "Devil's
Opera," produced at the Lyceum (1838); "Emblematical Tribute on the
Queen's Marriage" and an arrangement of Purcell's "Dido and Æneas"
(1840); editions of "Belshazzar," "Judas Maccabæus," and "Jephthah," for
the Handel Society (1843); opera "Don Quixote" (1846); opera "Charles
II." (1849); serenata "The Sleeper Awakened," and the cantata "Lenora"
(1851); the cantata "May Day," for the Bradford Festival (1856); the
cantata "Christmas" (1859); the opera "Robin Hood" (1860); the masque
"Freya's Gift" and opera "Jessy Lea" (1863); and the operas "She Stoops
to Conquer," "The Soldier's Legacy," and "Helvellyn" (1864). About the
last year his sight, which had been impaired for many years, failed. His
blindness did not however diminish his activity. He still served as
professor in the Royal Academy, and dictated compositions,--indeed some
of his best works were composed during this time of affliction. In 1873
appeared his oratorio, "St. John the Baptist," which met with an
enthusiastic reception at the Bristol Festival of that year. In 1875 he
was elected professor of music at Cambridge, to fill the vacancy
occasioned by the death of Sterndale Bennett, and in the same year was
also appointed principal of the Royal Academy of Music. In 1876 his
oratorio "The Resurrection" was performed at the Birmingham Festival, and
in 1877 the oratorio "Joseph" at Leeds, besides the cantata "The Lady of
the Lake" at Glasgow. Grove catalogues his other compositions as follows:
a cathedral service, anthems, chants, psalm-tunes, and introits for the
Holy Days and Seasons of the English Church (1866); "Songs in a
Cornfield" (1868); "Shakspeare Songs for Four Voices" (1860-64); songs
from Lane's "Arabian Nights," and Kingsley's and Tennyson's poems;
overtures to "The Merchant of Venice," "Romeo and Juliet," "Hamlet," and
"Don Carlos;" symphonies, string quartets, and a quintet; a concerto for
violin and orchestra; and sonatas for pianoforte alone, and in
combination with other instruments. As lecturer, writer, and critic, Sir
George Macfarren also holds a high place, among his important works being
"Rudiments of Harmony" (1860), and six Lectures on Harmony (1867); also
Analyses of Oratorios for the Sacred Harmonic Society (1853-57), and of
orchestral works for the Philharmonic Society (1869-71), besides numerous
articles in the musical dictionaries.




                          St. John the Baptist.


The oratorio "St. John the Baptist" was first produced at the Bristol
Musical Festival in 1873. The libretto was written by Dr. E. G. Monk, and
is divided into two parts,--the first styled "The Desert," and the second
"Machærus," to correspond with the localities where the action is
supposed to take place. The incidents described are John's preaching to
the people, the baptism of Christ, and the events which begin with
Herod's feast and close with the execution of the Prophet. One of the
best of the English critics, speaking of the libretto, says:--

  "John is thus shown in his threefold capacity, as the herald of the
  Kingdom of Heaven, as the uncompromising champion of righteousness, and
  as the witness of truth even unto death. Nothing could be more simple
  or more definite than this, and the discreetness it evinces is shown
  also by the manner in which the characters are treated. John, of
  course, is the central figure. He stands out clothed with all the noble
  attributes accredited to him in the Bible,--'stern and inflexible in
  his teaching, yet bowing before him whose message he had to
  promulgate.' A halo of grandeur surrounds the ascetic of the desert as
  he hurls anathemas upon the corruptors of Israel; or as, in the true
  spirit of the ancient prophets of his race, he rebukes Herod under the
  roof of that monarch's palace. No greater hero could a musician wish
  for as a source of inspiration, or as a means of exciting interest.
  Next to John stands the weak and voluptuous King,--a contrast as marked
  in character as in outward circumstance. The impulsive temperament of
  Herod is well brought out. One instant he resents John's boldness, and
  significantly exclaims, 'If I command to kill, they kill;' the next he
  trembles before his rebuker, and promises to amend his life. The
  rashness of the fatal vow to Salome, and the bitter but unavailing
  repentance to which it led, are also put well forward, while in matters
  of detail extreme care is taken to make the contrast of Prophet and
  King as great as circumstances permit. The part of Salome, who is the
  only other dramatic person, contains no more amplification of the Bible
  narrative than was exacted by the necessities of musical treatment. In
  structure, the libretto is partly dramatic, partly narrational, the
  dramatic form being employed in all the chief scenes; and as little use
  is made of 'Greek chorus,' the story marches without the halting
  rendered necessary by efforts to 'improve' its incidents as they
  arise."

The overture, which is very dramatic in character, is followed by a
powerful fugued chorus ("Behold! I will send My Messenger"), a part of
which is set to organ accompaniment. The Narrator (contralto) recites the
coming of the Prophet, in the orchestral prelude to which is a phrase
borrowed from an old church melody which Mendelssohn also used in his
Reformation Symphony, and which serves throughout the work as the motive
for the Prophet, in the genuine Wagner style. Saint John is introduced in
a rugged and massive baritone solo ("Repent ye, the Kingdom of Heaven is
at hand"), accompanied by very descriptive instrumentation. A dramatic
scene ensues, composed of inquiries as to the Prophet's mission by the
People, a short chorus by the latter ("What shall we do then?") which is
very melodic in style, and the resumption of the dialogue form, set to a
very skilful accompaniment. This scene is followed by a characteristic
aria for the Prophet, "I indeed baptize you with Water." The story is
once more taken up by the Narrator, who describes the baptism of Christ.
The words, "This is My Beloved Son," are given to a female choir, with
exquisite accompaniment by the violins and harps. A song for the Narrator
("In the Beginning was the Word") follows, and leads to the chorus, which
closes the first part, the words taken from the first verse of Psalm
civ., and the melody borrowed from the familiar old tune "Hanover," which
the composer has worked up with great skill and effect.

The second part opens in Herod's palace with the rebuke of the Monarch by
the Prophet. In this scene, as well as in others, the composer draws a
strong contrast in the music assigned to the two, the one being strong
and stern, the other sensuous, in style. In the duet, where Herod
confesses the error of his ways, the voices unite in a genuine religious
strain. The Narrator is once more introduced, and describes the feast
given by the Monarch to the Galilee estates, followed by a jubilant
chorus of Nobles ("O King, live forever!"), set to a brilliant
accompaniment, calling for the most ample orchestral resources. The next
number is a chorus for male voices ("Lo! the Daughter of Herodias cometh
in, she danceth!"), set to a dance rhythm with tambourines, the themes
being bits of Oriental melodies skilfully treated. We then have the
banquet-scene, the admiration of the Nobles for Salome's beauty, Herod's
oath, and Salome's joy expressed in a showy song ("I rejoice in my
youth"). Then follows the dramatic scene of Salome's request,--a
concerted number of great force in its treatment. Herod sings a mournful
aria ("Alas! my Daughter, thou hast brought us very low"). The Narrator
explains how the King was compelled to keep his word, and is followed by
the Nobles in a stirring chorus ("Lo! the Wrath of the King is as a
Messenger of Death"). The scene now changes to the dungeon, where the
Prophet sings his farewell song ("A Man can receive nothing"),
accompanied by orchestra and organ. The final tragedy is told by the
Narrator, and the work closes with two reflective numbers,--the beautiful
unaccompanied quartet, "Blessed are they which are persecuted," and the
chorus, "What went ye out into the Wilderness for to see?" The
above-mentioned critic, who was present at its first performance, says of
the work:--

  "It is a strange thing that John the Baptist has not often attracted
  the notice of musical composers in search of a subject. No more
  remarkable personage, with one great exception, figures in Bible
  history than he whom the Master described as 'more than a prophet.' His
  striking appearance, stern asceticism, wrathful denunciation of
  'wickedness in high places,' and tragic fate,--not to speak of his
  relation to One whose shoes he professed himself unworthy to
  loose,--throw his form into bold relief, and mark him as of heroic
  proportions. Yet, save that he holds a subordinate place in a very
  limited number of works, among which is Sir Julius Benedict's 'St.
  Peter,' the great forerunner has been passed over till now. At length,
  however, in that 'fulness of time' which ever brings forth the best
  results, the Man and his Life have found a musical illustrator. There
  is now an oratorio of 'John the Baptist,'--a work worthy its theme, and
  to which the stamp of enthusiastic approval has been affixed by the
  unanimous verdict of an audience competent to judge."




                               MACKENZIE.


Alexander C. Mackenzie, one of the very few successful Scotch composers,
was born at Edinburgh in 1847. His father was a musician; and recognizing
his son's talent, sent him to Germany at the age of ten. He began his
studies with Ulrich Eduard Stein at Schwartzburg-Sonderhausen, and four
years later entered the ducal orchestra as violinist. He remained there
until 1862, when he went to England to study the violin with M. Sainton.
In the same year he was elected king's scholar of the Royal Academy of
Music. Three years later he returned to Edinburgh and established himself
as a piano-teacher. The main work of his life, however, has been
composition, and to this he has devoted himself with assiduity and
remarkable success. Grove catalogues among his works: "Cervantes, an
overture for orchestra;" a scherzo for ditto; overture to a comedy; a
string quintet and many other pieces in MS.; pianoforte quartet in B, op.
11; Trois Morceaux pour Piano, op. 15; two songs, op. 12; besides songs,
part-songs, anthems, and pieces for the piano. This catalogue, however,
does not include his two most important works,--a Scotch Rhapsody,
introduced into this country by the Theodore Thomas orchestra, a
composition of great merit, and the oratorio, "The Rose of Sharon," which
has been received with extraordinary favor wherever it has been
performed.




                           The Rose of Sharon.


"The Rose of Sharon," a dramatic oratorio founded on the Song of Solomon,
the words selected from the Scriptures and arranged by Joseph Bennett,
was first brought out at the Norwich Festival, England, Oct. 16, 1884,
under the direction of the composer, and was subsequently performed in
London by the Sacred Harmonic Society. Its first performance in Scotland
took place at Glasgow, Dec. 8, 1885, under the auspices of the Glasgow
Choral Union, Madame Albani, Miss Hilda Wilson, Mr. Edward Lloyd, and Mr.
Watkins Mills being the principal vocalists. One notice of this
performance says: "The enthusiastic reception of the work on this
occasion was beyond all description; the composer was recalled after each
part with cheers that must have made his heart leap with delight." At the
first performance at Norwich he was showered with flowers by the chorus,
while the whole audience rose and greeted him with prolonged cheering. In
speaking of the text, its  compiler says:--

  "In adopting for the purposes of this oratorio a reading of the 'Song
  of Songs' upon which Ewald and Renan substantially agree, the compiler
  of the libretto favored no controversial opinion. He simply saw in the
  ingenious commentaries of the learned Hebraists suggestions for a story
  of unconquerable love, capable of expression in the language of the
  Bible.

  "For the arrangement of incident the compiler is alone responsible. In
  some respects it departs widely from the original poem,--which opens,
  for example, in Jerusalem,--and gives only in narrative the events that
  occupy part one of the oratorio.

  "In taking a story from a canonical book of Holy Scripture, the
  compiler could not ignore its spiritual significance. He has,
  therefore, introduced a prologue suggesting the parabolic character of
  the drama, and an epilogue which points its moral."

The characters are the Rose of Sharon, designated throughout the work as
the Sulamite (soprano); a Woman (contralto); the Beloved (tenor); and
Solomon (baritone); the chorus representing Officers of the Court,
Princes, Nobles, Villagers, Elders, and Soldiers. The story, briefly
told, is one of the power of love. The Beloved and Solomon are both in
love with the Sulamite, and the king tears her from the former to be the
favorite among the women of the harem. Amid all the splendors of the
palace and the luxuries heaped upon her by her passionate admirer she
remains true to the Beloved, is ultimately restored to him, and returns
to the vineyards of Sulam. The work is divided as follows: Prologue; Part
I. Separation; II. Temptation; III. Victory; IV. Reunion; V. Epilogue.
The motto of the oratorio is "Love is strong as death, and unconquerable
as the grave." This motto has its musical theme as well as each of the
three principal characters, and they are invariably used with great skill
and effect. The Woman acts the part of Narrator, and after a brief
orchestral prelude she is heard declaring the meaning and spiritual
significance of the story in the prologue:

      "We will open our mouth in a parable;
      We will utter dark sayings of old,
      Which we have heard and known,
      Which our fathers have told us;
      We will not hide them from our children,
      That the generation to come may know them,
      Who shall declare them to their children.

  This is a great mystery; but we speak concerning Christ and his
Church."

The oratorio opens in the vineyard of Sulam as the Vine-dressers come
forth to their labor. The orchestral part begins with the melody of the
Vineyard Song ("We will take the Foxes"), and serves to introduce their
chorus, a joyous pastoral ("Come, let us go forth into the Field"). As
they disappear, the voice of the Beloved is heard singing a tender and
passionate appeal beneath the Sulamite's lattice ("Rise up, rise up, my
Love") as he urges her to join him, "For lo! the winter is past; the rain
is over and gone." Her reply follows from within her chamber, full of
love and adoration, and closing with the Vineyard Song ("We will take the
Foxes, the little Foxes that ravage the Vines"). She descends from her
chamber and joins the Beloved, and their voices unite in a delightful
duet ("Come, Beloved, into the Garden of Nuts"). Once more the chorus of
the Vine-dressers is heard, and at its close, after an intermezzo
descriptive of the joys of a spring morning, the scene changes to
Lebanon. A short alto solo announces the coming of Solomon, and the
pastoral music is followed by a brilliant and stately processional march,
accompanied by chorus ("God save the King!"). Solomon beholds the
Sulamite, and pours forth his admiration in a rapturous song ("Thou art
lovely, O my Friend, as Thirza"). The Princes and Nobles also testify to
their admiration of her beauty. A very dramatic scene ensues, in which
the Beloved and the Sulamite seek to escape "out of the caves of the lion
and from the haunt of the leopard." She is brought back by an elder, and
again Solomon pleads his cause in a passionate declamation ("Unto my
charger in Pharaoh's stud I would compare thee, O my friend"). She
replies, "My Beloved is to me a nosegay of myrrh," and clings to her
lover, who once more seeks to escape with her; whereupon she is seized
and placed in one of the king's chariots, and the cavalcade moves off to
the brilliant strains of the cortège music, accompanied by the chorus.

The second part, "Temptation," introduces us to Solomon's palace, where
the Sulamite is alone, pining for her lover. The scene opens with the
psalm, "The Lord is my Shepherd," set to a simple, charming melody, full
of the spirit of devotion, but entirely disconnected with the general
texture of the work. As the touching strain comes to an end, the Women of
the court enter, insidiously plead the cause of Solomon, tempt her with
his luxuries, and seek to shame her love for the Beloved. "Kings'
daughters shall be among thine honorable women; thy clothing shall be of
wrought gold; thou shalt be brought unto the king in raiment of
needlework, with gladness and rejoicing shalt thou be brought and enter
into the king's palace," sings one of the Women; but the Sulamite remains
loyal, and only answers: "My Beloved pastures his flocks among the
lilies. My Beloved is mine, and I am his." The temptation is interrupted
by the procession of the ark passing in the street below to the glad
acclaim of the people ("Make a joyful Noise unto the Lord, all ye
Lands"), and a brilliant march. Successively the Maidens of Jerusalem
with timbrels, the Elders, the Shepherds and Vine-dressers, the Soldiers,
the Priests bearing the sacred vessels pass by, singing tributes of
praise to the Lord; and as the Levites appear bearing the ark, and
Solomon comes in sight with all his retinue, the entire chorus
triumphantly repeat "God save the King!" The brilliant procession passes
from view. The Women once more appeal to the Sulamite; but she still
loyally declares: "My Beloved pastures his flocks among the lilies; lo!
Solomon in all his glory is not arrayed like one of these."

The third part, "Victory," opens with an orchestral prelude picturing the
sleep of the Sulamite, with her women watching about her. The voice of
the Beloved is heard without the chamber, "Open to me, my Sister, my
Bride." It reaches her in a dream, and in fancy she replies to him,
clothes herself, and searches for him in the streets; but when she
accosts the watchmen, they are so rude that her fright awakes her. She is
still a prisoner in the palace, and the Women about her announce the
coming of Solomon. He pleads his cause in a passionate song ("Ere the Day
cool and the Shadows flee away"); and she replies with another
protestation of her constancy in the solo, "Lo! a Vineyard hath Solomon
at Baal-hamon." The situation, which is very dramatic in its treatment,
is heightened by a duet and by the mocking chorus of Women; but above
them all still sings the brave Sulamite, "My Beloved is mine, and I am
his."

The fourth part brings us back again to the vineyards of Sulam. It opens
with a melancholy chorus of the Vine-dressers ("O Lord, be gracious unto
us"), lamenting her absence. It is followed by a bass solo ("Thus saith
the Lord") and a chorale in full broad harmony. At last the victorious
Sulamite is seen coming up from the valley leaning on the arm of the
Beloved. All join in a powerful and exultant chorus of gratitude and joy
("Sing, O Heavens, and be joyful, O Earth"). A rapturous duet ensues
between the Sulamite and the Beloved, and then all join in the spirited
finale:--

      "For the flame of Love is as fire,
      Even the fire of God.
      Many waters cannot quench it,
      Neither can floods drown it.
      Yea, Love is strong as death,
      And unconquerable as the grave."




                              MENDELSSOHN.


Felix Mendelssohn Bartholdy, the son of a Berlin banker, was born at
Hamburg, Feb. 3, 1809, and, unlike almost all other composers, was reared
in the lap of luxury. Every advantage which wealth could procure he
enjoyed, with the result that he became highly educated in the other arts
as well as in music. His teachers in music were Zelter and Ludwig Berger,
and he made such progress that in his ninth year he appeared in public as
a pianist in Berlin, and afterwards in Paris. The first of his
compositions to attract general notice were the overture to Shakspeare's
"Midsummer Night's Dream" and the little opera "The Marriage of Camacho,"
which were brought out in Berlin in 1827. After several concert tours, in
which he met with great success, he resided for some time in Düsseldorf.
In 1835 he went to Leipsic as director of the famous Gewandhaus
concerts,--which are still given in that city. Two years later he married
Cécile Jeanrenaud, the beautiful daughter of a minister of the Reformed
Church in Frankfort, and shortly afterwards went to Berlin as general
director of church music. In 1843 he returned to his former post in
Leipsic, and also took a position in the newly established Conservatory,
where he spent the remainder of his days in company with his family, to
whom he was closely attached. He has left a large and rich collection of
musical works, which are favorites the world over. His three great
oratorios are the "Hymn of Praise," catalogued as a symphony-cantata,
"St. Paul," and "Elijah." The last is specially interesting, as it marked
a new departure from the conventional forms of oratorio, and gave the
widest scope to the dramatic elements,--to such a degree, in fact, that
it might with propriety be styled a sacred opera. Besides these
oratorios, his exquisite music to the "Midsummer Night's Dream," which is
familiar the world over, and his stately dramatic music to "Antigone," he
has left five symphonies, of which the "Scotch," the "Italian," and the
"Reformation" are best known; four exquisite overtures, "Ruy Blas," "Calm
Sea and Prosperous Voyage," "Hebrides," and "Melusina;" the very dramatic
cantata, "The Walpurgis Night;" a long list of beautiful songs for one or
more voices; the incidental music to Racine's "Athalia;" a very large
collection of sacred music, such as psalms, hymns, anthems, and cantatas;
several beautiful trios and other specimens of chamber-music; and the
lovely "Songs without Words," which are to be found upon almost every
piano, the beauty and freshness of which time has not impaired.
Mendelssohn never wrote a grand opera, owing to his fastidiousness as to
a libretto; though he finally obtained one from Geibel, on the subject of
the "Loreley," which suited him. He had begun to write it, and had
finished the finale to the first act, when death interrupted his work,
Nov. 4, 1847. Mendelssohn was a man of remarkable beauty, and his
character corresponded to his charm of person. He had a liberal
education, was a man of broad culture, a clever artist, and a very
skilful writer, as is shown by his volumes of letters from Italy and
Switzerland. Possessed of these graces of mind and person, and having all
the advantages that wealth could bestow, he lacked those incentives which
in other composers have brought out the deepest, highest, and most
majestic forms of musical expression. His music is a reflex of his life;
grace, elegance, culture, and finish are its characteristics.




                                St. Paul.


"St. Paul," the first of Mendelssohn's oratorios, was begun in Düsseldorf
and finished in Leipsic in the winter of 1835, the composer being then in
his twenty-sixth year. He first applied to Marx to write the text; but
the invitation was declined, on the ground that the chorales were
unsuited to the period of the narrative. Mendelssohn then consulted with
his friends Fürst and Schubring, and the libretto as it now stands
represents their joint compilation. Its three principal themes are the
martyrdom of Saint Stephen, the conversion of Saint Paul, and the
apostle's subsequent career. One of the clearest statements of the
general character of the work is that given by Lampadius; he says:--

  "The main thought which runs through the whole work is too high and
  broad to be linked by the tie of a personal interest to any single man.
  It is the glorification of Christianity, with its humility, its joy in
  living and dying for the Lord, in contrast with the blind
  self-righteousness of Judaism and the mere sensuous morality of the
  heathen schools. It is the contrast, or rather the struggle, of the
  last two with the former, and the victory of the light and love of the
  Gospel,--the light eternal, the love divine. This thought is made
  incarnate in the persons of Stephen, Paul, and Barnabas, and it is
  concentrated at that point which is really the central point of
  interest to the oratorio,--the conversion of Saint Paul."

The work was written upon a commission given by the Cecilien Verein of
Frankfort in 1831; but it was not produced until May 22, 1836, on the
occasion of the Lower Rhine Festival at Düsseldorf. The principal parts
were sung by Madame Fischer-Achten, Mademoiselle Grabau, Herren Schmetzer
and Wersing, the latter artist taking the part of Paul. The second
performance was given at Liverpool, Oct. 3, 1836; and between the two
performances Mendelssohn revised the work and cut out fourteen numbers.

After a long and expressive overture for orchestra and organ, the first
part opens with a strong and exultant chorus ("Lord! Thou alone art
God"). It is massively constructed, and in its middle part runs into a
restless, agitated theme ("The Heathen furiously rage"). It closes,
however, in the same energetic and jubilant manner which characterizes
its opening, and leads directly to a chorale ("To God on High"), set to a
famous old German hymn-book tune, "Allein Gott in der Höh' sei Ehr,"
which is serenely beautiful in its clearly flowing harmony. The martyrdom
of Stephen follows. The basses in vigorous recitative accuse him of
blasphemy, and the people break out in an angry chorus ("Now this Man
ceaseth not to utter blasphemous Words"). At its close Stephen sings a
brief but beautiful solo ("Men, Brethren, and Fathers!"); and as the calm
protest dies away, again the full chorus gives vent to a tumultuous shout
of indignation ("Take him away"). A note of warning is heard in the
fervent soprano solo, "Jerusalem, thou that killest the Prophets;" but it
is of no avail. Again the chorus hurls its imprecations more furiously
than before ("Stone him to death"). The tragedy occurs. A few bars of
recitative for tenor, full of pathos, tell the sad story, and then
follows another beautiful chorale of submission ("To Thee, O Lord, I
yield my Spirit"). Saul's participation in the tragedy is barely touched
upon. The lament for Stephen is followed by the chorus, "Happy and blest
are they," which is beautifully melodious in character. Saul now appears,
"breathing out threatenings and slaughter" against the apostles. His
first aria ("Consume them all") is a bass solo which is fiery in its
energy. It is followed by the lovely arioso for alto, "But the Lord is
mindful of His own,"--fitting companion to the equally beautiful "O rest
in the Lord" from "Elijah," and much resembling it in general style. Then
occurs the conversion. The voice from heaven ("Saul, Saul, why
persecutest thou Me?") is represented, as was often done in the
passion-music, by the soprano choir, which gives it peculiar significance
and makes it stand out in striking contrast with the rest of the work. A
forcible orchestral interlude, worked up in a strong crescendo, leads to
the vigorous chorus, "Rise up! arise!" in which the powerful orchestral
climax adds great strength to the vocal part. It is a vigorously
constructed chorus, and is followed by a chorale ("Sleepers, wake! a
Voice is calling"), which still further heightens the effect by its
trumpet notes between the lines. At the close of the imposing harmony the
music grows deeper and more serious in character as Saul breathes out his
prayer, "O God, have Mercy upon me;" and again, after the message of
forgiveness and mercy delivered by Ananias, more joyful and exultant in
the bass solo with chorus ("I praise Thee, O Lord, my God"), Saul
receives his sight, and straightway begins his ministrations. A grand
reflective chorus ("O great is the Depth of the Riches of Wisdom"),
strong and jubilant in character, and rising to a powerful climax, closes
the first part.

The second part opens with the five-part chorus, "The Nations are now the
Lord's,"--a clear fugue, very stately and dignified in its style,
leading, after a tenor and bass duet ("Now all are Ambassadors in the
Name of Christ"), to the beautifully melodious chorus, "How lovely are
the Messengers that preach us the Gospel of Peace," and the equally
beautiful soprano arioso, "I will sing of Thy great Mercies." After the
chorus, "Thus saith the Lord," and a second tumultuous chorus expressive
of rage and scorn ("Is this He who in Jerusalem"), another chorale occurs
("O Thou, the true and only Light"), in which the Church prays for
direction. The tenor recitative announcing the departure of Paul and
Barnabas to the Gentiles, followed by the tenor and bass duet, "For so
hath the Lord Himself commanded," bring us to the scene of the sacrifice
at Lystra, in which the two choruses, "The Gods themselves as Mortals,"
and "O be gracious, ye Immortals," are full of genuine Greek sensuousness
and in striking contrast with the seriousness and majestic character of
the harmony in the Christian chorus ("But our God abideth in Heaven")
which follows. Once more the Jews interfere, in the raging, wrathful
chorus, "This is Jehovah's Temple." In a pathetic tenor aria ("Be thou
faithful unto Death") Paul takes a sorrowful leave of his brethren, and
in response comes an equally tender chorus, "Far be it from thy Path."
Two stately choruses ("See what Love hath the Father," and "Now only unto
Him") close the work.




                             Hymn of Praise.


The "Lobgesang" ("Hymn of Praise") was written at Leipsic in 1840, the
occasion which gave birth to it being the fourth centennial celebration
of the art of printing. The musical features of the festival were
intrusted to Mendelssohn, the ceremonies occupying two days, June 24 and
25 of the above year. On the evening of the 23d there was a performance
of Lortzing's opera, "Hans Sachs," written for the occasion. On the
morning of the 24th there was a service in the church, followed by the
unveiling of the statue of Guttenberg in the public square, and an
open-air performance of the composer's "Festgesang" for two choirs, with
trombone accompaniment, David conducting one choir, and Mendelssohn the
other. In the afternoon of the 25th the "Hymn of Praise" was given for
the first time in St. Thomas's Church, preceded by Weber's "Jubilee
Overture" and Handel's "Dettingen Te Deum." Lampadius, who was present at
the performance, says:--

  "The work called out the greatest enthusiasm, which could hardly be
  repressed within bounds even by the fact that the audience were seated
  within the walls of a church. After the first duet a subdued whisper of
  applause ran through the edifice and betrayed the suppressed delight of
  the listeners. On one of the evenings following, a torchlight
  procession was made in honor of the great composer. Mendelssohn, who
  then lived in Lurgenstein's Garden, appeared at the window, his face
  lighted up with joy. 'Gentlemen,' he said in his neat, quiet way, with
  a sensible trembling of the voice, 'you know that it is not my manner
  to make many words; but I heartily thank you.' A loud 'Hoch!' three
  times shouted, was our reply."

Its next performance was at Birmingham, Sept. 23, 1840, Mendelssohn
himself conducting. After this performance it was considerably changed,
and the whole scene of the watchman was added. The idea occurred to him
after a sleepless night, during which, as he informed a friend, the
words, "Will the night soon pass?" incessantly came into his mind.

The title given to the "Hymn of Praise," "a symphony-cantata," was first
suggested by his friend Carl Klingemann, of London, as will be seen by
the following interesting extract from a letter written by Mendelssohn to
him, Nov. 18, 1840:--

  "My 'Hymn of Praise' is to be performed the end of this month for the
  benefit of old invalided musicians. I am determined, however, that it
  shall not be produced in the imperfect form in which, owing to my
  illness, it was given in Birmingham; so that makes me work hard. Four
  new pieces are to be added, and I have also much improved the three
  sets of symphonies, which are now in the hands of the copyist. As an
  introduction to the chorus, 'The Night is passed,' I have found far
  finer words in the Bible, and admirably adapted to the music. By the
  by, you have much to answer for in the admirable title you hit on so
  cleverly; for not only have I sent forth the piece into the world as a
  symphony-cantata, but I have serious thoughts of resuming the first
  'Walpurgis Night' (which has been so long lying by me) under the same
  cognomen, and finishing and getting rid of it at last. It is singular
  enough that at the very first suggestion of this idea I should have
  written to Berlin that I was resolved to compose a symphony with a
  chorus. Subsequently I had not courage to begin, because the three
  movements were too long for an introduction; and yet I never could
  divest myself of the impression that something was wanting in the shape
  of an introduction. Now the symphony is to be inserted according to my
  original intention, and the piece brought out at once."

The text to the "Hymn of Praise" is not in narrative form, nor has it any
particular dramatic significance. It is what its name indicates,--a
tribute of praise. Lampadius says the composer undertook to show "the
triumph at the creation of light over darkness. With his pious and
believing heart he could easily enter into that theme, and show with
matchless power and skill the closing-in of those ancient foes, and the
victory of light when darkness cowered and ignobly shrank away." The
expression of delight over this victory is very well brought out, not
only in the music, but also in the arrangement of the Scriptural texts,
which begin with exhortations of praise, and appeals to those who have
been in distress and affliction to trust the Lord. The tenor, who may be
regarded as the Narrator, calls upon the Watchman, "What of the night?"
The response comes that the night has passed. In exultation over the
victory, once more the text ascribes praise to the Lord. "All that has
life and breath" sings to His name.

The symphony is in three parts, beginning with a maestoso movement, in
which the trombones at once give out the choral motive, "All that has
life and breath sing to the Lord,"--a favorite theme of Mendelssohn. This
movement, which is strong and energetic in character, is followed by an
allegretto based upon a beautiful melody, and to this in turn succeeds an
adagio religioso rich in harmony. The symphony clearly reflects the
spirit of the cantata, which follows. The opening chorus ("All that has
Life and Breath") is based upon the choral motive, and enunciates the
real hymn of praise. It moves along in a stately manner, and finally
leads without break into a semi-chorus, "Praise thou the Lord, O my
Spirit," a soprano solo with accompaniment of female voices. The tenor in
a long dramatic recitative ("Sing ye Praise, all ye redeemed of the
Lord") urges the faithful to join in praise and extol His goodness, and
the chorus responds, first, the tenors, and then all the parts, in a
beautiful number, "All ye that cried unto the Lord." The next number is
an exquisite duet for soprano and alto with chorus ("I waited for the
Lord"). It is thoroughly devotional in style, and in its general color
and effect reminds one of the arias, "O Rest in the Lord" from "Elijah,"
and "The Lord is mindful of His own" from "St. Paul." This duet is
followed by a sorrowful, almost wailing tenor solo, "The Sorrows of Death
had closed all around me," ending with the piercing, anxious cry in
recitative, "Watchman! will the Night soon pass?" set to a restless,
agitated accompaniment and thrice repeated. Like a flash from a cloud
comes the quick response of the chorus, "The Night is departing," which
forms the climax of the work. The chorus is beautifully constructed, and
very impressive in its effect. At first the full chorus proclaims the
night's departure; it then takes the fugal form on the words, "Therefore
let us cast off the works of darkness," which is most effectively worked
out.

In the finale the male voices are massed on the declaration, "The Night
is departing," and the female voices on the response, "The Day is
approaching;" and after alternating repetitions all close in broad,
flowing harmony. This chorus leads directly to the chorale, "Let all Men
praise the Lord," sung first without accompaniment, and then in unison
with orchestra. Another beautiful duet, "My Song shall alway be Thy
Mercy," this time for soprano and tenor, follows, and prepares the way
for the final fugued chorus, "Ye Nations, offer to the Lord," a massive
number, stately in its proportions and impressive in its effect, and
closing with a fortissimo delivery of the splendid choral motive, "All
that has Life and Breath."

Notwithstanding that the choral part is brief as compared with the "St.
Paul" and "Elijah," there are many critics who are inclined to pronounce
the "Hymn of Praise" Mendelssohn's greatest work. In its combination of
the symphony and the voice parts, the one growing out of the other and
both so intimately connected, it stands almost alone. Some critics have
condemned Mendelssohn for imitating Beethoven's Choral Symphony, though
in that colossal work the chorus is not only subordinate to the symphony,
but is even trifling in length as compared with it, and very inferior in
style. While in Mendelssohn's work the symphony is subordinated to the
choral part, and serves only as an introduction to it, they are yet
conventionally connected; but in Beethoven's work the chorus was the
product of necessity, as the idea could not have been developed without
it. The instruments had gone as far as possible; the voices _must_ speak.




                                 Elijah.


"Elijah," the most admired of all Mendelssohn's compositions, was
finished in 1846. The plan of the work was first considered in 1837, and
was discussed with his friend Klingemann in London. During the next year
he had frequent consultations with another friend, Schubring, as to the
preparation of the book, and many of the passages were selected and
scenes sketched out; but it was not until 1840 that he really began to
put it into shape. We learn by a letter that in 1842 he was still at work
upon the book itself. Two years later he received an invitation to
conduct the Birmingham Festival of 1846; and it was evidently at that
time he decided to prepare the work for that occasion. We learn by
another letter that on the 23d of May, 1846, the entire first part and
six or eight numbers of the second part were sent to London to a Mr.
Bartholomew, who was engaged translating the text into English. That
Mendelssohn himself was pleased with his work is evident from his own
words, written to a friend after he had finished the first part: "I am
jumping about my room for joy. If it only turns out half as good as I
fancy, how pleased I shall be!" By the latter part of July the entire
oratorio was in the hands of Mr. Bartholomew, and on August 18
Mendelssohn himself arrived in London and immediately began the
rehearsals. The work was first performed on the 26th at Birmingham,
coming between Haydn's "Creation" on the 25th, and Handel's "Messiah" on
the 27th, the latter oratorio being followed by Beethoven's Mass in D. A
correspondent who was present writes:--

  "How shall I describe what to-day has been in the Music Hall? After
  such an intense enjoyment it is a hard task to express one's feelings
  in cold words. It was a great day for the festival, a great day for the
  performers, a great day for Mendelssohn, a great day for art. Four
  da-capos in the first part, four in the second, making eight encores,
  and at the close the calling out of the composer,--are significant
  facts when one considers that it was the rigid injunction of the
  Committee that the public should not testify its approval by applause.
  But the enthusiasm would be checked by no rules; when the heart is
  full, regulations must stand aside. It was a noble scene, the hall
  filled with men, the galleries gay with ladies, like so many
  tulip-beds, added to the princely music and their thundering bravas."

Mendelssohn himself on the day after the performance writes to his
brother in Berlin:--

  "No work of mine ever went so admirably the first time of execution, or
  was received with such enthusiasm by both the musicians and the
  audience, as this oratorio. It was quite evident at the first rehearsal
  in London that they liked it, and liked to sing and play it; but I own
  I was far from anticipating that it would acquire such fresh vigor and
  impetus at the performance. Had you only been there! During the whole
  two hours and a half that it lasted, the large hall, with its two
  thousand people, and the large orchestra were all so fully intent on
  the one object in question that not the slightest sound was to be heard
  among the whole audience, so that I could sway at pleasure the enormous
  orchestra and choir, and also the organ accompaniments. How often I
  thought of you during the time! more especially, however, when 'the
  sound of abundance of rain' came, and when they sang and played the
  final chorus with _furore_, and when, after the close of the first
  part, we were obliged to repeat the whole movement. Not less than four
  choruses and four airs were encored, and not one single mistake
  occurred in the first part; there were some afterwards in the second
  part, but even these were but trifling. A young English tenor[6] sang
  the last air with such wonderful sweetness that I was obliged to
  collect all my energies, not to be affected, and to continue beating
  time steadily."

Notwithstanding his delight with the performance, he was not satisfied
with the oratorio as a whole. He made numerous changes and re-wrote
portions of the work,--indeed there was scarcely a movement that was not
retouched. It is interesting to note in this connection that the
beautiful trio, "Lift thine Eyes," was originally a duet, and very
different in character. The first performance of the work in London took
place April 16, 1847, when it was given by the Sacred Harmonic Society.
Her Majesty and Prince Albert were in attendance; and after the
performance the Prince sent to Mendelssohn the score which he had used in
following the music, with the following tribute written in it:--

  To the noble artist who, surrounded by the Baal-worship of corrupted
  art, has been able by his genius and science to preserve faithfully,
  like another Elijah, the worship of true art, and once more to accustom
  our ear, lost in the whirl of an empty play of sounds, to the pure
  notes of expressive composition and legitimate harmony; to the great
  master who makes us conscious of the unity of his conception through
  the whole maze of his creation, from the soft whispering to the mighty
  raging of the elements.

  Written in token of grateful remembrance by

                                                                 Albert.

  Buckingham Palace, April 24, 1847.

The text was mainly compiled from the First Book of Kings, and was
translated, as has been said, by Mr. Bartholomew. Hiller says that the
idea of the oratorio was first suggested by the verse in the nineteenth
chapter, "Behold, the Lord passed by," and that Mendelssohn, while
reading it, remarked to him, "Would not that be splendid for an
oratorio?" The prominent scenes treated are the drought prophecy, the
raising of the widow's son, the rival sacrifices, the appearance of the
rain in answer to Elijah's appeal, Jezebel's persecution of Elijah, the
sojourn in the desert, his return, his disappearance in the fiery
chariot, and the finale, which reflects upon the meaning of the sacred
narrative. The scenes themselves indicate the dramatic character of the
oratorio. In this respect, indeed, Mendelssohn may almost be said to have
created a new school of oratorio construction. "Elijah" could be placed
upon the stage with scenery, costume, and properties as a sacred opera,
and make a powerful impression,--almost as much so, indeed, as Rossini's
"Moses." Mendelssohn's own testimony on this point is interesting. In a
letter written  Nov. 2, 1838, to Pastor Julius Schubring, who was
assisting him in the preparation of the book, he says:--

  "I figured to myself Elijah as a grand, mighty prophet, such as we
  might again require in our own day,--energetic and zealous, but also
  stern, wrathful, and gloomy; a striking contrast to the court myrmidons
  and popular rabble,--in fact, in opposition to the whole world, and yet
  borne on angel's wings.... I am anxious to do justice to the dramatic
  element, and, as you say, no epic narrative must be introduced.... I
  would fain see the dramatic element more prominent, as well as more
  exuberant and defined,--appeal and rejoinder, question and answer,
  sudden interruptions, etc."

Again, on the 6th of December, he writes:--

  "In such a character as that of Elijah, like every one in the Old
  Testament (except, perhaps, Moses), it appears to me that the dramatic
  should predominate, the personages should be introduced as acting and
  speaking with fervor,--not, however, for Heaven's sake, to become mere
  musical pictures, but inhabitants of a positive, practical world such
  as we see in every chapter of the Old Testament; and the contemplative
  and pathetic element, which you desire, must be entirely conveyed to
  our apprehension by the words and the mood of the acting personages."

The introduction to the oratorio is prefaced by a brief but very
impressive recitative,--Elijah's prophecy of the drought; leading
directly to the overture, a sombre, despairing prelude, picturing the
distress which is to follow as the curse settles down upon the streams
and valleys. At last the suffering is voiced in the opening chorus
("Help, Lord"), which, after three passionate appeals, moves along in
plaintive beauty, developing phrase after phrase of touching appeal, and
leading to a second chorus, with duet for two sopranos ("Lord, bow Thine
Ear to our Prayer"), the choral part of which is an old Jewish chant,
sung alternately by the male and female voices in unison. It is followed
by Obadiah's lovely tenor aria, "If with all your Hearts," full of
tenderness and consolation. Again the People break out into a chorus of
lamentation ("Yet doth the Lord see it not"), which at the close develops
into a chorale of graceful and serene beauty ("For He the Lord our God").
Then follows the voice of an Angel summoning Elijah to the brook of
Cherith, leading to the beautiful double quartet, "For He shall give His
Angels Charge over thee," the melody of which is simple, but full of
animation, and worked up with a skilful effect. Again the Angel summons
Elijah to go to the Widow's house at Zarephath. The dramatic scene of the
raising of her son ensues, comprising a passionate song by the mother
("What have I to do with thee?") and the noble declaration of the
prophet, "Give me thy Son," and closing with the reflective chorus,
"Blessed are the Men who fear Him."

In the next scene we have the appearance of Elijah before Ahab, and the
challenge of the Priests of Baal to the sacrifice on Mount Carmel, set
forth in vigorous recitative, accompanied by short choral outbursts. At
the words of Elijah, "Invoke your forest gods and mountain deities," the
Priests of Baal break out into the stirring double-chorus, "Baal, we cry
to thee," which is fairly sensual and heathenish in its rugged, abrupt
melodies, as compared with the Christian music. At its close Elijah bids
them "call him louder, for he is a god; he talketh, or he is pursuing."
Again they break out into a chorus of barbaric energy ("Hear our Cry, O
Baal"), in the intervals of which Elijah taunts them again and again with
the appeal, "Call him louder." The Priests renew their shouts, each time
with increasing force, "pausing in vain for the reply, and closing with a
rapid, almost angry expostulation ("Hear and answer"). Then follows the
calm, dignified prayer of the prophet ("Lord God of Abraham"), succeeded
by a simple, but beautiful chorale ("Cast thy Burden upon the Lord"). It
is the moment of quiet before the storm which is to come. He calls for
the fire to descend upon the altar, and a chorus of passionate energy
replies, "The Fire descends from Heaven," accompanied by imitative music,
and closing with a brief movement in broad harmony. In fierce recitative
Elijah dooms the Priests of Baal to destruction, and after a short choral
reply sings the bass aria, "Is not His Word like a Fire?"--a song of
extraordinary difficulty, and requiring a voice of exceptional accuracy
and power for its proper performance. A lovely arioso for alto ("Woe unto
them") follows Elijah's vigorous declamation. These two arias are
connecting links between the fire chorus and the rain scene which ensues.
Obadiah summons Elijah to help the People, and Elijah replies in an
exquisite little andante passage, repeated by the chorus ("Open the
Heavens and send us Relief"). Then follows a dialogue-passage between the
prophet, the People, and the Youth, whom he bids "look toward the
sea,"--the most striking features of which are the responses of the Youth
and the orchestral climax as the heavens grow black and "the storm rushes
louder and louder." As the deluge of rain descends, the thankful People
break out into a passionate shout of delight ("Thanks be to God"), heard
above the tempest in the orchestra. At first it is a brief expression of
gratitude. The voices come to a pause, and Elijah repeats the tribute of
praise. Then all join in a surging tumult of harmony, as fresh and
delightful as was the pouring rain to the thirsty land, voices and
instruments vying with each other in joyful acclamations, until the end
is reached and the first part closes.

The second part opens with a brilliant soprano solo ("Hear ye, Israel"),
beginning with a note of warning, and then with trumpet obligato
developing into another melody of an impetuous and animated description
("I, I am He that comforteth"). The solo leads to the magnificent chorus,
"Be  not afraid," in which, after a short pause, the entire force of
voices, orchestra, and organ join in the sublime strain, sweeping on in
broad, full harmony. There is a pause of the voices for two bars, then
they move on in a strong fugue ("Though Thousands languish and fall"). At
its close they are all merged again in the grand announcement, "Be not
afraid," delivered with impetuosity, and ending with the same subject in
powerful chorale form. The scene which follows is intensely dramatic. The
prophet rebukes Ahab and condemns the Baal worship. Jezebel fiercely
accuses Elijah of conspiring against Israel, and the People in sharp,
impetuous phrases declare, "He shall perish," leading to the chorus, "Woe
to him!" After a few bars for the instruments, Obadiah, in an exquisite
recitative, counsels him to fly to the wilderness. In the next scene we
behold Elijah alone, and in a feeble but infinitely tender plaint he
resigns himself. It is hard to conceive anything grander and yet more
pathetic than this aria, "It is enough," in which the prophet prays for
death. A few bars of tenor recitative tell us that, wearied out, he has
fallen asleep ("See, now he sleepeth beneath a juniper-tree in the
wilderness, and there the angels of the Lord encamp round about all them
that fear Him"). It introduces the trio of the Angels, "Lift thine Eyes
to the Mountains," sung without accompaniment,--one of the purest,
loveliest, and most delightful of all vocal trios. An exquisite chorus
("He watching over Israel") follows, in which the second theme,
introduced by the tenors ("Shouldst thou, walking in Grief"), is full of
tender beauty; the trio and chorus are the perfection of dream-music. At
its close the Angel awakes Elijah, and once more we hear his pathetic
complaint, "O Lord, I have labored in vain; oh, that I now might die!" In
response comes an aria of celestial beauty, sung by the Angel ("Oh, rest
in the Lord"), breathing the very spirit of heavenly peace and
consolation,--an aria of almost matchless purity, beauty, and grace.
Firmly and with a certain sort of majestic severity follows the chorus,
"He that shall endure to the end." The next scene is one of the most
impressive and dramatic in the oratorio. Elijah no longer prays for
death; he longs for the divine presence. He hears the voice of the Angel:
"Arise now, get thee without, stand on the mount before the Lord; for
there His glory will appear and shine on thee. Thy face must be veiled,
for He draweth near." With great and sudden strength the chorus
announces: "Behold! God the Lord passed by." With equal suddenness it
drops to a pianissimo, gradually worked up in a crescendo movement, and
we hear the winds "rending the mountains around;" but once more in
pianissimo it tells us "the Lord was not in the tempest." The earthquake
and the fire pass by, each treated in a similar manner; but the Lord was
not in those elements. Then, in gentle tones of ineffable sweetness, it
declares, "After the fire there came a still, small voice, ... and in
that still, small voice onward came the Lord;" and onward sings the
chorus in low, sweet, ravishing tones to the end: "The Seraphim above Him
cried one to the other, Holy, holy, holy, is God the Lord!"--a double
chorus of majestic proportions. Once more Elijah goes on his way, no
longer dejected, but clothed with "the strength of the Lord." His aria,
"For the Mountains shall depart," prepares us for the final climax. In
strong accents the chorus announce, "Then did Elijah the prophet break
forth like a fire;" his words were like "burning torches;" he overthrew
kings; he stood on Sinai and heard the vengeance of the future on Horeb.
Then comes a significant pause. The basses begin, "And when the Lord
would take him away;" another brief pause, and the full chorus pictures
in vivid color the coming of the fiery chariot and the whirlwind by which
he was caught up into heaven. The picturesqueness and dramatic intensity
of this splendid chorus can hardly be described in words. One more tenor
aria ("Then, then shall the Righteous shine") and a brief soprano solo
introduce the chorus, "Behold My servant." A beautiful quartet ("Oh!
come, every one that thirsteth") follows, and the massive fugue, "And
then shall your Light break forth as the Light of the Morning," closes
this great masterpiece.

[6] Mr. Lockey was the tenor on this occasion; the part of Elijah was
  sung by Standigl.




                                Christus.


"Christus," which Mendelssohn intended as the third in the series with
"Elijah" and "St. Paul," was left unfinished. The words were written by
the Chevalier Bunsen and given to the composer in 1844, before he began
"Elijah." With his customary fastidiousness, he altered and rearranged
the text, and it was not until 1847, after "Elijah" was finished, that he
touched the music. At this time he was in delicate health, and had not
recovered from the shock of his sister's death. He sought consolation for
his troubles and relief for his ailments among the mountains of
Switzerland. Part of his time was devoted to mountain-rambling, and the
remainder to work upon "Christus" and the opera "Loreley," neither of
which he lived to finish.

It is interesting to note in this connection that before Mendelssohn
settled upon "Christus," the subject of Saint Peter occupied his
attention, although he still had the former in view for later
consideration. In a letter to his friend Schubring, written at
Bingen-on-the-Rhine, July 14, 1837, he says:--

  "I wish to ask your advice in a matter which is of importance to me,
  and I feel it will therefore not be indifferent to you either, having
  received so many proofs to the contrary from you. It concerns the
  selection of a subject of an oratorio which I intend to begin next
  winter. I am most anxious to have your counsels, as the best
  suggestions and contributions for the text of my 'St. Paul' came from
  you. Many very apparent reasons are in favor of choosing St. Peter as
  the subject,--I mean its being intended for the Düsseldorf Musical
  Festival at Whitsuntide, and the prominent position the feast of Whit
  Sunday would occupy in this subject. In addition to these grounds, I
  may add my wish (in connection with a greater plan for a later
  oratorio) to bring the two chief apostles and pillars of the Christian
  Church side by side in oratorios,--in short, that I should have a 'St.
  Peter' as well as a 'St. Paul.'"

Another extract from the same letter will show the keenness with which he
analyzed his themes. He writes:--

  "I need not tell you that there are sufficient internal grounds to make
  me prize the subject; and far above all else stands the outpouring of
  the Holy Ghost, which must form the central point or chief object. The
  question, therefore, is whether the place that Peter assumes in the
  Bible, divested of the dignity which he enjoys in the Catholic or
  Protestant Churches as a martyr, or the first Pope, etc.,--whether what
  is said of him in the Bible is alone and in itself sufficiently
  important to form the basis of a symbolical oratorio. For, according to
  my feeling, the subject must not be treated historically, however
  indispensable this was in the case of 'St. Paul.' In historic handling,
  Christ must appear in the earlier part of St. Peter's career; and where
  he appears, St. Peter could not lay claim to the chief interest. I
  think, therefore, it must be symbolical; though all the historical
  points might probably be introduced,--the betrayal and repentance, the
  keys of Heaven given him by Christ, his preaching at Pentecost,--not in
  an historical, but prophetic light, if I may so express myself, in
  close connection."

The project was never carried out; but the deep earnestness with which
Mendelssohn considered it shows how thoughtfully he must have devoted
himself to the scheme which took its place. Neither his letters nor his
biographers throw much light upon the history of "Christus." Lampadius
says: "The oratorio was laid out upon a grand scale. It was to be in
three parts,--the career on earth, the descent into hell, the ascent to
heaven." This plan must have been subsequently changed, for the fragments
of the oratorio are included in two parts, though they entirely pertain
to the earthly career. There are in all eight complete numbers,--three
from the first part, and five from the second. The first part opens with
a soprano recitative ("When Jesus our Lord was born in Bethlehem"),
leading to a strong trio for tenor and two basses ("Say, where is he
born?"), the question of the Wise Men from the East. The chorus replies,
"Then shall a Star from Jacob come forth," closing with the old German
chorale, "Wie schön leuchtet der Morgenstern" ("How brightly shines the
Morning Star!"), in plain, flowing harmony.

The fragments of the second part are in the form of the passion-music,
and include five tenor recitatives, narrating the dialogue between
Pilate, the Elders and the People, and his final order, "Take ye him and
crucify him, for I cannot find a fault in him," and several short, angry
choruses of the Jews, accusing Jesus and calling for his death, leading
to a beautiful chorus for mixed voices ("Daughters of Zion, weep"), and
closing with an effective chorale for male voices in the genuine Bach
style:--

  "He leaves his heavenly portals,
  Endures the grief of mortals,
    To raise our fallen race.
  O love beyond expressing!
  He gains for us a blessing,
    He saves us by redeeming grace.

  "When thou, O sun, art shrouded,
  By night or tempest clouded,
    Thy rays no longer dart;
  Though earth be dark and dreary,
  If, Jesus, thou art near me,
    'Tis cloudless day within my heart."




                                 MOZART.


Johann Chrysostomus Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart, one of the most remarkable
musical geniuses the world has produced, and the only one of his
contemporaries whose operas still hold the stage with unimpaired
freshness, was born at Salzburg, Jan. 27, 1756. He was the son of Leopold
Mozart, the Salzburgian Vice-Capellmeister, who gave him and his sister
Nannerl their earliest instructions in music, and with such good results
that the children travelled and gave concerts with great success. Before
he was seven years of age, he had composed several pieces for piano and
violin, his earliest having been written at the age of five! At twelve he
became court capellmeister in Salzburg. After his musical travels he went
to Vienna, and there began his real period of classic activity, which
commenced with "Idomeneus," reached its culmination in "Don Giovanni,"
and closed with the "Requiem,"--the "swan-song" of his wonderful life. In
his brief life Mozart composed more than fifty great works, besides
hundreds of minor ones in every possible form of musical writing. His
greatest compositions may be classed in the following order: "Idomeneus"
(1780); "Entführung aus dem Serail" (1781); "Figaro's Hochzeit" ("The
Marriage of Figaro"), (1785); "Don Giovanni" (1787); "Cosi fan tutti,"
"Zauberflöte" ("The Magic Flute"), and "Titus" (1790); and the "Requiem"
(1791, the year of his death). The catalogue of Mozart's works is an
immense one, for his period of productivity was unusually long. From the
age of five to his death, there was not a year that was not crowded with
his music. Besides his numerous operas, of which only the more famous are
given above, he wrote a large number of symphonies (of which the
"Jupiter" is now the best known), sonatas, concertos for all kinds of
instruments, even to musical-glasses, trios, quartets, quintets, and
sextets for all possible combinations of instruments, marches, fugues,
masses, hymns, arias of extraordinary brilliancy,--many of them written
for his sister-in-law, Aloysia Weber, to whom at one time he was
engaged,--liturgies, cantatas, songs, and ballads, and indeed every form
of music that is now known. His style was studied by Beethoven, and so
closely imitated that the music of his first period, if published without
autograph, would readily be attributed to Mozart. His style was so
spontaneous and so characteristic that it has been well said there is but
one Mozart. The distinguishing trait of his music is its rich melodic
beauty and its almost ravishing sweetness. His melody pours along in a
bright, unbroken stream that sometimes even overflows its banks, so
abundant is it. It is peculiarly the music of youth and spring-time,
exquisite in form, graceful in technique, and delightful in expression.
It was the source where all his immediate successors went for their
inspiration, though it lacked the maturity, majesty, and emotional depths
which were reached by such a Titan as Beethoven. Old as it is, and
antiquated in form, especially as compared with the work of the new
schools, its perennial freshness, grace, and beauty have made it
immortal.




                              The Requiem.


Mozart's "Requiem" was written in Vienna in 1791 and was left in an
unfinished state by the composer, who made suggestions and gave
instructions as to its completion even upon his death-bed; it was
literally his swan-song. No work by any composer has given rise to more
romantic stories or more bitter discussion. It was long the popular
belief that the "Requiem" was commissioned by a dark, mysterious
stranger, whose appearance impressed Mozart with the conviction that he
was a messenger of death; more than this, that he himself had been
poisoned, and that he was writing his own death-song, upon the order of
some supernatural power. There was some foundation for the belief, as the
commission was given in a very mysterious manner, and Mozart's health at
that time was so delicate that he had had several premonitions of death.
In his gloomy spirits he even said to his wife that he was writing his
own requiem. The actual circumstances attending the commission, though
they do not bear out the romantic versions of the story-tellers, are yet
of extraordinary interest.

The author of the commission was one Count von Walsegg, living in the
village of Stuppach, whose wife had died early in 1791. He was an amateur
musician of vast ambitions and small accomplishments, and had conceived
the idea of purchasing a requiem anonymously from Mozart and passing it
off as his own work. In pursuance of his scheme he despatched his
steward, named Leutgeb, a tall, solemn, mysterious looking person, with
an anonymous letter to Mozart, who at that time was in absolute poverty,
asking for the music and requesting him to name his own
price,--stipulating, however, that he should make no effort to discover
the identity of his patron. The unsuspicious Mozart accepted the
proposition, after consulting with his wife. He was about to begin work
upon it at once, when he received a commission to write the opera of
"Clemenza de Tito," in honor of the Emperor Leopold's coronation. This
occupied him several weeks, and when it was completed he decided upon a
visit to Baden. At the moment he was about to get into the carriage, the
mysterious stranger again appeared and inquired about the progress of the
"Requiem." Mozart excused himself, and replied that as soon as he
returned he would begin the work; and the stranger went away satisfied.

Mozart came back to Vienna in September; and after the completion of the
"Magic Flute," and its first performance, Nov. 30, 1791, he devoted
himself assiduously to the "Requiem," though it served only to increase
his gloom. One day he remarked to his wife: "I well know that I am
writing this requiem for myself. My own feelings tell me that I shall not
last long. No doubt some one has given me poison; I cannot get rid of the
thought." It is now known that this suspicion was only the result of his
morbid thoughts; but when it was publicly uttered, most unjust
accusations were made against his rival, Salieri, embittering the old
composer's life until its close. As the work progressed, his gloom
increased. "The day before his death," Nohl says, "he desired the score
to be brought to him in bed, and he sang his part, taking the alto voice.
Benedict Shack took the soprano, his brother-in-law, Hofer, the tenor,
and Gerl the bass. They had got through the various parts to the first
bars of the 'Lacrymosa,' when Mozart suddenly burst into tears and laid
aside the score." His sister-in-law has left an account of his last
moments. She writes:

  "As I approached his bed, he called to me: 'It is well you are here;
  you must stay to-night and see me die.' I tried as far as I was able to
  banish this impression; but he replied: 'The taste of death is already
  on my tongue, I taste death; and who will be near to support my
  Constance if you go away?' Süssmayer [his favorite pupil] was standing
  by the bedside, and on the counterpane lay the 'Requiem,' concerning
  which Mozart was still speaking and giving directions. He now called
  his wife and made her promise to keep his death secret for a time from
  every one but Albrechtsberger, that he might thus have an advantage
  over other candidates for the vacant office of capellmeister to St.
  Stephen's. His desire in this respect was gratified, for
  Albrechtsberger received the appointment. As he looked over the pages
  of the 'Requiem' for the last time, he said, with tears in his eyes:
  'Did I not tell you I was writing this for myself?'"

Mozart's widow, after his death, fearing that she might have to refund
the money advanced for the work, induced Süssmayer, who was thoroughly
familiar with Mozart's ideas, to complete it. He did so, and the copy was
delivered to Count von Walsegg, who did not hesitate to publish it as his
own. Süssmayer, however, had kept a copy, and after completion published
it; and in a letter to the publishers set up a claim to the
instrumentation of the "Requiem," "Kyrie," "Dies Iræ," and "Domine," and
to the whole of the "Sanctus," "Benedictus," and "Agnus Dei." The
publication of Süssmayer's letter provoked a controversy which has raged
from that day to this. The ablest critics and musicians in Europe have
taken part in it. Nearly all of them have defended Mozart's authorship;
but after half a century's discussion it still remains in doubt how far
Süssmayer participated in the completion of the work as it now stands.
The bulk of the evidence, however, favors the theory that Süssmayer only
played the part of a skilful copyist, in writing out the figurings which
Mozart had indicated, carrying out ideas which had been suggested to him,
and writing parts from the sketches which the composer had made. One of
the most pertinent suggestions made in the course of this controversy is
that of Rockstro, who says:--

  "Some passages, though they may perhaps strengthen Süssmayer's claim to
  have filled in certain parts of the instrumentation, stand on a very
  different ground to those which concern the composition of whole
  movements. The 'Lacrymosa' is quite certainly one of the most beautiful
  movements in the whole 'Requiem'--and Mozart is credited with having
  only finished the first eight bars of it! Yet it is impossible to study
  this movement carefully without arriving at Professor Macfarren's
  conclusion that 'the whole was the work of one mind, which mind was
  Mozart's.' Süssmayer may have written it out, perhaps; but it must have
  been from the recollection of what Mozart had played or sung to him,
  for we know that this very movement occupied the dying composer's
  attention almost to the last moment of his life. In like manner Mozart
  may have left no _Urschriften_ (sketches) of the 'Sanctus,'
  'Benedictus,' and 'Agnus Dei,'--though the fact that they have never
  been discovered does not prove that they never existed,--and yet he may
  have played and sung these movements often enough to have given
  Süssmayer a very clear idea of what he intended to write. We must
  either believe that he did this, or that Süssmayer was as great a
  genius as he; for not one of Mozart's acknowledged masses will bear
  comparison with the 'Requiem,' either as a work of art or the
  expression of a devout religious feeling. In this respect it stands
  almost alone among instrumental masses, which nearly always sacrifice
  religious feeling to technical display."

After an introduction, which gives out the subject of the opening
movement,--a slow, mournful, solemn theme,--the first number begins with
the impressive strain, "Requiem æternam dona eis," which gradually
brightens in the phrase, "Et Lux perpetua," and reaches a splendid burst
of exultation in the "Te decet hymnus," of which Oublichieff, the Russian
critic, says: "One seems to hear the voice of an archangel, and Saint
Cecilia herself with her organ sounding a fugued accompaniment which the
most laborious efforts of mortals never could have power to reach." After
a repetition of the "Requiem æternam," the number closes with the "Kyrie
eleison," a slow and complicated fugue, which is sublime in its effect,
though very sombre in color, as befits the subject.

The next number is the "Dies Iræ," written for chorus in simple
counterpoint, and very dramatic in its character, the orchestral part
being constantly vigorous, impetuous, and agitated, and reaching intense
energy on the verse, "Quantus tremor est futurus," the whole presenting a
vivid picture in tones of the terrors of the last judgment. In the "Tuba
mirum" the spirit of the music changes from the church form to the
secular. It is written for solo voices, ending in a quartet. The bass
begins with the "Tuba mirum," set to a portentous trombone accompaniment;
then follow the tenor ("Mors stupebit"), the alto ("Judex ergo"), and the
soprano ("Quid sum miser"). This number is particularly remarkable for
the manner in which the music is shaded down from the almost supernatural
character of the opening bass solo to the beauty and sweetness of the
soprano solo. From this extraordinary group we pass to the sublime
chorus, "Rex tremendæ majestatis," once more in the church style, which
closes with the prayer, "Salva me," in canonical form. With rare skill is
this last appeal of humanity woven out of the thunder-crashes of sound in
the judgment-music.

The "Dies Iræ" is followed by the "Recordare," written, like the "Tuba
mirum," as a quartet for solo voices. The vocal parts are in canon form
and are combined with marvellous skill, relieved here and there with
solos in purely melodic style, as in the "Quærens me," while the
orchestral part is an independent fugue, with several subjects worked up
with every form of instrumental embellishment, the fugue itself sometimes
relieved by plain accompaniment. The whole is an astonishing piece of
contrapuntal skill, apparently inexhaustible in its scientific
combinations, and yet never for an instant losing its deep religious
significance. Once more the orchestral part is full of agitation and even
savage energy in the "Confutatis maledictis," as it accompanies a
powerful double chorus, closing at last in a majestic prayer ("Oro
supplex et acclinis"), in which all the voices join in magnificent
harmony.

The "Lacrymosa" is the most elegant and poetically conceived movement in
the "Requiem." It begins in a delicate, graceful, and even sensuous
manner, which gradually broadens and strengthens, and at last develops
into a crescendo of immense power, reaching its climax on the words
"Judicandus homo reus." Then it changes to a plaintive prayer ("Huic ergo
parce Deus"), and closes in a cloud of gloom in the "Dona eis requiem."
The next number ("Domine Jesu Christe") is in pure church form, beginning
with a motet by chorus in solid harmony, which runs into a fugue on the
words "Ne absorbeat eas Tartarus," followed by a quartet of voices
regularly fugued, leading to another great fugue on the passage, "Quam
olim Abrahæ," which closes the number in a burst of sacred inspiration.
The "Domine" is followed by the "Hostias," a lovely choral melody which
leads to the "Sanctus," a sublime piece of harmony closing with a fugued
"Hosanna." The "Benedictus," which follows it, is a solo quartet
plaintive and solemn in character, but full of sweet and rich melodies
magnificently accompanied.

The "Agnus Dei" closes the work, a composition of profound beauty, with
an accompaniment of mournful majesty, developing into a solemn, almost
funereal strain on the words "Dona eis requiem," and closing with the
fugue of the opening "Kyrie" on the words "Lux æterna."  "Written under
the inspiration of death" might well be inscribed on this great monument
of musical skill, this matchless requiem of awful majesty and divine
beauty. In its own unity, its perfection of form and design, its
astonishing skill, from the opening fugue of the "Kyrie" to its
repetition in the finale, may be found the proof that Mozart and no other
wrote the entire score, and that every thought and idea in it are the
inspired work of the dying master.




                                 PAINE.


John K. Paine, one of the very few really eminent American composers, was
born at Portland, Me., Jan. 9, 1839. He studied the piano, organ, and
composition with Kotzschmar in that city, and made his first public
appearance as an organist, June 25, 1857. During the following year he
went to Germany and studied the organ, composition, and instrumentation
with Haupt and other masters in Berlin. He returned to this country in
1861 and gave several concerts, in which he played many of the organ
works of the best writers for the first time in the United States.
Shortly after his return he was appointed instructor of music in Harvard
University, and in 1876 was honored with the elevation to a professorship
and given a regular chair. He is best known as a composer, and several of
his works have been paid the rare compliment of performance in Germany,
among them his Mass in D and all his symphonies. The former was given at
the Berlin Singakademie in 1867, under his own direction. Among his
principal compositions are the oratorio "St. Peter;" the Mass in D; the
Centennial Hymn, set to Whittier's poem and sung at the opening of the
Philadelphia Centennial Exhibition; the overture to "As You Like It;"
"The Tempest," in the style of a symphonic poem; the symphony in C minor
and "Spring" symphony; besides numerous sonatas, fantasies, preludes,
songs, and arrangements for organ and piano. His larger orchestral works
have been made familiar to American audiences by Mr. Theodore Thomas's
band, and have invariably met with success. His style of composition is
large, broad, and dignified, based upon the best classic models, and
evinces a high degree of musical scholarship.




                               St. Peter.


"St. Peter," Mr. Paine's only oratorio,--and from the highest standpoint
it may be said the only oratorio yet produced in this country,--was
written in 1872-73, and first performed at Portland, Me., in June of the
latter year, under the composer's own direction. The solos were sung by
Mrs. Wetherbee, Miss Adelaide Phillipps, Mr. George L. Osgood, and Mr.
Rudolphsen. It was again produced with great success at the third
Triennial Festival of the Boston Handel and Haydn Society, May 9, 1874,
with Mrs. J. Houston West, Mr. Nelson Varley, Miss Phillipps, and Mr.
Rudolphsen in the principal parts.

The establishment of Christianity, illustrated by the four principal
scenes in the life of St. Peter, forms the subject of the oratorio. It is
divided into two parts, and these are subdivided as follows: Part I. The
Divine Call; The Denial and Repentance. Part II. The Ascension;
Pentecost. The overture, a short adagio movement expressive of the
unsettled spiritual condition of the world prior to the advent of
Christianity, leads directly to the opening chorus, "The Time is
fulfilled," which develops not only this subject, but also a second,
"Repent, and believe the glad Tidings of God," in a masterly manner. The
chorus, written in a very noble style, is followed by the tenor
recitative, which describes the divine call of our Lord to Simon and
Andrew as "He walked by the Sea of Galilee." It prepares the way for a
soprano aria ("The Spirit of the Lord is upon me") which announces the
glad tidings they are commissioned to deliver. Twelve male voices,
representing the Disciples, accept the call in the chorus, "We go before
the Face of the Lord," which is beautifully accompanied by and interwoven
with the full chorus, closing with the smoothly flowing chorale, "How
lovely shines the Morning Star." Then ensues the first dramatic scene. To
the question of the Saviour, "Who do men say that I am," the twelve male
voices first reply, followed by Peter in a few bars of very effective
recitative, "Thou art the Christ." A tenor arioso, declaring the
foundation of the Church "upon this rock," is followed by a noble and
exquisitely chaste bass aria for Peter ("My Heart is glad and my Spirit
rejoiceth"), the scene ending with the powerful chorus, "The Church is
built upon the Foundation of the Apostles and Prophets." The next scene,
"The Denial and Repentance," opens with the warning to Peter that he will
deny his Lord, and his remonstrance, "Though I should die with thee,"
which is repeated by the Apostles. These brief passages are followed by a
very pathetic aria for tenor ("Let not your Heart be troubled") and a
beautifully worked-up quartet and chorus ("Sanctify us through Thy
Truth"). A contralto solo announces the coming of "Judas with a great
multitude," leading Jesus away to the High Priest, and is followed by the
very expressive chorus, "We hid our Faces from him." The scene of the
denial is very dramatic, the alternating accusations of the servants and
the denials of Peter being treated with great skill; it closes with a
very effective contralto recitative, illustrating the sad words: "And
while he yet spake, the cock crew. And the Lord turned, and looked on
Peter; and he remembered the word of the Lord, and he went out and wept
bitterly." An orchestral interlude follows, in the nature of a lament, a
minor adagio full of deep feeling. It is followed by an aria for Peter
("O God, my God, forsake me not"), which is cast in the same strain of
lamentation as the orchestral number which precedes and really introduces
it. At its close a chorus of Angels, sopranos, and altos, with harp
accompaniment ("Remember, remember from whence thou art fallen"), is
heard warning Peter, augmented on the introduction of the second subject
("And he that overcometh shall receive a Crown of Life") by the full
chorus. This chorus is followed by a beautiful aria for alto ("The Lord
is faithful and righteous to forgive our Sins"); and then a massive
chorus, which is fairly majestic ("Awake, thou that sleepest"), closes
the first part.

The second part opens with a chorus ("The Son of Man was delivered into
the Hands of sinful Men"), which tells the story of the crucifixion, not
only with great power, but also with intense pathos, ending with the
chorale, "Jesus my Redeemer lives," which invests the sad narrative with
tender and consolatory feeling. The ascension scene is accompanied by
graceful and expressive recitatives for tenor and bass, followed by a
tenor arioso ("Go ye and teach") and a short soprano recitative ("And he
lifted up his Hands"), leading to the full melodious chorus, "If ye then
be risen." The next number is an impressive soprano solo ("O Man of
God"), in which Peter is admonished "to put on the whole armor of God and
fight the good fight." A beautifully written quartet ("Feed the Flock of
God") closes the scene of the ascension. The last scene opens with a
tenor solo describing the miracle of Pentecost, set to an extremely
vigorous and descriptive accompaniment. It is followed by the chorus,
"The Voice of the Lord," which is one of the most effective in the whole
work, though not constructed in the massive style of those which close
the two parts. A contralto recitative links this chorus to its successor,
"Behold! are not all these who speak Galileans?" After a brief soprano
recitative, Peter has another vigorous solo ("Ye Men of Judæa"), which is
as dramatic in its style and almost as descriptive in its accompaniment
as the opening tenor solo of this scene. A reflective aria for alto ("As
for Man") follows it, and bass and tenor recitatives lead up to the
eagerly questioning chorus of the people, "Men and Brethren." The answer
comes from Peter and the Apostles, "For the Promise is to you." An
intricate chorus ("This is the Witness of God"), closing with a chorale
("Praise to the Father"), leads to the finale, which comprises the
chorus, "Beloved, let us love one another," written for bass solo,
tenors, and basses (the Disciples), and full chorus; an effective duet
for soprano and tenor ("Sing unto God"); and the final majestic chorus
("Great and marvellous are thy Works").




                                ROSSINI.


Gioachino Antonio Rossini, the father of the modern Italian school of
opera, was born Feb. 29, 1792, at Pesaro, in the Romagna. His father was
an accomplished musician, and his mother a professional singer, so that
he was brought up in a musical atmosphere. Even as a boy he sang with his
mother in the theatre. He first studied with Mattei, and later with
Martini. His first opera, "Demetrio e Polibio," was brought out at Rome
in 1812, and before he had concluded his life-work, more than forty of
his operas had been given in almost every part of Europe,--a crowning
result of labor and contemporaneous fame not often enjoyed by composers.
His "Tancredi," which was produced for the first time at Venice in 1813,
was the opera which made him famous, and its remarkable success spread
his reputation far and wide. In 1815 appeared "L' Italiana in Algeri" and
"Aureliano in Palmira;" in 1816, "Elisabetta," "Otello," and his splendid
work "The Barber of Seville," which, though his masterpiece, is said to
have been written in fourteen days; in 1817, "La Cenerentola," "La Gazza
Ladra," and "Armida;" and in 1819, "Ricciardo e Zoraïde," "La Donna del
Lago," and many others. From 1815 to 1822 Rossini was under the
"management" of the _impresario_ Barbaja in Naples, who had much
difficulty in keeping him to the work of composition, his facility in
writing often leading him to defer work until it was the very eve of
performance. In 1823, under the auspices of Barbaja, and with the
assistance of the prima donna, Colbran, whom Rossini married about this
time, his opera "Zelmira" and others of his works were given with such
brilliant success as to raise his aspirations for a wider and more
promising field of labor. In the year 1823 he went to Paris and London,
finally settling in the former city, where he not only began a new grand
opera, but also gave himself to the study and development of orchestral
music and the encouragement of artists. His home was the Mecca of
singers, and, like Liszt's at Weimar, the centre of art influences. The
new work was "William Tell," which was first brought out in Paris in
1829. It was his last important effort. It met with only temporary
success, though it enjoys to-day a reputation almost equal to that of the
"Barber." His most celebrated work in sacred music is the "Stabat Mater,"
which, though written in operatic style and very brilliant in coloring,
has retained its place in popular favor, and is to-day as eagerly sought
for by artists and the public as it was in his own day. Among his other
sacred works is "Moses in Egypt,"--originally written as an oratorio for
the San Carlo in Naples, and brought out there in 1818, though
subsequently recast and provided with a revised libretto for the Paris
Grand Opera in 1827. The "Prayer" from this work has a world-wide
popularity. During the latter years of his life Rossini gave up
composition entirely,--in part because of the eventual failure of his
"William Tell,"--and enjoyed the fruits of his labors at his beautiful
villa in Passy. He died Nov. 14, 1868. His sacred works, besides those
already mentioned, are a few Italian oratorios, now unknown, three
choruses, "Faith, Hope, and Charity," the "Petite Messe Solenelle," a
"Tantum Ergo," a "Quoniam," and an "O Salutaris."




                              Stabat Mater.


The great Stabat Maters in the musical world are those of Palestrina,
Pergolesi, Haydn, Steffani, Clari, Astorga, Winter, Neukomm, Rossini, and
the one recently written by the Bohemian composer, Dvorák. Of all these
no one has been so popular as that of Rossini, nor made the world so
familiar with the text of the Virgin's Lamentation. After the failure of
"William Tell," Rossini abandoned opera-writing, though he had a contract
with the Grand Opera at Paris for four more works, and contemplated
taking up the subject of Faust. "William Tell" was his last work for the
stage; but before his absolute retirement he was to produce a work
destined to add to his fame. In 1832 his friend Aguado induced him to
compose a "Stabat Mater" for the Spanish minister, Don Valera, which was
not intended to be made public. Before its completion he fell ill, and
Tadolini wrote the last four numbers. The work was dedicated to Valera,
with the understanding that it should always be retained by him. Nine
years afterwards Valera died, and Rossini learned that his heirs had sold
the work to a Paris publisher for two thousand francs. He at once claimed
the copyright and brought an action, in which he was successful. He then
composed four new numbers in place of those written by Tadolini, and sold
the work complete to the publisher, Troupenas, for six thousand francs.
The latter sold the right of performance for a limited time to the
Escudiers for eight thousand francs, and they in turn sold it to the
Théâtre Italien for twenty thousand. Its first complete performance was
at the Salle Ventadour, Jan. 7, 1842, Grisi, Albertazzi, Mario, and
Tamburini taking the principal parts.

A brief but brilliant orchestral prelude leads to the opening chorus,
"Stabat Mater dolorosa," arranged for solos and chorus, and very dramatic
in style, especially in its broad, melodious contrasts. It is followed by
the tenor solo, "Cujus Animam," which is familiar to every
concert-goer,--a clear-cut melody free of embellishment, but very
brilliant and even jubilant in character, considering the nature of the
text. The next number ("Quis est Homo"), for two sopranos, is equally
familiar. It is based upon a lovely melody, first given out by the first
soprano, and then by the second, after which the two voices carry the
theme through measure after measure of mere vocal embroidery, closing
with an extremely brilliant cadenza in genuine operatic style. The fourth
number is the bass aria "Pro peccatis," the two themes in which are very
earnest and even serious in character, and come nearer to the church
style than any other parts of the work. It is followed by a beautifully
constructed number ("Eia Mater"), a bass recitative with chorus, which is
very strong in its effect. The sixth number is a lovely quartet ("Sancta
Mater"), full of variety in its treatment, and closing with full, broad
harmony. After a short solo for soprano ("Fac ut Portem"), the climax is
reached in the "Inflammatus,"--a brilliant soprano obligato with powerful
choral accompaniment. The solo number requires a voice of exceptional
range, power, and flexibility; with this condition satisfied, the effect
is intensely dramatic, and particularly fascinating by the manner in
which the solo is set off against the choral background. A beautiful
unaccompanied quartet in broad, plain harmony, "Quando Corpus," leads to
the showy fugued "Amen" which closes the work.

Unquestionably the "Stabat Mater" is one of the most popular of all the
minor sacred compositions; and the secret lies on the surface: it is to
be found in the delightful and fascinating melodies, which are strewn so
thickly through it, as well as in the graceful bravura, which was so
characteristic of Rossini, and which when delivered by accomplished
artists is very captivating to a popular audience. As to its sacred form,
it is as far from the accepted style of church music as Berlioz's or
Verdi's requiems. Indeed, Rossini himself remarked to Hiller that he
wrote it in the "mezzo serio" style. In connection with this matter one
or two criticisms will be of interest. Rossini's biographer, Sutherland
Edwards, says: "The 'Stabat Mater' was composed, as Raphael's Virgins
were painted, for the Roman Catholic Church, which at once accepted it,
without ever suspecting that Rossini's music was not religious." The
remark, however, would be more pertinent were it not for the fact that
the Church itself has not always been a good critic of its own music, or
a good judge of what its music should be, as Liszt discovered when he
went to Rome full of his purposes of reform in the musical service.
Heine, in a letter to the "Allgemeine Zeitung" in 1842, replying to
certain German criticisms, went so far as to say,--

  "The true character of Christian art does not reside in thinness and
  paleness of the body, but in a certain effervescence of the soul, which
  neither the musician nor the painter can appropriate to himself either
  by baptism or study; and in this respect I find in the 'Stabat' of
  Rossini a more truly Christian character than in the 'Paulus' ['St.
  Paul'] of Felix Mendelssohn Bartholdy,--an oratorio which the
  adversaries of Rossini point to as a model of Christian style."

It will hardly be claimed, however, even by Heine's friends, that this
sweeping statement is either just to Mendelssohn or true of Rossini.
Perhaps they will also concede that Heine was not a very good judge of
Christianity in any of its aspects, musical or otherwise. The veteran
Moscheles in one of his letters criticizes the work very pertinently.  He
says,--

  "It is, as you may imagine, a model of 'singableness' (if I may say
  so); but it is not sufficiently church music to my taste. His solitary
  fugue is clumsy. The criticisms on the work are very various. Some
  agree with me; but the majority delight in the captivating Italian
  phrases, which I admire too, but which I cannot think are in the right
  place."

He might have added, "Because they are the phrases of 'Semiramide,'
'Tancredi,' and the 'Barber.'" There is scarcely a number of the "Stabat
Mater" which might not be detached from it and reset in one of Rossini's
operas without doing violence to whatever of the real religious style it
may be supposed, or was intended, to have. The "Stabat Mater" music would
be captivatingly beautiful in any setting.




                               RUBINSTEIN.


Anton Gregor Rubinstein was born, Nov. 30, 1829, at the village of
Wechwotynetz, in Russia. His parents, who were in moderate circumstances,
moved to Moscow during his infancy, and in that city he received his
first musical instruction. His mother gave him lessons at the age of
four, with the result that by the time he was six she was unable to teach
him anything more. He then studied the piano with Alexander Villoing, a
pupil of John Field. His first composition appeared in his twelfth year,
and soon his songs and two and four hand piano-pieces began to attract
the attention of musicians. In 1840 Villoing took him to Paris and placed
him in the Conservatory, where he attracted the attention of Liszt,
Chopin, and Thalberg. He remained in that city eighteen months, devoting
himself to unremitting study, and then made some professional tours, in
which he met with extraordinary success, particularly in England. From
that country he went to Holland and Sweden, everywhere meeting with an
enthusiastic reception. In 1844 his parents removed to Berlin, and he was
placed under Dehn, the famous contrapuntist, to study composition, his
brother Nicholas being a companion in his work. The father dying in 1846,
the mother and Nicholas returned to Russia, leaving Anton alone. During
the next two years he taught music in Pressburg and Vienna, and in the
latter part of 1848 went back to Russia. About this time he received an
honorary musical appointment from the Grand-Duchess Hélène. For eight
years he studied and wrote in St. Petersburg, and at the end of that time
had accumulated a mass of manuscripts destined to make his name famous
all over Europe, while his reputation as a skilful pianist was already
world-wide. He visited England again in 1857, and the next year returned
home and settled in St. Petersburg, about which time he was made Imperial
Concert Director, with a life-pension. At this period in his career he
devoted himself to the cause of music in Russia. His first great work was
the foundation of the Conservatory in the above city in 1862, of which he
remained principal until 1867. He also founded the Russian Musical
Society in 1861, and in 1869 was decorated by the Czar. In 1870 he
directed the Philharmonic and Choral Societies of Vienna, and shortly
afterwards made another tour, during which, in 1872, he came to this
country with the eminent violinist Wieniawsky, as will be well
remembered. His visit here was marked by a succession of ovations. No
other pianist ever achieved such a wonderful success, not only among
musicians, but among the people of all classes. Musicians were astounded
at his remarkable knowledge, while musical and unmusical people alike
were carried off their feet by the whirlwind-style of his playing. It was
full of grace, nobility, breadth, and dignity; but it combined with these
qualities a fire, an intensity, and a passion which sometimes invested
the piano with orchestral effects, and again transformed it into an
instrument that wept, laughed, sang, and danced. His power was
irresistible and electric. As a composer he ranks very high. His greatest
works are the Ocean Symphony, Dramatic Symphony, and a character sketch
for grand orchestra called "Ivan the Terrible;" his operas, "Children of
the Heath," "Feramors," "Nero," "The Maccabees," "Dimitri Donskoi," and
the "Demon;" the oratorios "Paradise Lost" and "Tower of Babel;" and a
long and splendid catalogue of chamber, salon, and concert music, besides
some beautiful songs which are great favorites in the concert-room.




                           The Tower of Babel.


"The Tower of Babel," a sacred opera, as Rubinstein entitles it, was
written in 1870, the text, which is somewhat of a travesty on sacred
history, by Julius Rodenberg. An English critic very pertinently says:
"One item alone in all the multitude of details crowded by Herr Rodenberg
into his canvas has any foundation in fact. He adopts the theory that
there really was a tower of Babel, and all the rest he founds on
conjecture." In point of fact, the anachronisms are numerous enough to
make the text almost a burlesque. Nimrod, the mighty hunter, is made the
chief builder of the tower, which is supposed to be in process of
erection as an insult to the Deity. Abraham appears upon the scene (many
years before he was born), and rebukes Nimrod for his presumption;
whereupon the hunter-king orders "the shepherd," as he is called, to be
thrown into a fiery furnace, after the manner of Shadrach, Meshach, and
Abednego. The angels watch over the patriarch, and he comes out of the
fire unharmed. Some of the people standing by ascribe the miracle to
Baal, some to Dagon, some to Ashtaroth, and a few to Jehovah, and at last
get into a quarrel with each other. Nimrod interposes his authority, and
orders them to their work on the tower again. Soon the heavens cloud
over, and a storm is seen approaching. Abraham prophesies destruction,
and Nimrod orders him to be seized and hurled from the summit of the
tower; but before his commands can be executed, a thunderbolt strikes it
and crumbles it into a heap of shapeless stones. While Abraham exults
over the destruction, the dispersion of the three races, the Shemites,
Hamites, and Japthides, occurs. Nimrod laments over the result of his
folly, and at last acknowledges the authority of the Divine Power, and
thus the story ends.

The _dramatis personæ_ are Nimrod (bass), Abraham (tenor), Master Workman
(baritone), four Angels (boys' voices), the choruses by Nimrod's
followers, the People, Angels, and Demons. The overture is a confused,
formless number, indicating the darkness. In the beginning there is no
clear musical idea; but at last the subject assumes definite form as the
dawn breaks and the Master Workman announces the sunrise and calls the
People to their work, in the recitative, "Awake! ye Workers, awake!" The
summons is followed by the chorus, "To work," in which the vocal part is
noisy, broken, and somewhat discordant, representing the hurry and bustle
of a crowd of working-men,--with which, however, the orchestra and organ
build up a powerful theme. The song of the Master Workman is also
interwoven, and the chorus is finally developed with great vigor and
splendid dramatic effect. Nimrod now appears, and in a triumphant
outburst ("Stately rises our Work on high") contemplates the monument to
his greatness now approaching completion. Abraham rebukes him ("How,
Mortal, canst thou reach His Presence?"). The scene at this point is full
of dramatic vigor. Nimrod hurls imprecations at Abraham, followed by
strongly contrasting choruses of the angry People and protecting Angels,
which lead up to the mixed chorus of the People, indicating the confusion
of tongues as they severally ascribe the escape of Abraham from the
furnace-fire to Baal, Dagon, Ashtaroth, and Jehovah, and closing with
tumultuous dissension, which is quelled by Nimrod. The effect of the
Angels' voices in the hurlyburly is exceedingly beautiful, and the
accompaniments, particularly those of the fire-scene, are very vivid.
Nimrod's order to resume work on the tower is followed by the angelic
strain, "Come on! let us down to Earth now hasten." Once more the
Builders break out in their barbaric chorus, "To work," followed by the
portentous outburst of the People, "How the Face of Heaven is
o'ershadowed!" In a vigorous solo Abraham replies, "No! 'tis not Vapor
nor Storm-clouds that gather." There is a final controversy between
Abraham and Nimrod, and as the latter orders the patriarch to be thrown
from the tower, the storm breaks, and amid the shrieks of the chorus
("Horror! horror") and the tremendous clangor of organ and orchestra on
the theme already developed in the opening, the tower is destroyed.

The tumultuous scene is followed by Nimrod's lament ("The Tower whose
lofty Height was like my State"), a bass aria of great power, and
reaching a splendid climax. Abraham, in an exultant strain ("The Lord is
strong in Might"), proclaims God's purpose to scatter the people. The
most picturesque scene in the work now occurs,--the dispersal of the
Shemites, Hamites, and Japthides, typified by orchestral marches and
choruses of a barbaric cast. The stage directions at this point indicate
that the three choruses "must be sung behind the scenes, while dissolving
views present to the audience the emigration of the three great human
races,"--an effect which is also made in the last act of Goldmark's
"Queen of Sheba." The first chorus, that of the Shemites, which is sung
in unison, is taken from some of the ancient music in the ritual of the
Jewish Synagogue, that used on the eve of the Day of Atonement. The other
two choruses are also Oriental in color and rhythm, and give a very
striking effect to this part of the work. The chorus of Angels ("Thus by
Almighty Power of God") proclaims the completion of the work, and two
long solos by Abraham and Nimrod lead up to the final choruses of the
Angels, People, and Demons, worked up in very powerful style, and in the
finale uniting the themes which originally introduced the chorus of the
People and the Angels, and the subject of the darkness in the overture.
The tableau is thus described in the stage directions: "The stage is
divided into three horizontal compartments. In the middle is the earth;
in the upper is the throne of the Almighty, surrounded by all the
heavenly powers; in the lower, hell, Satan seated on his throne,
surrounded by all the infernal deities."




                             Paradise Lost.


The oratorio "Paradise Lost" was first produced in Vienna in 1859 by the
Gesellschaft der Musikfreunde, a choral organization conducted by
Rubinstein during his stay in that city. Like "The Tower of Babel," it is
entitled by the composer "a sacred opera," though it is in genuine
oratorio form, and usually classed as such. The text is a very free
transcription from Milton. The work is divided into three parts; but as
the second is usually the only part given by oratorio societies, our
sketch will be principally confined to that. The first part mainly
concerns the defeat of Satan's forces by the legions of Heaven, and is
remarkable for its vigorous instrumental treatment.

The second part is devoted to the creation, and is composed principally
of choruses introduced by a few bars of recitative, invariably for the
tenor, who acts the part of narrator. The first seven of these describe
the creation of the earth. After a characteristic introduction, the tenor
declares "Chaos, be ended!" whereupon the Angels sing a glowing tribute
to light ("Upspringing, the darkened Air broke forth into radiant
Brightness"). Again the tenor and chorus in a brief number describe the
firmament. The third chorus ("Fierce raged the Billows") pictures the
division of land and water with great vigor, accompanied by imitative
instrumentation which indicates Rubinstein's skill as a water-painter
quite as clearly as his great Ocean Symphony. In the fourth and fifth
choruses the music vividly tells the story of the creation of the trees
and plants and the appearance of the stars in the firmament. The sixth
("Gently beaming, softly streaming"), in which the Angels rejoice in the
soft radiance of the moon, is short, but exceedingly tender and
beautiful. In the seventh ("All around rose the Sound of the Strife of
Life"), we have a description of the awakening of life characterized  by
extraordinary  descriptive  power. This group of choruses, each one
thoroughly fresh, original, and picturesque in its description, brings us
up to the creation of man, which is the finest portion of the whole
work. It begins with a long tenor recitative, "In all her Majesty shines
on high the Heaven," reaching a fine crescendo at the close ("And lo! it
was Man"). The Angels reply with their heavenly greeting, "Hail to Thee,
O Man." A short dialogue follows between Adam and the Narrator, and the
Angels renew their greeting, this time to Eve. This leads up to a lovely
duet between Adam and Eve ("Teach us then to come before Thee"), which is
very gracefully constructed, and tenderly melodious in character.  The
final number is a chorus of the Angels ("Clear resounded the Trumpets of
Heaven"), beginning in broad, flowing, jubilant harmony, then developing
into a fugue on the words "Praise the Almighty One," built up on a
subject full of exultation and grandeur, and closing with a Hallelujah
delivered with mighty outbursts of power.

The third part is devoted to the fall of Adam and Eve and their
banishment from Eden, closing with the announcement of the ultimate
salvation of mankind. Both the Almighty and Satan appear in this part,
the former's music being sung by the tenor voice;  though, curiously
enough, the latter's music is much the more attractive.




                              SAINT-SAËNS.


Charles Camille Saint-Saëns, famous as composer, pianist, and critic, was
born in Paris, Oct. 9, 1835. He began his musical studies at a very early
age. In his seventh year he took piano lessons of Stamaty and studied
harmony, and in his twelfth was a student at the Conservatory, where he
took two organ prizes; though he failed on two occasions in his
competition for the Prix de Rome. His first symphony appeared in 1851,
and was performed with success. In 1853 he was appointed organist of the
Church of St. Merri, and five years later secured a like position at the
Madeleine, which he filled with high honor for nineteen years, finally
resigning in favor of Theodore Dubois. In 1867 he was awarded a prize for
his cantata "Les Noces de Prométhée" by the Paris International
Exhibition, and the next year he was received with distinguished honor at
the Artists' Meeting in Weimar, both as pianist and composer. His
operatic career began about this time. "La Princesse jeune" appeared in
1872, and "Le Timbre d'Argent" in 1877; but neither was successful. His
next work was the sacred drama "Samson et Dalila," produced at Weimar in
the latter part of 1877; followed by "Étienne Marcel" at Lyons in 1879.
In addition to his operas he has written several cantatas, among them
"The Deluge" and "La Lyre et la Harpe," composed for the Birmingham
Festival of 1879; three symphonies; four symphonic poems, "La Rouet
d'Omphale," "Phaéthon," "Danse Macabre," and "La Jeunesse d'Hercule;" a
large number of concerted pieces with orchestra, songs and romances, as
well as chamber-music and compositions for piano and organ. His sacred
music includes the following works: mass for four voices, Requiem Mass,
"Oratorio de Noël," "Tantum Ergo," the Nineteenth Psalm for solos,
chorus, and orchestra, and many minor pieces for choir use. He has been a
prolific writer, but his fame thus far rests upon his instrumental music.
He has travelled much as a virtuoso in Russia, Spain, Germany, and
England, conducting his own compositions, and also giving piano and organ
recitals, in which he has met with great success. He also ranks high as a
musical critic, and many of his contributions to the Parisian press have
been collected, with a view to publication in a separate volume. Of late
he has obtained considerable notoriety by his controversial articles on
the Wagner question,--in which, however, national prejudice sometimes has
been more apparent than cosmopolitan judgment. As a composer, he is
unquestionably more learned than are any of his native contemporaries,
and he has made a closer study of Bach than even Gounod has. His
descriptive powers are very strong, as is evidenced by the symphonic
poems which Mr. Thomas has introduced into this country. They even go to
the verge of the sensational; but, on the other hand, the study of his
"Oratorio de Noël" and of his transcriptions from Bach will show that he
is a master of counterpoint and thematic treatment.




                           Christmas Oratorio.


"Noël," Saint-Saëns' Christmas oratorio, in dimensions hardly exceeds the
limits of a cantata, but musically is constructed in oratorio style. Its
subject is the nativity, combined with ascriptions of praise and a final
exultant hallelujah. The work is short, but very effective, and is
written for five solo voices and chorus, with accompaniment of strings
and organ, and the harp in one number. It opens with a pastoral symphony
of a very melodious character. The first number is the recitative, "And
there were Shepherds," including the angelic message and the appearance
of the heavenly hosts, the subject being divided among the tenor, alto,
soprano, and baritone, and leading up to the first chorus ("Glory now
unto God in the highest"), which is quite short, but beautifully written.
The next number is an aria for mezzo-soprano ("Firm in Faith"), which is
very simple, but graceful in its melody. The fourth number is a tenor
solo and chorus ("God of all"), written in the church style, followed by
a soprano and baritone duet ("Blessed, ever blessed"), which is very
elaborate in its construction, and highly colored. The next number is the
chorus, "Wherefore are the Nations raging," which is intensely dramatic
in its effect, especially for the manner in which the voice-parts are set
off against the agitated accompaniment. The contrasts also are very
striking, particularly that between the tumultuous opening of the chorus
and its tranquil close in full harmony on the words, "As it was in the
Beginning." The next number is a lovely trio for tenor, soprano, and
baritone ("Thou art from first to last"), with harp accompaniment
throughout, which gives to it an extremely graceful and elegant effect.
It is followed by a quartet ("Alleluia"), in which the theme is
introduced by the alto. The Alleluia is then taken up by all four parts
(soprano, mezzo-soprano, alto, and baritone), in full, rich harmony, the
alto closing the number alone in a very effective adagio passage. The
next number is a quintet and chorus, the prelude to which is a repetition
of parts of the opening pastoral. It is also utilized in the voice parts.
The number is very elaborate in its construction and development, and is
followed by a short final chorus ("Raise now your Song on high") in
simple church style. Short as the work is, it is very beautiful, and full
not only of genuine service music, but also of graceful conceits and
delicate fancies, both in the voice parts and the accompaniments.




                                SCHUMANN.


Robert Schumann, one of the greatest of musicians, and one who, had his
life been spared, would probably have stood at the head of all composers
since Beethoven and Schubert, was the son of a bookseller, and was born
at Zwickau, in Saxony, June 8, 1810. In his earliest youth he was
recognized as a child of genius. His first teacher in music was
Baccalaureus Kuntzsch, who gave him piano instructions. It was while
taking these lessons that he attended a concert given by Moscheles. The
playing of the great teacher aroused his musical ambition, and first
inspired him to become a musician. His father recognized his talent very
early, but his mother was opposed to his ambition. In deference to her
wishes, he began the study of law,--with the full determination, however,
to make music his vocation; and in this he ultimately succeeded, through
the influence of Wieck, whose daughter, Clara, he subsequently married,
and who is still a skilful pianist and famous teacher. He studied the
piano with Wieck until his right hand was injured. In 1830, in which year
his artistic career really opened, he began the theoretical study of
music in its groundwork, first with Director Kupsch in Leipsic, and later
with Heinrich Dorn, and at the same time entered upon the work of
composition. His opus No. 1 was the so-called "Abegg Variations,"
dedicated to a young lady, Meta Abegg, whom he had met at a ball in
Mannheim. In the same year, 1830, he composed a toccata. In 1831 his
famous "Papillons" and other piano works appeared. Schumann was not only
a musician, but an able critic and graceful writer; and in 1834, with
Schunke, Knorr, and Wieck, he founded the "Neue Zeitschrift für Musik,"
which had an important influence upon musical progress in Germany, and in
which the great promise of such musicians as Chopin and Brahms was first
recognized. He married Clara Wieck in 1840, after much opposition from
her father; and in this year appeared some of his best songs, including
the three famous cycluses, "Liederkreis," "Woman's Life and Love," and
"Poet's Love," which now have a world-wide fame. In the following year
larger works came from his pen, among them his B major symphony,
overture, scherzo, and finale in E major, and the symphony in D minor.
During this period in his career he also made many artistic journeys with
his wife, which largely increased the reputation of each. In 1843 he
completed his great "romantic oratorio," "Paradise and the Peri," set to
Moore's text, and many favorite songs and piano compositions, among them
the "Phantasiestücke" and "Kinderscenen," and his elegant piano quintet
in E flat. In 1844, in company with his wife, he visited St. Petersburg
and Moscow, and their reception was a royal one. The same year he
abandoned his "Zeitschrift," in which "Florestan," "Master Raro,"
"Eusebius," and the other pseudonyms had become familiar all over
Germany, and took the post of director in Düsseldorf, in the place of
Ferdinand Hiller. During the last few years of his life he was the victim
of profound melancholy, owing to an affection of the brain, and he even
attempted suicide by throwing himself into the Rhine. He was then removed
to an asylum at Endenich, where he died July 20, 1856. The two men who
exercised most influence upon Schumann were Jean Paul and Franz Schubert.
He was deeply pervaded with the romance of the one and the emotional
feeling of the other. His work is characterized by genial humor, a rich
and warm imagination, wonderfully beautiful instrumentation, especially
in his accompaniments, the loftiest form of expression, and a rigid
adherence to the canons of art.




                         Paradise and the Peri.


Schumann's secular oratorio, "Paradise and the Peri,"  was written in
1843, and first performed at the Gewandhaus, Leipsic, December 4th of
that year, under the composer's own direction. Its first performance in
England was given June 23, 1856, with Madame Jenny Lind-Goldschmidt in
the part of the Peri, Sterndale Bennett conducting. The text is taken
from the second poem in Moore's "Lalla Rookh," and was suggested to
Schumann by his friend Emil Flechsig, who had translated the poem. This
was in 1841; but he did not set it to music until two years later. The
text required many changes, and these he made himself. The principal
additions are a chorus for "The Spirits of the Nile," the chorus of
Houris, the Peri's solo, "Banished," the quartet, "Peri, 'tis true," the
solo, "Sunken was the Golden Orb," and the final chorus. It has also been
suggested that he availed himself of still another translation, that of
Ollker's, as many of the changes agree with his text.

It is difficult to define the exact form of the work, though it is nearly
always classed as a secular oratorio, principally because of the
introduction of the narrator, after the style of the passion-music. In
other respects it resembles the cantata. Reissmann, in his Life of
Schumann, says on this point,--

  "It seems right that he should have retained the most primitive form of
  the oratorio, that of the passion-music. The poem has no genuinely
  dramatic course; there was not the smallest intrinsic or extrinsic
  reason to dramatize it more fully. Even with treatment such as that of
  the 'Walpurgisnacht,' it must have lost much of its picturesque
  development The only proper way to treat the subject, therefore, was to
  retain the original epic form, and to introduce a narrator in the style
  of antique oratorio, who should relate the facts in a few simple words
  up to the point where they seem to demand a more dramatic setting."

Von Wasielewski also discusses the same point:

  "The narrator is evidently copied from the evangelist in Bach's
  passion-music; but by no means with a like necessity. Unquestionably
  the latter shared the conviction of his day, that not only the
  substance, but the words, of the biblical dogma were sacred. Schumann's
  case was not at all similar. He had before him, in the poem to be set
  to music, a work of art which, although once remodelled, would still
  permit every formal change required by æsthetic considerations. How
  easy, for example, it would have been to abolish the narrator, as
  destructive of unity!"

Had the narrative passages been omitted, it would unquestionably have
enhanced the interest and perhaps relieved the monotony and wearisomeness
of some parts of the work. Unlike the usual manner in which the
narrator's part is treated,--as a mere recitative link between
numbers,--Schumann invests it with the same importance as the acts and
events themselves, and treats it melodically, so that the relief which
comes from contrast is lacking.

The oratorio is written in three parts, for solo voices, chorus, and
orchestra, the principals being the Peri (soprano); the Angel (alto); the
King of Gazna (bass); a Youth (tenor); the Horseman (baritone); and the
Maiden (soprano). The choruses are sung by Indians, Angels, Houris, and
Genii of the Nile, and the part of Narrator is divided among the various
voices. The story follows that of the original poem. The Peri, expelled
from Paradise, stands at its gate weeping to think

            "her recreant race
    Should e'er have lost that sacred place."

The angel who keeps the gate of light promises she shall be re-admitted
if she brings "the gift that is most dear to Heaven." The Peri goes in
quest of the gift, first to India, where she procures the last drop of
blood shed by the hero who resisted the tyrant Mahmoud, and takes it with
her to the gate; but the crystal bar moves not. She continues her quest,
and from the pestilential plains of Egypt she takes back the last sigh of
the maiden who sacrificed herself to her love for the youth who stole out
to die alone. But still the crystal bar moves not. At last, in the vale
of Baalbec, she finds the gift,--the tear of a repentant sinner,--which
secures her admission.

After a brief orchestral introduction, the Narrator (alto) tells the
story of the disconsolate Peri at the gate, and introduces her in the
first solo ("How blest seem to me, vanished Child of Air"), a tender,
beautiful melody, characterized by romantic sentiment. The Narrator
(tenor) introduces the Angel, who delivers her message to the Peri ("One
Hope is thine"), to which the latter replies in a sensuous melody, full
of Oriental color ("I know the Wealth hidden in every Urn"). The tenor
Narrator introduces at this point a quartet ("O beauteous Land"), in
which the two trebles, tenor, and bass alternate, followed by the full,
powerful chorus, "But crimson now her Rivers ran." A weird march, fairly
barbaric in its effect, indicates the approach of the tyrant of Gazna,
and introduces the stirring chorus of the Indians and Conquerors ("Hail
to Mahmoud"). The tenor Narrator describes the youthful warrior standing
alone beside his native river and defying the tyrant. Once more the
chorus shouts its greeting to Mahmoud, and then ensues a dialogue in
recitative between the two, leading up to the youth's death and a double
chorus of lamentation ("Woe, for false flew the Shaft"). The tenor
Narrator describes the flight of the Peri to catch the last drop of blood
shed for liberty; and then all the voices join with the soprano solo in a
broad, strong, exultant finale ("For Blood must holy be"), which is one
of the most effective numbers in the work.

The second part opens in the most charming manner. The tenor Narrator
pictures the return of the Peri with her gift, leading up to the Angel's
solo ("Sweet is our welcome"), which preludes a brief choral passage for
sixteen female voices. After the Narrator's declaration of her
disappointment, the scene changes to Egypt, and in a dainty, delicate
three-part chorus the Spirits of the Nile are invoked not to disturb the
Peri. Her lament is heard ("O Eden, how longeth for thee my Heart!"), and
the Spirits now weave a gentle, sympathetic strain with her song. A long
tenor narration follows ("Now wanders forth the Peri sighing"),
describing the pestilence brooding over the Egyptian plains, the music to
which is very characteristic. The scene of the maiden dying with her
lover is full of pathos, and contains two exquisite numbers,--the
narrative solo for mezzo-soprano ("Poor Youth, thus deserted"), and the
dying love-song of the Maiden ("O let me only breathe the Air, Love").
The scene closes with a sweet and gentle lament for the pair ("Sleep
on"), sung by the Peri, followed by the chorus, which joins in the
pathetic farewell.

The third part opens with a lovely chorus of Houris ("Wreathe ye the
Steps to Great Allah's Throne"), interspersed with solos and Oriental in
its coloring. The tenor narration ("Now Morn is blushing in the Sky"),
which is very melodious in character, introduces the Angel, who in an
alto solo ("Not yet") once more dooms the Peri to wander. Her reply
("Rejected and sent from Eden's Door") is full of despair. The narration
is now taken by the baritone in a flowing, breezy strain ("And now o'er
Syria's rosy Plain"), which is followed by a charming quartet of Peris
("Say, is it so?"). Once more the baritone intervenes, followed by the
Peri; and then the tenor Narrator takes up the theme in a stirring
description of the boy nestling amid the roses, and the "passion-stained"
horseman at the fountain. The alto proclaims the vesper call to prayer,
and the tenor reflects upon the memories of the wretched man as he sees
the child kneeling. The solo baritone announces his repentance, followed
by a quartet and chorus in very broad, full harmony ("O blessed Tears of
true Repentance!"). The next number is a double one, composed of soprano
and tenor solos with chorus ("There falls a Drop on the Land of Egypt").
In an exultant, triumphant strain ("Joy, joy forever, my Work is done!"),
the Peri sings her happiness, and the chorus brings the work to a close
with the heavenly greeting, "Oh, welcome 'mid the Blessed!" The third
part is unquestionably long and wearisome, and taxes not only the voices
of the singers, but also the patience of the hearers. The first and
second, however, contain some beautiful gems, and the orchestral work is
very rich in its coloring. Taken all in all, however, it is a severe
treatment of a fanciful subject.




                                 SPOHR.


Louis Spohr, one of the world's greatest violinists, and a composer of
world-wide fame, was born at Brunswick, April 25, 1784. Like all great
musical geniuses, his ability was displayed very early. He began to play
the violin in his fifth year, and to compose for that instrument before
he was in his teens. After studying the rudiments with several teachers,
the Duke of Brunswick induced Franz Eck, a recognized master of the
violin, to give him instruction. Spohr remained with him two years, and
accompanied him on his travels to Russia, studying, composing, and
learning much by his observation of Eck's playing. In 1805 he was
appointed leader of the band of the Duke of Gotha, and began writing
orchestral works, his compositions before that time having been mainly
for the violin. His first opera, "Die Prüfung," also appeared about this
time. In 1807 he made a very successful tour through Germany, and another
in 1809, arousing great enthusiasm by his admirable playing. In that year
also occurred the first musical festival in Germany, which was conducted
by Spohr at Frankenhausen, in Thuringia. In 1811 another was held, for
which he wrote his first symphony. In 1812 his first oratorio, "Das
jüngste Gericht," appeared; but after two performances of it he was
greatly dissatisfied, and laid it aside. In the fall of that year he made
his first public appearance in Vienna, and achieved such success that he
was offered and accepted the leadership of the band at the
Theater-an-der-Wien. He remained there only three years, however, and
then resumed his professional tours in Switzerland and Italy. In 1818 he
was appointed conductor of the opera at Frankfort, where he remained for
two years, during which time he brought out his operas "Faust" and
"Zemire and Azor." In 1820 he went to England for the first time, and
played many of his compositions in the Philharmonic concerts. His English
visit was a very successful one, and on his journey back to Germany he
stopped in Paris, where also he met with an enthusiastic welcome. He
finally settled down at Dresden, where Weber was then busy with the
preparations for the performance of his "Freischütz." During his stay
there, Weber had been offered the post of Hofkapellmeister to the Elector
of Cassel; but not being in a position to accept it, he recommended
Spohr, and the latter obtained the appointment Jan. 1, 1822, where he
remained the rest of his days, as it was a life-office. During this year
he finished his opera "Jessonda," one of the most successful of all his
vocal works. Four years later he conducted the Rhenish Festival at
Düsseldorf and brought out his second oratorio, "Die letzten Dinge" ("The
Last Things"). In 1831 he completed his "Violin School," which has ever
since been a standard work. His most important symphony, "Die Weihe der
Töne" ("The Consecration of Sound"), was produced at Cassel in 1832, and
his third oratorio, "Des Heiland's letzte Stunden" ("Calvary"), at the
same place in 1835. Four years later he went to England again, and
produced his "Calvary" at the Norwich Festival with immense success,
which led to his reception of a commission to produce "The Fall of
Babylon" for the Festival of 1842. His last opera, "The Crusaders," was
written in 1844, but did not meet with a permanent success. From this
time until 1857 he was engaged in making tours and producing the works of
other composers, among them those of Wagner, whose "Tannhäuser" he
brought out in 1853, in spite of the Elector's opposition. In 1857 he was
pensioned, and two years later died. He was born a musician and died one,
and in his long and honorable life he was always true to his art and did
much to ennoble and dignify it, notwithstanding the curious combinations
in his musical texture. He never could understand or appreciate
Beethoven. He proclaimed himself a disciple of Mozart, though he had
little in common with him, and he declared Wagner the greatest of all
living composers, on the strength of his "Flying Dutchman" alone. As a
performer, he was one of the best of any period.




                           The Last Judgment.


Spohr wrote two oratorios upon the same subject,--"Das jüngste Gericht"
("The Last Judgment") and "Die letzten Dinge" ("The Last Things"); but
the latter is now universally entitled "The Last Judgment," and the
former was shelved by the composer himself shortly after its performance.
His autobiography gives us some interesting details of each. After a
concert-tour to Hamburg, Spohr returned to Gotha, and found there a
letter from Bischoff, the Precentor of Frankenhausen, informing him that
he had been commanded by the Governor of Erfurt to arrange a musical
festival there in celebration of the birthday of Napoleon, August 15. He
invited Spohr to assume its direction and to write an oratorio for the
occasion. Previous to this a poet in Erfurt had offered him the text
called "The Last Judgment," and Spohr determined to avail himself of it.
He writes,--

  "I sent for the libretto and set to work at once. But I soon felt that
  for the oratorio style I was yet too deficient in counterpoint and in
  fugueing. I therefore suspended my work in order to make the
  preliminary studies requisite for the subject. From one of my pupils I
  borrowed Marpurg's 'Art of Fugue-writing,' and was soon deeply and
  continuously engaged in the study of that work. After I had written
  half a dozen fugues according to its instruction, the last of which
  seemed to me very successful, I resumed the composition of my oratorio,
  and completed it without allowing anything else to intervene. According
  to a memorandum I made, it was begun in January, 1812, and finished in
  June."

In this connection Spohr tells the following humorous story:--

  "One of the solo-singers alone, who sang the part of Satan, did not
  give me satisfaction. The part, which was written with a powerful
  instrumentation, I gave, by the advice of Bischoff, to a village
  schoolmaster in the neighborhood of Gotha who was celebrated throughout
  the whole district for his colossal bass voice. In power of voice he
  had indeed quite sufficient to outroar a whole orchestra; but in
  science and in music he could by no means execute the part in a
  satisfactory manner. I taught and practised him in the part myself, and
  took great pains to assist him a little. But without much success; for
  when the day of public trial came, he had totally forgotten every
  instruction and admonition, and gave such loose to his barbarian voice
  that he first of all frightened the auditory, and then set it in roars
  of laughter."

It is clear from Spohr's remarks that he was satisfied with the choruses
and fugues, but not with the solo parts of Jesus and Mary, which were in
the florid cantata style of that day. He subsequently determined to
re-write them; but "when about to begin," he says, "it seemed to me as
though I could no longer enter into the spirit of the subject, and so it
remained undone. To publish the work as it was, I could not make up my
mind. Thus in later years it has lain by without any use being made of
it."

Thirteen years afterwards he wrote "Die letzten Dinge," now so well known
as "The Last Judgment." He says in one of his letters,--

  "In the same year [1825] Councillor Rochlitz, the editor of the
  'Leipsic Musical Journal,' offered me the text of an oratorio, 'Die
  letzten Dinge,' to compose for, which I received with great pleasure,
  as my previous attempt in that style of art, 'Das jüngste Gericht,' by
  no means pleased me any longer, and therefore I had not once been
  disposed to perform a single number of it at the meeting of our
  Society.... The whole work was finished by Good Friday [1826], and then
  first performed complete in the Lutheran Church. It was in the evening,
  and the church was lighted up. My son-in-law, Wolff, who had been long
  in Rome, proposed to illuminate the church as at Rome on Good Friday,
  with lights disposed overhead in the form of a cross, and carried out
  his idea. A cross fourteen feet long, covered with silver-foil and hung
  with six hundred glass lamps, was suspended overhead in the middle of
  the church, and diffused so bright a light that one could everywhere
  clearly read the text-books. The musicians and singers, nearly two
  hundred in number, were placed in the gallery of the church, arranged
  in rows one above the other, and for the most part unseen by the
  auditory, which, amounting to nearly two thousand persons, observed a
  solemn stillness. My two daughters, Messrs. Wild, Albert, and Föppel,
  together with an amateur, sang the soli, and the performance was
  faultless. The effect was, I must myself say, extraordinary."

The title of the work is clearly a misnomer, as well as a mistranslation,
for it contains nothing of the terrors of the Last Judgment, but, on the
other hand, is graceful and elegant in style. The affixing of this title
to it is said to have been the work of Professor Taylor, who arranged it
for the Norwich festival of 1830, and supposed he was preparing the
earlier oratorio, "Das jüngste Gericht." The title has now become so
indissolubly connected with it that no effort has been made to change it.
In the first part the text is confined to ascriptions of praise. The
solo, "Blessing, honor, glory, and power be unto him that sitteth upon
the throne, and unto the Lamb forever," conveys the meaning of the whole
first part; while the second part is confined to those portions of the
Apocalypse which describe the terrible signs of the last day, concluding
with visions of the new heaven and a hallelujah. And yet Malibran, in her
biography of Spohr, calls the oratorio a musical copy of Michael Angelo's
"Last Judgment,"--showing that more than one person has confounded the
two oratorios.

The work opens with a very long overture of a grave and majestic
character, in limits far beyond those usually found in oratorio. It is
followed by the striking chorus, "Praise His awful Name," which is
beautifully written, and contains impressive soprano and bass solos. Some
brief tenor and bass recitatives lead to the second number, a short
chorus ("Holy, holy, Lord God of Hosts"), in which the voices have no
accompaniment except the horns. Three phrases of recitative for soprano
and tenor lead to the next chorus ("All Glory to the Lamb that died"), a
grand number, which is familiar to nearly every lover of oratorio music.
The next number is one of the most striking in the work. A short tenor
recitative introduces the tenor solo and chorus, "Blessing, honor, glory,
and power," beginning with a tranquil and smoothly flowing solo, the
chorus opening in the same manner, then developing into an admirably
written fugue, and closing in the same serene style as it opened. A very
dramatic and picturesque scene follows, comprising the tenor recitative
("And lo! a mighty Host"), with a very striking accompaniment descriptive
of "the mighty host of all nations and people that stood before the
throne and the Lamb," and the exquisite quartet and chorus ("Lord God of
Heaven and Earth") which close the first part.

The second part opens with an orchestral symphony which heralds the signs
and portents of the Day of Judgment in graphic style. It is followed by a
long bass recitative with intensely dramatic accompaniment:--

      "The day of wrath is near.
      The Almighty shall reveal His power.
      The reaper's song is silent in the field,
      And the shepherd's voice on the mountain.
      The valleys then shall shake with fear,
      With dread the hills shall tremble.
      It comes, the day of terror comes!
      The awful morning dawns!
      Thy mighty arm, O God, is uplifted.
      Thou shalt shake the earth and heavens.
      They shall shrivel as a scroll
      When Thou in wrath appearest."

The text indicates the dramatic nature of the subject, and it is treated
with a force and vigor that are in striking contrast with the tenderness
and serenity, at times rising to exultation, that characterize the
remainder of the work. This recitative leads to the very pathetic duet
for soprano and tenor, "Forsake me not in this dread hour," which is a
gem of beautiful melody, followed by the response of the chorus in
unison, "If with your whole Hearts." After a short tenor recitative,
another strong chorus ensues ("Destroyed is Babylon"), with an agitated
and powerful accompaniment, which continues for some time after the
voices cease, once interrupted by the tenor proclaiming "It is ended,"
and then coming to a close in a gentle pianissimo effect. A tender,
melodious quartet and chorus ("Blest are the Departed") follows. The
soprano voice announces the new heaven and earth. A short tenor
recitative ("Behold! He soon shall come") and the quartet response ("Then
come, Lord Jesus") prepare the way for the final massive chorus ("Great
and wonderful are all Thy Works"), which begins with a few bars of full
harmony, then develops into a vigorous fugue, which, after choral
announcements of hallelujah, is followed by another fugue ("Thine is the
Kingdom"), closing with a tumultuous ascription of praise, and Amen. The
solo parts in the oratorio are always short and of a reflective
character. It is peculiarly a choral work, of which, with one or two
exceptions, the predominant traits are sweetness, tenderness, and grace.
In these exceptions, like the great chorus, "Destroyed is Babylon," with
its wonderful accompaniments, it reaches a high strain of sublimity.




                                SULLIVAN.


The great popularity which Arthur Seymour Sullivan has enjoyed for a few
years past, growing out of his extraordinarily successful series of comic
operettas, beginning with "The Sorcerer" (1877), which first caught the
public fancy, and ending with "The Mikado" (1885), has almost
overshadowed the permanent foundations upon which his reputation must
rest; namely, his serious and sacred music. He was born in London, May
13, 1842. His father, a band-master and clarinet-player of distinction,
intrusted his musical education at first to the Rev. Thomas Hilmore,
master of the children of the Chapel Royal. He entered the Chapel in 1854
and remained there three years, and also studied in the Royal Academy of
Music under Goss and Sterndale Bennett during this period, leaving the
latter institution in 1858, in which year he went to Leipsic. He remained
in the Conservatory there until 1861, when he returned to London and
introduced himself to its musical public with his music to Shakspeare's
"Tempest," which made a great success. The enthusiasm with which this was
received and the favors he gained at the hands of Chorley, at that time
musical critic of the "Athenæum," gave him a secure footing. The cantata
"Kenilworth," written for the Birmingham Festival, the music to the
ballet "L'Île enchantée," and an opera, "The Sapphire Necklace," were
produced in 1864. In 1866 appeared his first symphony, which has been
played not only in England, but also in Germany, and an overture, "In
Memoriam,"--a tribute to his father, who died that year. The next year
his overture "Marmion" was first performed. In 1869 he wrote his first
oratorio, "The Prodigal Son," in 1873 "The Light of the World," and in
1880 "The Martyr of Antioch;" the first for the Worcester, the second for
the Birmingham, and the third for the Leeds festivals. The beautiful
"Overture di Ballo," so frequently played in this country by the Thomas
orchestra, was written for Birmingham in 1870, and the next year appeared
his brilliant cantata "On Shore and Sea." On the 11th of May, 1867, was
first heard in public his little comic operetta "Cox and Box." It was the
first in that series of extraordinary successes, really dating from "The
Sorcerer," which are almost without parallel in the operatic world, and
which have made his name and that of his collaborator, Gilbert, household
words. He has done much for sacred as well as for secular music. In
addition to his oratorios he has written numerous anthems, forty-seven
hymn-tunes, two Te Deums, several carols, part-songs, and choruses, and
in 1872 edited the collection of "Church Hymns with Tunes" for the
Christian Knowledge Society.

He received the honorary degree of Doctor of Music from Cambridge in
1876, and from Oxford in 1879, and in 1883 was knighted by the Queen.




                            The Prodigal Son.


"The Prodigal Son," the first of Sullivan's oratorios, was written for
the Worcester Festival in England, and performed for the first time Sept.
8, 1869. It is a short work, comprising but eighteen numbers, and very
melodious in character. In his preface to the work the composer says,--

  "It is a remarkable fact that the parable of the Prodigal Son should
  never before have been chosen as the text of a sacred musical
  composition. The story is so natural and pathetic, and forms so
  complete a whole; its lesson is so thoroughly Christian; the
  characters, though few, are so perfectly contrasted; and the
  opportunity for the employment of local color is so obvious,--that it
  is indeed astonishing to find the subject so long overlooked.

  "The only drawback is the shortness of the narrative, and the
  consequent necessity for filling it out with material drawn from
  elsewhere. In the present case this has been done as sparingly as
  possible, and entirely from the Scriptures. In so doing, the Prodigal
  himself has been conceived, not as of a naturally brutish and depraved
  disposition,--a view taken by many commentators, with apparently little
  knowledge of human nature, and no recollection of their own youthful
  impulses,--but rather as a buoyant, restless youth, tired of the
  monotony of home, and anxious to see what lay beyond the narrow
  confines of his father's farm, going forth in the confidence of his own
  simplicity and ardor, and led gradually away into follies and sins
  which at the outset would have been as distasteful as they were strange
  to him. The episode with which the parable concludes has no dramatic
  connection with the former and principal portion, and has therefore not
  been treated."

In reality there are but six of the eighteen numbers concerned with the
narration of the parable. The remainder moralize upon the story and
illustrate its teaching. After a short, simple orchestral prelude, an
opening chorus, beginning with soprano solo ("There is Joy in the
Presence of the Angels of God"), and containing also alto and bass solos,
gives the key to the whole work in reflective style, as it proclaims the
rejoicing in heaven over the "one sinner that repenteth." At its
conclusion the parable begins with tenor recitative and solo, "A certain
man had two sons," in which the Prodigal asks for his portion of goods.
In a bass aria preceded by recitative, the father gives him good advice,
"Honor the Lord," and presumably his portion also, as the soprano recites
in the next number that "he took his journey into a far country, and
there wasted his substance in riotous living." Thereupon follows a very
melodious and vivacious chorus ("Let us eat and drink; to-morrow we
die"), in which the tenor has an important part. The response to the
bacchanal comes in the next number, a brief chorus beginning with the
alto recitative, "Woe unto them." One of the gems of the work, a pretty
alto song, "Love not the World," intervenes at this point. At its
conclusion the narrative is resumed.

After an effective prelude by orchestra, the soprano recitative relates
the famine and the experiences of the Prodigal among the swine, leading
up to a pretty aria ("O that thou hadst hearkened"). The tenor follows
with an expressive aria ("How many hired Servants of my Father's"). The
narrative again halts to give place to a very taking chorus ("The
Sacrifices of God"), after which we have the return and reconciliation
("And he arose and came to his Father"),--a very dramatic duet for tenor
and bass, followed by the vigorous and exultant bass aria ("For this my
Son was dead") of the father. The parable ends here; but the music goes
on moralizing upon and illustrating the theme in four effective
numbers,--the chorus, "O that Men would praise the Lord," which is the
longest and best constructed in the work; the recitative and aria for
tenor, "Come, ye Children;" the unaccompanied quartet, "The Lord is
nigh;" and the final chorus, "Thou, O Lord, art our Father," closing with
a Hallelujah in full, broad harmony.




                         The Light of the World.


Sir Arthur Sullivan's second oratorio, "The Light of the World," is laid
out upon a much larger scale in every way than "The Prodigal Son."  It
was written for the Birmingham Festival of 1873, was given for the first
time on the 27th of August. The purpose of the work, as the composer
explains in his preface, is to set forth the human aspects of the life of
our Lord upon earth, by the use of some of the actual incidents in his
career which bear witness to his attributes as preacher, healer, and
prophet. "To give it dramatic force," he says,--

  "The work has been laid out in scenes dealing respectively, in the
  first part with the nativity, preaching, healing, and prophesying of
  our Lord, ending with the triumphal entry into Jerusalem; and in the
  second part, with the utterances which, containing the avowal of
  himself as the Son of Man, excited to the utmost the wrath of his
  enemies, and led the rulers to conspire for his betrayal and death; the
  solemn recital by the chorus of his sufferings, and the belief in his
  final reward; the grief of Mary Magdalene at the sepulchre; and the
  consolation and triumph of the Disciples at the resurrection of their
  Lord and Master."

The first part has four scenes, "Bethlehem," "Nazareth," "Lazarus" (which
might more appropriately have been entitled "Bethany"), and "The Way to
Jerusalem." The scenes of the second part are laid entirely in Jerusalem.
"Bethlehem" includes the message of the angels to the shepherds, their
visit to Mary, the nativity, the warning by the angel to Mary and Joseph
of Herod's design, the lament and consolation of Rachel in Rama, and the
promise of God's blessing upon the child. In "Nazareth" we have a scene
representing Christ in the synagogue reading from Isaiah and declaring
himself the object of the prophecy, his expulsion by the incredulous
crowd of listeners, and his exhortations to his disciples, when left
alone with them, to bear their persecutions with meekness. "Lazarus"
describes the journey to Bethany and our Lord's assurances to the
bereaved sisters that their brother shall rise again. "The Way to
Jerusalem" scene is indicated by its title,--the entry of the Lord into
the city amid the hosannas and exultant acclamations of the people. In
the second part, we have the discourse concerning the sheep and the
goats, the interview between the ruler and the people, and the former's
anger with Nicodemus, the sufferings and death of Christ, and the
resurrection and joy of the disciples as they glorify God and sing the
praises of their risen Master.

The work opens with a prologue chorus ("There shall come forth a Rod out
of the Stem of Jesse"), at the close of which the "Bethlehem" scene
begins. It is preluded with a quiet but effective pastoral movement for
the orchestra, a tenor recitative ("There were Shepherds abiding in the
Field"), and a contralto solo announcing the heavenly message to the
Shepherds, which lead up to a spirited "Gloria" by the sopranos and
altos, followed by a chorus of the Shepherds ("Let us now go even unto
Bethlehem") for male voices. A Shepherd, in brief recitative passages,
declares to Mary, "Blessed art thou among Women," followed by the soprano
solo, "My Soul doth magnify the Lord." After the Virgin's expression of
thanks, the Shepherds join in the chorus, "The whole Earth is at rest,"
which is peculiarly striking in its contrasts. A short recitative by the
Angel, warning Mary to flee into Egypt, is followed by a very sombre
chorus ("In Rama was there a Voice"). At its close, the tenor is heard in
a tender aria ("Refrain thy Voice from weeping"), leading to a chorus
full of spirited harmony, and rising to a very effective climax ("I will
pour My Spirit"), which closes the scene.

The "Nazareth" scene opens with a baritone solo ("The Spirit of the Lord
is upon me"), in which Jesus declares himself in the synagogue as the
object of the prophecy from Isaiah which he has been reading. The Jews
answer in a very dramatic chorus ("Whence hath this Man his Wisdom?").
Again Jesus interposes with the declaration, "A prophet is not without
honor save in his own country;" whereupon the people break out in a still
more dramatic chorus ("Is not this Jesus?"), set to a very effective
accompaniment. For the third time Jesus declares himself, followed by the
stirring, furious chorus, "Why hear ye him?" A tender and at times fervid
solo ("Lord, who hath believed our Report?") leads to a very effective
quintet ("Doubtless Thou art our Father"). After another brief baritone
solo ("Blessed are they"), we come to the chorus, "He maketh the Sun to
rise," which is one of the most beautifully written in the work, and
closes the scene.

The third scene, "Lazarus," begins with the description of the mournful
journey to Bethany, the arrival among the kindred and friends, who are
trying to comfort the bereaved sisters, and closes at the still unopened
grave. It includes a duet between tenor and baritone, the former a
Disciple, the latter Jesus, whose music is invariably sung by the
baritone voice; a solo for alto ("Weep ye not for the Dead"), with a
sombre orchestral prelude, and accompanied by a chorus in its close; a
dialogue between Martha and Jesus ("Lord, if thou hadst been here"); a
short but very beautiful chorus ("Behold how he loved him!"); the
baritone solo, "Said I not unto thee;" and a final chorus of great power
("The Grave cannot praise thee").

The last scene of the first part, "The Way to Jerusalem," is very
brilliant throughout, and is in cheerful contrast with the general
sombreness of the preceding numbers. It opens with a brief dialogue
between Jesus and a Disciple ("Master, get thee out, and depart hence"),
which leads to a charming three-part chorus for children's voices
("Hosanna to the Son of David"), with a prominent harp part in the
accompaniment, and worked up to a fine climax. A brilliant soprano solo
("Tell ye the Daughter of Zion") intervenes, followed by a short dialogue
between Jesus and a Pharisee, which leads to the vigorous chorus of the
Disciples, "Blessed be the Kingdom." After another baritone solo ("If
thou hadst known, O Jerusalem") the children's hosanna is repeated,--this
time with the power of the full chorus; and the first part comes to a
close.

The first part opens with a prelude of a few bars; but the second begins
with a long overture, very effectively written, and intended, as the
composer himself says, to indicate the angry feelings and dissensions
caused by the Lord's presence in Jerusalem. At its close the baritone, in
one of the most forcible solos assigned to this part ("When the Son of
Man shall come in his Glory"), discourses the parable of the sheep and
goats. The wondering chorus of the People, "Is not this he whom they seek
to kill?" follows, and then ensues a somewhat tedious scene. A Ruler
argues with the People, contemptuously asking if Christ shall come out of
Galilee. The People remain unconvinced, however. Nicodemus then strives
to reason with the Ruler, with the natural effect of making him very
angry. All this leads up to an effective female chorus ("The Hour is
come"). In a very tender and pathetic solo ("Daughters of Jerusalem")
Jesus sings his farewell. The incidents of the crucifixion are avoided,
as the work is intended only to illustrate the human career of Jesus. The
rest of the story is told in narrative form; an unaccompanied quartet
("Yea, though I walk") and a powerful, but gloomy chorus, describing
Christ's sufferings ("Men and Brethren"), bring us to the sepulchre. The
scene opens with the plaint of Mary Magdalene, "Where have they laid
him?" and the response of the Angel, who tells her Christ has risen,
which is followed by a six-part unaccompanied chorus ("The Lord is
risen"). A short tenor solo ("If ye be risen with Christ") leads directly
to the final chorus ("Him hath God exalted"), which is worked up in fugal
form with much spirit.




                                 VERDI.


Giuseppe Verdi, the greatest of living Italian opera composers, was born
at Roncale, Oct. 9, 1813. Like many another musician, he sprang from
humble and rude beginnings, his parents having kept a small inn and
notion store in the little Italian village. His musical talent displayed
itself very early. In his tenth year he was appointed organist in the
place of Baistrocchi, the master with whom he had been studying at
Busseto. Through the generosity of his patron, M. Barezzi, he was sent to
Milan, where he was refused admission to the Conservatory, on the ground
that he showed "no special aptitude for music!" Nothing daunted, the
young composer, acting on the suggestions of the conductor of La Scala,
studied composition and orchestration with M. Lavigne, himself a composer
of no mean ability. In 1833 Verdi returned to Busseto, and five years
later went back to Milan, where he began his wonderfully successful
career as an operatic composer. His first opera, "Oberto Conte di S.
Bonifacio," appeared in 1839, and was followed by a series of operatic
works that have achieved world-wide success and placed their composer at
the head of all contemporary Italian writers. The most important of them
are: "Nabucco" (1842); "I Lombardi" (1843); "Ernani" (1844); "Attila"
(1846); "Macbeth" (1847); "I Masnadieri" (1847); "Luisa Miller" (1849);
"Rigoletto" (1851); "Il Trovatore" (1853); "La Traviata" (1853); "The
Sicilian Vespers" (1855); "The Masked Ball" (1857); "The Force of
Destiny" (1862); "Don Carlos" (1867); "Aïda" (1871). In the last-named
opera, Verdi departs from the purely Italian school of operatic writing
and shows the unmistakable signs of Wagner's influence upon him. Now, in
his seventy-third year, comes the intelligence that he has completed
still another opera, on the subject of "Othello," which will soon be
placed in rehearsal in Paris. In the interval between "Aïda" and
"Othello" he wrote the "Manzoni Requiem," a "Pater Noster" for five
voices, and an "Ave Maria" for soprano solo. He has also written several
marches, short symphonies, concertos for piano, minor church
compositions, a stringed quartet, a "Stabat Mater," the choruses to
Manzoni's tragedies, and numerous songs and romances for the
drawing-room. With his wife, Madame Strepponi, he has spent a very quiet
life in his villa at S. Agato, looking after his farming operations, to
which of late years he has given more attention than to music. In a
letter addressed to the Italian critic, Filippi, he writes: "I know very
well that you are also a most distinguished musician and devoted to your
art: ... but Piave and Mariani must have told you that at S. Agato we
neither make nor talk about music, and you will run the risk of finding a
piano not only out of tune, but very likely without strings." He has been
overwhelmed with decorations and honors, but has studiously avoided
public life and the turmoil of the world. In 1866 he was elected a member
of the Italian Parliament from Busseto, but sent in his resignation
shortly afterwards; and in 1875 was appointed senator by the King, but
never took his seat. His fame is indissolubly connected with his music,
and in the pursuit of that art he has become one of the most admired
composers of his time.




                          The Manzoni Requiem.


The history of "The Manzoni Requiem" is of more than ordinary interest.
Shortly after Rossini's death, in 1868, Verdi conceived the idea of a
requiem in his memory, to be written by many hands, which should be
performed in the cathedral of Bologna on each centenary of the composer's
death, but upon no other occasion and at no other place. The project met
with favor. The work was laid out in thirteen numbers and assigned to
thirteen Italian composers, Verdi taking the "Libera me," which was to be
the last number in the work. Each of the composers finished his task; but
when the parts were joined in a complete requiem they were found to be so
dissimilar in treatment, and the whole work so incoherent and lacking in
symmetry and unity, that the scheme went no further. M. Mazzucato, of
Milan, who had examined the work, was so impressed with the "Libera me"
that he wrote to Verdi urging him to compose the entire requiem.

About this time (1873) Alessandro Manzoni, the founder of the romantic
school in Italian literature, died, and was universally mourned by his
countrymen. The requiem which had been intended for Rossini was now
written by Verdi for his friend, the great Italian patriot and poet, the
immortal author of "I promessi Sposi," and the "Libera me" was
transferred to it. It was performed for the first time at Milan, May 22,
1874, the anniversary of Manzoni's death, with Teresa Stolz soprano,
Maria Waldmann alto, Giuseppe Capponi tenor, and Ormondo Maini bass, a
chorus of a hundred and twenty voices, and an orchestra of a hundred and
ten. It was next given in Paris, in the following month, under the
composer's direction and since that time has been frequently given in
Europe and in the United States.

The mass is divided into seven parts, with solos, choruses, and full
orchestra, as follows: No. 1. "Requiem" and "Kyrie" (quartet and chorus).
2. "Dies Iræ;" thus divided: "Dies Iræ" (chorus); "Tuba Mirum" (chorus);
"Liber scriptus" (chorus and fugue); "Quid sum miser" (trio for soprano,
alto, and tenor); "Rex tremendæ" (quartet and chorus); "Recordare" (duo
for soprano and alto, and chorus); "Ingemisco" (solo for tenor);
"Confutatis" (solo for bass); "Lacrymosa" (quartet and chorus). 3.
"Domine Jesu," offertory, by quartet. 4. "Sanctus" (fugue with double
chorus). 5. "Agnus Dei" (duet for soprano and alto, and chorus). 6. "Lux
æterna" (trio for alto, tenor, and bass). 7. "Libera me" (solo for
soprano, chorus, and final fugue).

The "Requiem" opens, after a few measures of prelude, with the chorus
chanting the appeal for rest sotto voce, the effect being carried as
pianissimo as possible until the basses, by an abrupt change of key, give
out the theme of a fugue ("Te decet hymnus"), written in pure religious
style. The introductory "Requiem" is repeated, and leads to the "Kyrie,"
the theme of which is stated by the tenor, and in turn taken up by the
other soloists, the chorus shortly joining, a double sextet interwoven
with it, and the whole closing pianissimo, as the "Requiem" opened.

The second part, the "Dies Iræ," is in strong contrast with the first,
and is more broadly and dramatically worked up, and with freer
accompaniment. The opening chorus is one of startling power. The tenors
and basses open the number, immediately followed by the four parts
announcing the Day of Wrath in high, sustained notes, while the second
sopranos, altos, and tenors accompany them with immense sweeps of sound
that rise and fall like the waves. There are nine numbers in this part
which have been already specified, the most effective of them being the
adagio trio ("Quid sum miser") for soprano, alto, and tenor, upon which
Verdi has lavished his melodious inspiration. The trio is continually
interwoven with the chorus shouting fortissimo the "Rex tremendæ
majestatis," until it takes another form in the prayer, "Recordare," a
duet for soprano and alto in Verdi's best operatic vein. A very effective
tenor solo, "Ingemisco," followed by a very solemn and majestic bass
solo, "Confutatis," lead to the stirring measures of the Day of Wrath
again, and close this part in an ensemble of immense power, both vocal
and dramatic.

The offertory ("Domine Jesu") is a quartet with three motives,--the first
andante, the second allegro, and the third adagio in Gregorian form, the
three themes being admirably worked up and accompanied. The "Sanctus"
(the fourth part of the mass) is a very impressive allegro double chorus,
followed by the "Agnus Dei," a duet for soprano and alto which is full of
melodious inspiration, illustrated with charming instrumental color; it
is the gem of the mass, and one of the happiest numbers Verdi has ever
scored. The sixth part is the "Lux æterna," a trio for alto, tenor, and
bass which is very dramatic in setting; and this leads to the "Libera,"
the final division and the climax of the work. It is in its general
effect a soprano obligato with chorus. After a monotone recitative and
solo, the "Dies Iræ" is repeated, likewise the "Requiem æternam" (which
forms the introduction of the mass), and closes with a fugue of majestic
proportions that finally ends in the same pianissimo effect as
characterizes the opening of the work.

Thus much of the work in detail. It remains to look at this mass as a
whole. The first thought that will strike the listener is its utter
dissimilarity to any other of Verdi's works, except "Aïda." Like that
opera, it is in his latest style,--an attempt to show the world that he
can write something besides melodies. Hence we find more decided
contrapuntal effects, the canon and fugue forms, and even the plain,
serious style of the early devotional music of the Church in the days of
Gregory and Palestrina. The second thought is that this mass, although it
has had Papal approval, is not so much a mass as it is a dramatic
threnody in memory of a loved friend. As compared with the masses of
Beethoven, Mozart, Haydn, and the other early mass-writers, it has not
their conventional form, their regular sequence of setting, their
coherence of spirit and sentiment. There are wide divergences in it from
the old beaten track. But it may be said, on the other hand, that while
the traditions are violated, Verdi does not so far lose sight of the
devotional character of his work as to descend to the light, tripping,
and sometimes fantastic measures of Rossini in the "Stabat Mater." Von
Bülow very nearly hit the truth in saying that "The Manzoni Requiem" is
an opera in ecclesiastical costume. The dramatic element is its strong
feature, and the inexhaustible resources of the composer's invention
strike the hearer as one of the chief characteristics. The first six
parts seem to have included nearly all that can be done, and you wonder
if the last part, the "Libera me," will not fall tamely; when to your
surprise it proves to be the grand culmination of the work, and presents,
with its solo and chorus and imposing fugue, an ensemble of effect, a
richness of instrumentation, a severe and almost classical form of
composition, and a dramatic intensity and passion that sweep the whole
range of power, from a fortissimo tutte forza, down to the faintest
whisper of a pianissimo. It bursts upon you like the thunder, and dies
away in the still small voice that whispers the requiem of everlasting
rest.




                        SACRED MUSIC IN AMERICA.


The following sketch of the rise and progress of sacred music in America
may prove of interest to the reader as a supplement to the history of the
Oratorio and of the numerous illustrations of that class of compositions
contained in the body of the book. Ritter, Gould, Hood, and other
church-music historians have been freely consulted to make the sketch as
complete as possible.

The psalmody of the Protestant church was first arranged and brought into
use in the course of the sixteenth century, through the efforts of the
reformers in Germany and particularly of Martin Luther, who was extremely
fond of music, and wrote a quaint discourse on the art. In 1524 he
published a collection of hymns which also comprised a few versified
psalms. These were set to music in four parts, as he says "for no other
reason than because of my desire that the young, who ought to be educated
in music as well as in other good arts, might have something to take the
place of worldly and amorous songs, and so learn something useful and
practise something virtuous, as becometh the young. I would be glad to
see all arts, and especially music, employed in the service of Him who
created them." Zwingle, Cranmer, Calvin, and Knox were also zealous
advocates of psalm-singing; and during the same century Tye, Tallis,
Bird, and Gibbons did a great work for ecclesiastical music in England.

At the time of the Reformation in England the Puritans proved themselves
zealous musical reformers. They reduced singing to the severest
simplicity. They had no sympathy with elaborate arrangements. Organs,
choir-books, and choir-singers were objects of their special antipathy.
One of these iconoclasts says: "This singing and saying of mass, matins,
or even-song is but roryng, howling, whisteling, mummying, conjuring and
jogelyng and the playing of orgayns a foolish vanitie." Latimer in 1537
notified the convent at Worcester: "Whenever there shall be any preaching
in your monastery all manner of singing and other ceremonies shall be
utterly laid aside." In 1562 it was proposed that the psalms should be
sung by the whole congregation, and that organs should be no longer used.
In the Confession of the Puritans (1571) they say: "Concerning the
singing of the psalms, we allow of the people's joining with one voice in
a plain tune, but not in tossing the psalms from one side to the other,
with intermingling of organs." An appeal was made to Parliament against
the singing of the noble cathedral music by "chanting choristers
disguised, as are all the rest, in white surplices, some in corner caps
and silly copes, imitating the fashion and manner of Antichrist the Pope,
that man of sin and child of perdition, with his other rabble of
miscreants and shavelings."

Sternhold, who was groom of the robes to Henry VIII. and afterwards groom
of the bed-chamber to Edward VI., was one of the most zealous of these
reformers. In connection with Hopkins, a clergyman and schoolmaster, he
versified a large number of the psalms and published them. They were
printed at first without music, but in 1562 they appeared with the notes
of the plain melody under the following title: "The whole Book of Psalms,
collected into English metre by T. Sternhold and J. Hopkins and others,
conferred with the Ebrue, with apt notes to sing them withal. Imprinted
by John Day." In this work there was but one part, the air, and each note
was accompanied by its name; but a few years later the psalms appeared
set to music in four parts. They were the work of William Damon, and his
book bore the title: "The Psalms of David to English Metre, with notes of
Four Parts set unto them, by Wm. Damon, to the Use of the Godly
Christians, for recreating themselves, instead of fond and unseemly
ballads. 1579." In 1599 there appeared a very ambitious work in folio
form, so arranged that four persons might sing from it, and bearing the
title: "The Psalms of David in Metre, the Plain song being the common
Tune, to be sung and played upon the Lute, Orpharion, Citterne, or
Bass-viol, severally or together; the singing Part to be either Tenor or
Treble to the instrument, according to the Nature of the Voice, or for
Four Voices; with Ten Short Tunes in the end, to which, for the most
part, all Psalms may be usually sung; for the Use of such as are of mean
Skill, and whose Leisure least serveth to practice. By Richard Allison,
Gent., Practitioner in the Art of Music." Notwithstanding its formidable
title, the work was not highly esteemed at the time. In 1621, Thomas
Ravenscroft, Bachelor of Music, published an excellent collection of
psalm tunes, many of which are still in use. In his preface he says, by
way of advice: "1. That psalms of tribulation be sung with a low voice
and long measure; 2. That psalms of thanksgiving be sung with a voice
indifferent, neither too loud nor too soft, and neither too swift nor too
slow; 3. That psalms of rejoicing be sung with a loud voice and a swift
and jocund measure." His preface closes with the pious wish that all his
patrons after death may join in the "Quire of Angels in the Heavens."

The date of the Ravenscroft collection brings us to the time of the
Pilgrims. When they loaded the "Mayflower" with their homely household
furniture, spinning-wheels, and arms of defence, and set out upon their
long and uncertain voyage to find a friendly shore where they might
worship God in their own fashion, the psalm-book was not forgotten. They
brought with them a version made by Henry Ainsworth of Amsterdam, in
which the notes set above the words were of lozenge shape. For twenty
years it was in exclusive use, though the Salem Church did not abandon it
until 1667, and the Plymouth Church retained the old favorite until 1692.
The Sternhold and Hopkins collection had also found its way over, but it
was used only at Ipswich and in its vicinity. In 1640 appeared the Bay
Psalm Book, issued from the Cambridge press. It was prepared by an
association of New England divines, most prominent among whom were Thomas
Welde, Richard Mather of Dorchester, and John Eliot of Roxbury, the
famous Indian missionary. Being new, it was at once regarded as an
innovation. The churches were soon in a wrangle, not only over the
contents of the new collection, but as to the methods of singing. Some
were opposed to singing altogether, while others insisted that only
Christian voices should be heard. At no time were the colonists very
learned in music. In the edition of the Bay Psalm Book printed in 1698,
the following concise directions appear:--

  "_First_, observe how many note-compass the tune is next the place of
  your first note, and how many notes above and below that, so as you may
  begin the tune of your first note, as the rest may be sung in the
  compass of your and the people's voices, without Squeaking above or
  Grumbling below. For the better understanding of which take note of the
  following directions:

  "Of the eight short Tunes used to four lines only, whose measure is to
  eight syllables on the first line, and six on the next; and may be sung
  to any Psalms of that measure.

  Oxford Tune.     }
  Litchfield Tune. } To Psalms Consolatory.
  Low Dutch Tune.  }

  York Tune.   }
  Winsor Tune. } To Psalms of Prayer, Confessions, and Funerals.

  Cambridge Short Tune to peculiar Psalms, as 21, 24, 33, 70, 86, first
  metre, 114, 132.

  "Those six short tunes, in tuning the first notes, will bear a cheerful
  high pitch; in regard to their whole compass from the lowest note, the
  highest is not above five or six notes.

  St. David's Tune. }
  Martyrs Tune.     } To Psalms of Praise and Thanksgiving.

  "These two tunes are eight notes compass above the first note, and
  therefore begin the first note low.

  "Of five long tunes following:

  "Hackney Tune--119 Psalm Tune, second metre. These two tunes begin your
  first note low, for the compass is nine notes, and eight above the
  first note of the tune.

  "100 Psalm Tune. This one tune begin your note indifferent high, in
  regard you are to fall your note lower than your first pitch note.

  "113 Psalm Tune, and 148 Psalm Tune.--These two tunes begin your first
  note low, in regard the Tune ascends eight notes above it."

The turmoil in the churches was settled for a time by Rev. John Cotton,
who issued a tract entitled "Singing of Psalms a Gospel ordinance, or a
Treatise wherein are handled these four Particulars: I. Touching the duty
itself. II. Touching the matter to be sung. III. Touching the singers.
IV. Touching the manner of singing." In this tract the author says:--

  "For the first Question we lay downe this conclusion for a Doctrine of
  Truth: That singing of Psalms with a lively voyce, is an holy duty of
  God's worship now in the day of the New Testament. When we say, singing
  with lively voyce, we suppose none will so farre misconstrue us as to
  thinke we exclude singing with the heart; for God is a Spirit, and to
  worship him with the voyce without the spirit, were but lip-labour;
  which (being rested in) is but lost labour, or at most profitted but
  little. Concerning the second Question we hold and believe that not
  only the Psalms of David, but any other spirituall song recorded in the
  Scripture, may lawfully be sung in Christian Churches. 2d. We grant
  also that any private Christian who hath a gifte to frame a spirituall
  song, may both frame it and sing it privately for his own private
  comfort, and remembrance of some special benefit or deliverance. Nor do
  we forbid the private use of any instrument of Music therewithall, so
  that attention to the instrument does not divert the heart from
  attention of the matter of song.

  "Whether women may sing as well as men: For in this point there be some
  that deale with us as Pharaoh delt with the Israelites, who, though he
  was at first utterly unwilling that any should go to sacrifice to the
  Lord in the Wilderness, yet being at length convinced that they must
  goe, then he was content that the men should goe, but not the women. So
  here, some that were altogether against singing of Psalms at all with
  lively voyce, yet being convinced that it is a morall worship of God
  warranted in Scripture, then if there must be a Singing, one alone must
  sing, not all (or if all) the men only, and not the women. And their
  reason is: Because it is not permitted to a women to speake in the
  Church, how then shall they sing? Much less is it permitted to them to
  prophecy in the Church. And singing the Psalms is a kind of
  Prophecying."

Peace, however, was of short duration. Fresh quarrels arose. The early
colonists were good fighters. They quarrelled over the question whether
one should sing or the whole congregation; whether women as well as men
should sing; whether pagans should be allowed to lift up their voices;
and whether the scanty stock of tunes should be enlarged. Learning a tune
by note, without having previously heard it, was almost a mortal offence,
and at last something like a compromise was effected in some of the
churches, where alternate singing by rote and rule satisfied both
parties. The ministers added to the general confusion with a flood of
circulars on the subject. Several of them issued a tract entitled "Cases
of Conscience about singing Psalms," in which they ask:--

  "Whether you do believe that singing Psalms, Hymns, and Spirituall
  Songs is an external part of Divine Worship, to be observed in and by
  the assembly of God's people on the Lord's Days, as well as on other
  occasional meetings of the Saints for the worshipping of God.

  "Whether you do believe that singing in the worship of God ought to be
  done skilfully?

  "Whether you do believe that skilfulness in singing may ordinarily be
  gained in the use of outward means by the blessing of God.

  "Is it possible for Fathers of forty years old and upward to learn to
  sing by rule; and ought they to attempt at this age to learn?

  "Do you believe that it is Lawful and Laudable for us to change the
  customary way of singing the psalms?

  "Whether they who purposely sing a tune different from that which is
  appointed by the pastor or elder to be sung are not guilty of acting
  disorderly, and of taking God's name in vain also, by disturbing the
  order of the sanctuary."

Rev. Thomas Symmes, of Bradford, Mass., also issued a tract in which he
contended for rule-singing. On this point he says:--

  "The total neglect of singing psalms by many serious Christians for
  want of skill in singing psalm-tunes. There are many who never employ
  their tongues in singing God's praises, because they have no skill. It
  is with great difficulty that this part of worship is performed, and
  with great indecency in some congregations for want of skill; it is to
  be feared singing must be wholly omitted in some places for want of
  skill if this art is not revived. I was present in a congregation where
  singing was for a whole Sabbath omitted for want of a man able to lead
  the assembly in singing.

  "The declining from and getting beside the rule was gradual and
  insensible. Singing-schools and singing-books being laid aside, there
  was no way to learn, but only by hearing of tunes sung or by taking the
  run of the tunes, as it is phrased. The rules of singing not being
  taught or learnt, every one sang as best pleased himself; and every
  leading-singer would take the liberty to raise any note of the tune, or
  lower it, as best pleased his ear, and add such notes and flourishes as
  were grateful to him; and this was done so gradually as that but few if
  any took notice of it. One Clerk or Chorister would alter the tunes a
  little in his day, the next a little in his, and so one after another,
  till in fifty or sixty years it caused a considerable alteration."

John Eliot, who was having famous success with the Indians, particularly
in teaching them psalm-singing,--for Dr. Mather says "their singing was
most ravishing,"--made a long contribution to the general discussion,
which contains the following "Lamentation:"--

  "That musick, which in itself is concord, harmony, melody, sweetness,
  charming even to irrational creatures, cheers the spirits of men, and
  tends to raise them in devotion, and in the praises of God, and was
  instituted by God as a means of divine worship, which is a terrour to
  evil spirits, the delight of the holy Angels, and will be everlasting
  imployment of those Seraphim and the glorified Saints, should be an
  occasion of strife, debate, discord, contention, quarelling, and all
  manner of disorder. That men, the only creatures in the lower creation
  that are accomplished with reason and apt organs to praise God with,
  should improve them so to dishonour him; and that instead of an
  angelick temper in man, which they are capable of, and is required of
  them, and especially in this matter, there should be rather a cynick
  disposition and an improvement of such noble Organ to bark, snarl at,
  and bite one another; that instead of one heart and one voice in the
  praises of our Glorious Creator and most bountiful Benefactor, there
  should be only jangle, discord, and sluring and reviling one another,
  etc., this is, and shall be, for a lamentation."

The essay closes with the following exhortation:

  "Whatever our thoughts are as to the mode or vocal part, whether the
  _old_ or the _new way_ (as it is called) be most pleasing to us, it
  would be our wisdom and a manifestation of our Christianity to deny
  ourselves and our own obstinate wills, which are apparently the chief
  cause of our contention in these things, and condescend (at least) so
  far one to the other as to keep time, _i.e._ to begin and end the lines
  all together, which if we did, there would not in most of the tunes
  commonly sung be so wide a difference as is by some imagined, many of
  the lines being near alike; if we all sincerely endeavour to exercise
  grace in Singing, and to perform the vocal part in the best manner we
  could, our service would be accepted of God. And I doubt not but
  regular singing would have a better relish with the most of our people
  and be comply'd with, and so our differences would end in a good and
  lasting union, and our jars and discords in a sweet and delightful
  concord and harmony. So let it be: Amen."

At last harmony was restored, and a serious effort was made to introduce
better singing, in which the college at Cambridge took a leading part. In
1712, Rev. John Tufts, of Newbury, issued a book of twenty-eight tunes,
so arranged by appending letters to the notes, as F for Fa, S for Sol,
etc., "that the learner may attain the skill of singing them with the
greatest ease and speed imaginable." These tunes were reprinted in three
parts from Playford's "Book of Psalms." In 1721, Rev. Thomas Walter, of
Roxbury, Mass., issued a new book, also compiled from Playford, which was
highly commended by the clergy. The English singing-books by Tansur and
Williams were reprinted by Thomas Bailey, at Newburyport, Mass., and had
a large circulation. In 1761, James Lyon, of Philadelphia, published a
very ambitious work, called "Urania, or a choice collection of Psalm
Tunes, Anthems, and Hymns," which was compiled from the English books.
The edition, however, was a small one, and was issued in such an
expensive manner that it ruined the unfortunate author. In 1764 appeared
another collection, made by Josiah Flagg, who was a composer himself as
well as band-master. Its title reads: "A Collection of the best Psalm
Tunes in two, three, and four parts, from the most approved authors,
fitted to all measures and approved by the best masters in Boston, New
England; the greater part of them never before printed in America.
Engraved by Paul Revere, printed and sold by him and Jos. Flagg." About
the same time Daniel Bailey, of Newburyport, Mass., published "A new and
complete Introduction to the Grounds and Rules of Music, in two Books;"
and in 1769, "the American Harmony," reprinted from English collections.

Up to this period, or, more strictly, to the year 1770, no American
composers had contributed to New England psalmody. Though numerous
singing-books had appeared, they were compiled from the English
collections and reprinted. The first composer of church music in America
was William Billings, born at Boston, Oct. 7, 1747. He was the son of
poor parents, and followed tanning for an occupation. Gould, in his
"History of Church Music," says of him:--

  "Billings was somewhat deformed in person, blind in one eye, one leg
  shorter than the other, one arm somewhat withered, with a mind as
  eccentric as his person was deformed. To say nothing of the deformity
  of his habits, suffice it, he had a propensity for taking snuff that
  may seem almost incredible, when in these days those who use it are not
  very much inclined to expose the article. He used to carry it in his
  coat-pocket, which was made of leather; and every few minutes, instead
  of taking it in the usual manner, with thumb and finger, would take out
  a handful and snuff it from between his thumb and clenched hand. We
  might infer from this circumstance that his voice could not have been
  very pleasant and delicate."

This uncouth and eccentric tanner was the father of American church
music, and of American choirs, concerts, and singing-schools as well. He
wrote his first tunes on the boards of the tannery as he tended the
bark-mill. He was a zealous patriot; and as Governor Samuel Adams was not
only a still more zealous patriot, but devotedly attached to music, the
two became warm friends and at one time sang together in a choir,
evidently much to the distress of Adams, as his companion had a
stentorian voice. His association with Adams led him to the composition
of songs of a patriotic and religious character, one of which, set to the
tune known as "Chester," played an important part in rousing the martial
spirit of the colonists. It runs as follows:--

    "Let tyrants shake their iron rod,
      And slavery clank her galling chains;
    We'll fear them not, we'll trust in God;
      New England's God forever reigns.

    "The foe comes on with haughty stride,
      Our troops advance with martial noise;
    Their veterans flee before our arms,
      And generals yield to beardless boys."

That the tanner had a sly humor of his own is demonstrated by the
following instructions appended to one of his anthems which was performed
in a concert:--

    "We've met for a concert of modern invention;
    To tickle the ear is our present intention;
    The audience seated, expect to be treated
    With a piece of the best.

          "And since we all agree
          To set the key on E,
          The author's darling key
          He prefers to the rest,
          The bass take the lead,
          And firmly proceed;
          Let the tenor succeed," etc.

In 1770 his first compositions appeared in a work of one hundred and
eight pages entitled "The New England Psalm Singer; or American
Chorister. Containing a number of Psalm Tunes, Anthems, and Canons. In
four and five parts. (Never before published.) Composed by William
Billings, a native of Boston, in New England. Matt. xii. 16, 'Out of the
mouth of Babes and Sucklings hast thou perfected Praise;' James v. 13,
'Is any merry, let him sing Psalms.'

    'O, praise the Lord with one consent,
      And in this grand design
    Let Britain and the Colonies
      Unanimously join.'

Boston: New England. Printed by Edes and Gill."

In the preface to this work he quaintly says:--

  "_To all Musical Practitioners._

  "Perhaps it may be expected by some, that I could say something
  concerning rules for composition; to these I answer that _Nature is the
  best Dictator_, for all the hard dry studied rules that ever were
  prescribed will not enable any person to form an Air any more than the
  four and twenty letters, and strict Grammatical rules will qualify a
  scholar for composing a piece of Poetry, or properly adjusting a
  Tragedy without a Genius. It must be Nature; Nature must lay the
  Foundation, Nature must give the Thought. But perhaps some may think I
  mean and intend to throw Art entirely out of Question. I answer by no
  Means, for the more Art is displayed, the more Art is decorated. And in
  some sorts of composition there is dry Study requir'd, and Art very
  requisite. For instance, in a Fuge. But even there Art is subservient
  to Genius, for Fancy goes first, and strikes out the Work roughly, and
  Art comes after and polishes it over. But to return to my Text: I have
  read several Authors' Rules on Composition, and find the strictest of
  them make some Exceptions, as thus, they say that two 8vos or two 5ths
  may not be taken together rising or falling, unless one be Major and
  the other Minor; but rather than spoil the Air, they will allow that
  Breach to be made, and this Allowance gives great Latitude to young
  Composers, for they may always make that Plea, and say, if I am not
  allowed to transgress the Rules of composition I shall certainly spoil
  the Air, and cross the Strain that Fancy dictated. And indeed this is
  without dispute, a very just Plea, for I am sure I have often and
  sensibly felt the disagreeable and slavish Effect of such Restraint as
  is here pointed out, and so I believe every Composer of Poetry as well
  as Musick, for I presume there are strict Rules for Poetry, as for
  Musick. But as I have often heard of a Poetical License I don't see why
  with the same propriety there may not be a musical License, for Poetry
  and Musick are in close Connection, and nearly allied besides they are
  often assistants to each other, and like a true friend often hide each
  other's feelings. For I have known a Piece of Poetry that hath neither
  Rhime nor Reason in it, pass for tolerable good sense because it
  happened to be set to an excellent Piece of Musick, and to get Respect
  rather for its good Fortune in falling into such respectable company
  than for any Merit in itself: so likewise I have known and heard a very
  indifferent Tune often sung and much caress'd, only because it was set
  to a fine Piece of Poetry, without this recommendation, perhaps it
  would not be sung twice over by one Person, and would be deemed to be
  dearly bought only at the expense of Breath requisite to perform it.

  "For my own part, as I don't think myself confined to any Rules for
  Composition laid down by any that went before me, neither should I
  think (were I to pretend to lay down rules) that any who comes after me
  were any ways obligated to adhere to them any further than they should
  think proper; so in fact I think it is best for every composer to be
  his own learner. Therefore upon this consideration, for me to dictate,
  or pretend to prescribe Rules of this Nature for others, would not only
  be very unnecessary but also a very great piece of Vanity."

His second work was the "Singing Master's Assistant," an abridgment and
revision of his first. His humor again crops out in the following extract
from its preface:--

  "Kind reader, no doubt you remember that about ten years ago I
  published a book entitled 'The New England Psalm-Singer;' and truly a
  most masterly performance I then thought it to be. How lavish was I of
  encomium on this my infant production! 'Welcome, thrice Welcome, thou
  legitimate Offspring of my brain, go forth my little book, go forth and
  immortalize the name of your Author: may your sale be rapid and may you
  speedily run through ten thousand Editions,' said I, 'Thou art my
  Reuben, my first born; the beginning of my Strength, the Excellency of
  my Dignity, and the Excellency of my power.' But to my great
  mortification I soon discovered it was Reuben in the sequel, and Reuben
  all over; I have discovered that many pieces  were never worth my
  printing or your inspection.

  "It is the duty of Christians to praise God publicly by singing of
  psalms together in the congregation, and also privately in the family.
  In singing of psalms the voice is to be audible and gravely ordered;
  but the chief care must be to sing with understanding and with grace in
  the heart, making melody unto the Lord. That the whole congregation may
  join therein, every one that can read is to have a psalm-book, and all
  others not disabled by age or otherwise are to be exhorted to learn to
  read. But for the present, where many in the congregation cannot read,
  it is convenient that the minister or some fit person to be appinted by
  him and the other ruling officers, do read the psalms line by line,
  before the singing thereof."

Billings's other publications were "Music in Miniature," "Psalm Singers'
Amusement," "Suffolk Harmony," and "Continental Harmony." Though the
crudest of musical works, for he was entirely unacquainted with harmony
and musical rules, they had an immense influence. He was the pioneer, and
the path he cleared was soon crowded with his successors. The most
prominent of these were Andrew Law, born at Cheshire, Conn., in 1748, who
published many books and taught in most of the New England States; Jacob
Kimball, born at Topsfield, Mass., in 1761, who published the "Rural
Harmony;" Oliver Holden, of Charlestown, Mass., who published the
"American Harmony," "Union Harmony," and "Worcester Collection," and
wrote the favorite tune "Coronation;" Samuel Holyoke, born at Boxford,
Mass., in 1771, author of the "Harmonia Americana" and "Columbian
Repository;" Daniel Reed, born at Rehoboth, Mass., in 1757, who published
the "American Singing-Book" and "Columbian Harmony;" Jacob French, born
at Stoughton, Mass., in 1754, who issued a work entitled "Harmony of
Harmony;" Timothy Swan, born at Suffield, Conn., in 1757, who published
"Federal Harmony" and "New England Harmony," and wrote the familiar tunes
"Poland" and "China;" John Hubbard, who wrote many anthems and treatises
on music; Dutton, of Hartford, Conn., who issued the "Hartford
Collection," and wrote the tune of "Woodstock;" Oliver Shaw, born at
Middleborough, Mass., in 1799, who was totally blind, but became a very
successful teacher and composer. Gould says that his compositions were
"truly original," and one of them, "There's Nothing True but Heaven," was
repeated night after night by the Boston Handel and Haydn Society.


The era of psalm composers was followed by that of the singing-school
teachers, who exerted a mighty influence upon sacred music and musical
taste. At the same time numerous societies were organized, among them the
Handel and Haydn Society of Boston, which was born April 20, 1815, and
still exists,--a vigorous growth from the little gathering which gave its
first concert on Christmas, Dec. 25, 1815, singing the first part of "The
Creation" and selections from Handel's works, and was pronounced by an
enthusiastic critic of that time "the wonder of the nation." The great
singing-teachers were Thomas Hastings of Washington, Conn., Lowell Mason
of Mansfield, Mass., Nathaniel D. Gould of Chelmsford, Mass. Still later
came George F. Root, Woodbury, Dyer, Bradbury, Ives, Johnson, and others,
whose labors, both as composers and teachers, are familiar to all lovers
of sacred music even at this day. The old-fashioned singing-school,
however, has disappeared. The musical convention still survives in rural
places. The great festivals, oratorio societies, the modern concert
stage, even the opera, have all had their effect upon sacred music. The
paid choir of professional musicians marks a long departure from the
robust Puritan psalm-singers; its music is equally remote from the
jingling tunes of Billings which "tickled the ears" of the colonists.




                                APPENDIX.


The following chronological  list is intended to present to the reader a
statement of the more important sacred music which has been written
during the last two centuries, with its composers and dates, for the
purposes of reference.

  Allegri
    Miserere (1630).
  Arne
    Abel (1755);
    Judith (1764).
  Bach
    St. John Passion (1720);
    Magnificat in D (1723);
    St. Matthew Passion (1729);
    Christmas Oratorio (1734).
  Barnby
    Rebekah (1870).
  Beethoven
    Mount of Olives (1799-1801);
    Mass in C (1807);
    Mass in D (1822).
  Benedict
    St. Cecilia (1866);
    St. Peter (1870).
  Bennett
    Woman of Samaria (1867).
  Berlioz
    Grande Messe des Morts (1837);
    L'Enfance du Christ (1854).
  Brahms
    German Requiem (1868).
  Costa
    Eli (1855);
    Naaman (1864).
  Cusins
    Gideon (1871).
  Crotch
    Palestine (1812);
    Captivity of Judah (1834).
  David
    Moses on Sinai (1846).
  Dvorák
    Stabat Mater (1875).
  Goldschmidt
    Ruth (1867).
  Gounod
    Messe Solenelle (1850);
    Tobie (1870);
    Redemption (1883);
    Mors et Vita (1885).
  Graun
    The Death of Jesus (1755);
    Prague Te Deum (1756).
  Handel
    First Passion Oratorio (1704);
    La Resurrezione (1708);
    Il trionfo del Tempo (1708);
    Utrecht Te Deum (1713);
    Second Passion Oratorio (1716);
    Esther (1720);
    Deborah (1733);
    Athalia (1733);
    Saul (1738);
    Israel in Egypt (1738);
    Messiah (1741);
    Samson (1742);
    Joseph (1743);
    Dettingen Te Deum (1743);
    Belshazzar (1744);
    Occasional Oratorio (1745);
    Judas Maccabæus (1746);
    Alexander Balus (1747);
    Joshua (1747);
    Solomon (1748);
    Susanna (1748);
    Theodora (1749);
    Jephtha (1751).
  Haydn
    Stabat Mater (1771);
    Return of Tobias (1774);
    Mariazeller Mass (1782);
    Imperial Mass (1797);
    The Creation (1796-98);
    Te Deum (1800);
    The Seasons (1800);
    The Seven Words (1801).
  Hiller
    The Destruction of Jerusalem (1839).
  Horsley
    Gideon (1860).
  Kiel
    Requiem (1862);
    Christus (1866).
  Klein
    Job (1820);
    Jephthah (1828);
    David (1830).
  Lassus
    Penitential Psalms (1565);
    Vigiliæ Mortuorum (1565).
  Leslie
    Immanuel (1853);
    Judith (1858).
  Liszt
    Graner Mass (1854);
    Hungarian Coronation Mass (1856);
    Legend of Saint Elizabeth (1864);
    Christus (1866).
  Macfarren
    John the Baptist (1873);
    The Resurrection (1876);
    Joseph (1877).
  Mackenzie
    Rose of Sharon (1884).
  Marx
    Moses (1850).
  Massenet
    Mary Magdalen (1873);
    Eve (1875);
    The Virgin (1879).
  Mendelssohn
    Psalm cxv (1830);
    Psalm xcv (1835);
    St. Paul (1836);
    Hymn of Praise (1840);
    Elijah (1838-46);
    Christus (1844-47);
    Lauda Sion (1846).
  Meyerbeer
    God and Nature (1811).
  Mozart
    Coronation Mass (1779);
    Mass in C (1780);
    Mass in G (1785);
    Mass in B (1791);
    Ave Verum (1791);
    Requiem (1791).
  Neukomm
    Mount Sinai (1830);
    David (1834).
  Ouseley
    St. Polycarp (1854);
    Hagar (1873).
  Paine
    St. Peter (1873).
  Palestrina
    Papæ Marcelli Mass (1563);
    Stabat Mater (1589);
    Requiem (1591).
  Pergolesi
    Stabat Mater (1736).
  Pierson
    Jerusalem (1852).
  Randegger
    Psalm cl (1872).
  Reinthaler
    Jephta (1856).
  Rossini
    Moses in Egypt (1818);
    Stabat Mater (1832-41);
    Messe Solenelle (1864).
  Rubinstein
    Tower of Babel (1870);
    Paradise Lost (1876).
  Schneider (Fr.)
    The Judgement of the World (1819);
    Paradise Lost (1824);
    Pharaoh (1828);
    Christ the Child (1829);
    Gideon (1829);
    Gethsemane and Golgotha (1838).
  Schubert
    Lazarus (1820).
  Schumann
    Paradise and the Peri (1843);
    Advent Hymn (1848);
    Mass and Requiem (1852).
  Schutz
    Passions' Music (1665).
  Spohr
    The Last Judgment (1812);
    The Last Things (1826);
    Calvary (1833);
    Fall of Babylon (1840).
  Stanford
    The Three Holy Children (1885).
  Sullivan
    The Prodigal Son (1869);
    Light of the World (1873);
    Martyr of Antioch (1880).
  Verdi
    Manzoni Requiem (1874);
    Pater Noster and Ave Maria (1880).
  Vogler
    Magnificat and Stabat Mater (1777).
  Wagner
    Das Liebesmahl der Apostel (1843).
  Winter
    Pilgrimage to Calvary (1792);
    Stabat Mater (1805).




                                 INDEX.


  Ainsworth, Henry, 313.
  Albrechtsberger, 239.
  Allison, Richard, 312.
  Appendix, 329.
  Astorga, 253.
  Athalia, 21.

  Bach, 19-21, 24, 26, 30, 61, 65, 269, 275;
    life of, 31.
  Bailey, Daniel, 320.
  Bailey, Thomas, 320.
  Bay Psalm Book, 313, 314.
  Beethoven, 23, 91, 161, 174, 218, 219, 235, 236, 282, 307;
    life of, 51.
  Belshazzar, 22.
  Benedict, 205.
  Bennett, Sterndale, 26, 200, 274, 290;
    life of, 60.
  Berlioz, 27, 30, 259;
    life of, 68.
  Billings, William, 321-326.
  Blow, Dr., 30.
  Bononcini, 17, 115.
  Bradbury, 328.
  Brahms, 27, 92, 272;
    life of, 78.

  Caldara, 17.
  Carissimi, 15.
  Cherubini, 27, 68, 71, 178.
  Chopin, 258, 272.
  Christmas Oratorio (Bach), 20, 33.
  Christmas Oratorio (Saint-Saëns), 269.
  Christus (Liszt), 186.
  Christus (Mendelssohn), 25, 229.
  Cimarosa, 23.
  Colonna, 17, 27.
  Costa, 82.
  Cotton, John, 314.
  Creation, 136, 162.
  Croft, Dr., 30.

  Damon, William, 311.
  Das jüngste Gericht, 23, 283, 286.
  Deborah, 21.
  Der Tod Jesu, 20.
  Des Heilands letzte Stunden, 24.
  Dettingen Te Deum, 155.
  Die Auferstehung Christi, 19.
  Die Sieben Wörte Christi, 19.
  Dutton, 327.
  Dvorák, 253;
    life of, 90.
  Dyer, 328.

  Eli, 84.
  Elijah, 25, 218.
  Eliot, John, 313, 318.
  Emilio del Cavaliere, 14, 15.
  Engedi, 58.
  Esther, 21.

  Fall of Babylon, 24.
  Federici, 17.
  Flagg, Josiah, 320.
  French, Jacob, 327.
  Fux, 22.

  Gabrielli, 18.
  German Requiem, 27, 80.
  Gluck, 160.
  Gould, Nathaniel D., 328.
  Gounod, 15, 20, 26;
    life of, 96.
  Graun, 20, 30.
  Grétry, 174.

  Habeneck, 75, 76, 77.
  Handel, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 24, 26, 30;
    life of, 114.
  Handel and Haydn Society, 327.
  Hasse, 22.
  Hastings, Thomas, 328.
  Haydn, 19, 22, 23, 26, 28, 80, 136, 253, 307;
    life of, 159.
  Heine, 256, 257.
  Hiller, 26, 70, 222, 256, 273.
  Himmel, 23.
  Holden, Oliver, 326.
  Holyoke, Samuel, 326.
  Hubbard, John, 327.
  Hymn of Praise, 25, 213.

  Israel in Egypt, 21, 23, 117.
  Italian oratorio composers, 15
  Ives, 328.

  Joachim, 78, 92.
  Johnson, 328.
  Joseph, 22.
  Joshua, 22, 154.
  Judas Maccabæus, 22, 149.

  Keiser, Reinhard, 19, 20.

  Kimball, Jacob, 326.

  La Rappresentazione dell' Anima e del Corpo, 14.
  Last Judgment, 23, 283.
  Latimer, 310.
  Law, Andrew, 326.
  Legend of the Holy Elizabeth, 180.
  Light of the World, 294.
  Liszt, 78, 256, 258;
    life of, 177.
  Lyon, James, 320.

  Macfarren, George A., 30;
    life of, 199.
  Mackenzie, 191.
  Magnificat (Bach), 48.
  Magnificats, 26, 30.
  Martin Luther, 309.
  Mason, Lowell, 328.
  Massenet, 26.
  Mattheson, 20.
  Mazzocchi, 17.
  Mendelssohn, 24, 25, 26, 30, 60, 256, 257;
    life of, 206.
  Messe des Morts, 27, 71.
  Messiah, 21, 23, 25, 39, 140.
  Meyerbeer, 83.
  Mors et Vita, 26, 106.
  Moscheles, 257, 271.
  Mount of Olives, 23, 53.
  Mozart, 30, 60, 282, 307;
    life of, 234.
  Mysteries and miracle-plays, 10, 11, 12.

  Neukomm, 253.

  Oratorio, its origin, 9;
    in England, 21;
    in Germany, 22;
    oratorios of the present century, 23-26.

  Paine, 26, 245.
  Palestrina, 27, 28, 96, 253, 307.
  Paradise and the Peri, 25, 273.
  Paradise Lost, 26, 264.
  Passion Music, 18, 19, 20.
  Pistocchi, 17.
  Playford's Psalms, 320.
  Porpora, 22, 115, 160.
  Prodigal Son, 292.
  Protestant Psalmody, 309.
  Psalmody in England, 310.
  Puritan reforms, 310.

  Ravenscroft Collection, 312.
  Redemption, 26, 98.
  Reed, Daniel, 327.
  Reményí, 78.
  Requiem (Manzoni), 27, 303.
  Requiem (Mozart), 236.
  Requiems, 26, 27.
  Rheinthaler, 26.
  Richter, Jean Paul, 273.
  Root, George F., 328.
  Rose of Sharon, 192.
  Rossini, 222, 303, 307;
    life of, 251.
  Rubinstein, 26;
    life of, 258.

  Sacred dramas, 13, 14.
  Sacred Music in America, 309.
  Saint-Saëns, 26, 267.
  Salieri, 23, 168, 177.
  Samson, 22, 131.
  Sarti, 30.
  Saul, 21, 125.
  Scarlatti, 16.
  Schneider, 24.
  Schubert, 23, 91, 273.
  Schumann, 25, 60, 78, 79, 81;
    life of, 271.
  Schütz, 18.
  Seasons, 22, 170.
  Sebastiani, 19.
  Shaw, Oliver, 327.
  Spohr, 23, 26, 52, 91;
    life of, 280.
  St. John Passion, 20.
  St. John the Baptist, 201.
  St. Matthew Passion, 20, 24, 39.
  St. Paul, 25, 208.
  St. Peter, 26, 246.
  Stabat Mater (Dvorák), 28, 92.
  Stabat Mater (Rossini), 28, 253.
  Stabat Maters, 27.
  Stephani, 18.
  Sternhold and Hopkins, 311, 313.
  Stradella, 16, 17.
  Sullivan, 30, 290.
  Swan, Timothy, 327.
  Symmes, Thomas, 317.

  Tansur and Williams, 320.
  Te Deums, 28, 29.
  Telemann, 20.
  Thalberg, 258.
  The Bleeding and Dying Jesus, 19.
  Theile, 19.
  Theodora, 22.
  Thomas, Theodore, 80, 99, 192, 246, 269, 291.
  Tower of Babel, 26, 260.
  Tufts, John, 319.

  Verdi, 256;
    life of, 301.
  Victor Hugo, 69, 178.
  Vittoria, 27.
  Von Bülow, 179, 307.

  Wagner, 65, 83, 179, 186, 268, 282.
  Walter, Thomas, 320.
  Weber, 281.
  Weniawski, 259.
  Winter, 23.
  Woman of Samaria, 26, 62.
  Woodbury, 328.

  Zingarelli, 23.




                       UPTON'S MUSICAL HANDBOOKS.


                            UNIFORM IN STYLE.


                                   I.

The Standard Operas. Their Plots, their Music, and their Composers. A
Handbook. 12mo, yellow edges, $1.50; extra gilt, gilt edges, $2.00.


                                   II.

The Standard Oratorios. Their Stories, their Music, and their Composers.
A Handbook. 12mo, yellow edges, $1.50; extra gilt, gilt edges, $2.00.


                                  III.

The Standard Cantatas. Their Stories, their Music, and their Composers. A
Handbook. 12mo, yellow edges, $1.50; extra gilt, gilt edges, $2.00.


                                   IV.

The Standard Symphonies. Their History, their Music, and their Composers.
A Handbook. 12mo, yellow edges, $1.50; extra gilt, gilt edges, $2.00.


THE STANDARD OPERAS. Their Plots, their Music, and their Composers. By
George P. Upton, author of "Woman in Music," etc., etc.

  12mo, flexible cloth, yellow edges    $1.50
  The same, extra gilt, gilt edges      $2.00


  "Mr. Upton has performed a service that can hardly be too highly
  appreciated, in collecting the plots, music, and the composers of the
  standard operas, to the number of sixty-four, and bringing them
  together in one perfectly arranged volume.... His work is one simply
  invaluable to the general reading public. Technicalities are avoided,
  the aim being to give to musically uneducated lovers of the opera a
  clear understanding of the works they hear. It is description, not
  criticism, and calculated to greatly increase the intelligent enjoyment
  of music."--_Boston Traveller._

  "Among the multitude of handbooks which are published every year, and
  are described by easy-going writers of book-notices as supplying a
  long-felt want, we know of none which so completely carries out the
  intention of the writer as 'The Standard Operas,' by Mr. George P.
  Upton, whose object is to present to his readers a comprehensive sketch
  of each of the operas contained in the modern repertory.... There are
  thousands of music-loving people who will be glad to have the kind of
  knowledge which Mr. Upton has collected for their benefit, and has cast
  in a clear and compact form."--_R. H. Stoddard, in "Evening Mail and
  Express" (New York)._

  "The summaries of the plots are so clear, logical, and well written,
  that one can read them with real pleasure, which cannot be said of the
  ordinary operatic synopses. But the most important circumstance is that
  Mr. Upton's book is fully abreast of the times."--_The Nation (New
  York)._


  _Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, post-paid, on receipt of price,
  by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.

THE STANDARD CANTATAS. Their Stories, their Music, and their Composers. A
Handbook. By George P. Upton. 12mo, 367 pages, yellow edges, price,
$1.50; extra gilt, gilt edges, $2.00.

  In half calf, gilt top       $3.25
  In half morocco, gilt edges   3.75
  In tree calf, gilt edges      5.50


  The "Standard Cantatas" forms the third volume in the uniform series
  which already includes the now well known "Standard Operas" and the
  "Standard Oratorios." This latest work deals with a class of musical
  compositions, midway between the opera and the oratorio, which is
  growing rapidly in favor both with composers and audiences.

  As in the two former works, the subject is treated, so far as possible,
  in an untechnical manner, so that it may satisfy the needs of musically
  uneducated music lovers, and add to their enjoyment by a plain
  statement of the story of the cantata and a popular analysis of its
  music, with brief pertinent selections from its poetical text.

  The book includes a comprehensive essay on the origin of the cantata,
  and its development from rude beginnings; biographical sketches of the
  composers; carefully prepared descriptions of the plots and the music;
  and an appendix containing the names and dates of composition of all
  the best known cantatas from the earliest times.

  This series of works on popular music has steadily grown in favor since
  the appearance of the first volume on the Operas. When the series is
  completed, as it will be next year by a volume on the Standard
  Symphonies, it will be, as the New York 'Nation' has said,
  indispensable to every musical library.


  _Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, post-paid, on receipt of price,
  by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.




                        BIOGRAPHIES OF MUSICIANS.


  LIFE OF LISZT. With Portrait.
    LIFE OF HAYDN. With Portrait.
      LIFE OF MOZART. With Portrait.
        LIFE OF WAGNER. With Portrait.
          LIFE OF BEETHOVEN. With Portrait.

_From the German of Dr. Louis Nohl._

  In cloth, per volume            $ .75
  The same, in neat box, per set   3.75
  In half calf, per set           12.00

  Of the "Life of Liszt," the _Herald_ (Boston) says: "It is written in
  great simplicity and perfect taste, and is wholly successful in all
  that it undertakes to portray."

  Of the "Life of Haydn," the _Gazette_ (Boston) says: "No fuller history
  of Haydn's career, the society in which he moved, and of his personal
  life can be found than is given in this work."

  Of the "Life of Mozart," the _Standard_ says: "Mozart supplies a
  fascinating subject for biographical treatment. He lives in these pages
  somewhat as the world saw him, from his marvellous boyhood till his
  untimely death."

  Of the "Life of Wagner," the _American_ (Baltimore) says: "It gives in
  vigorous outlines those events of the life of the tone poet which
  exercised the greatest influences upon his artistic career.... It is a
  story of a strange life devoted to lofty aims."

  Of the "Life of Beethoven," the _National Journal of Education_ says:
  "Beethoven was great and noble as a man, and his artistic creations
  were in harmony with his great nature. The story of his life, outlined
  in this volume, is of the deepest interest."


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.

MUSIC-STUDY IN GERMANY. By Amy Fay. Eighth edition. 12mo, 352 pages.
Price, $1.25.


  "One of the brightest small books we have seen is Amy Fay's
  'Music-Study in Germany.' These letters were written home by a young
  lady who went to Germany to perfect her piano-playing. They are full of
  simple, artless, yet sharp and intelligent sayings concerning the ways
  and tastes of the fatherland.... Her observation is close and accurate,
  and the sketches of Tausig, Liszt, and other musical celebrities are
  capitally done."--_Christian Advocate (New York)._

  "It is bright and entertaining, being filled with descriptions,
  opinions, and facts in regard to the many distinguished musicians and
  artists of the present day. A little insight into the home life of the
  German people is presented to the reader, and the atmosphere of art
  seems to give a brightness and worth to the picture, which imparts
  pleasure with the interest it creates."--_Dwight's Journal of Music._

  "The intrinsic value of the work is great; its simplicity, its minute
  details, its freedom from every kind of affectation, constitute in
  themselves most admirable qualities. The remarkably intimate and open
  picture we get of Liszt surpasses any picture of him heretofore
  afforded. It is a charming picture, strong, simple, gracious, noble,
  and sincere."--_Times (Chicago)._

  "In delicacy of touch, vivacity and ease of expression, and general
  charm of style, these letters are models in their way. The pictures
  which she gives of the various masters under whom she studied have the
  value that all such representations possess when they are drawn from
  life and with fidelity."--_Graphic (New York)._


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, post-paid, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.




                          THE SURGEON'S STORIES


By Z. Topelius, Professor of History, University of Finland. Translated
from the original Swedish, comprising--

  Times of Gustaf Adolf,
    Times of Battle and Rest,
      Times of Charles XII.,
        Times of Frederick I.,
          Times of Linnæus,
            Times of Alchemy.

  In cloth, per volume, 75 cents.
  The same, in box, per set, $4.50.


  These stories have been everywhere received with the greatest favor.
  They cover the most interesting and exciting periods of Swedish and
  Finnish history. They combine history and romance, and the two are
  woven together in so skilful and attractive a manner that the reader of
  one volume is rarely satisfied until he has read all. Of their
  distinguished author the _Saturday Review_, London, says, "He enjoys
  the greatest celebrity among living Swedish writers;" and R. H.
  Stoddard has styled them "the most important and certainly the most
  readable series of foreign fiction that has been translated into
  English for many years." They should stand on the shelves of every
  library, public and private, beside the works of Sir Walter Scott.

  The Graphic, New York, says:

  "Topelius is evidently a great romancer,--a great romancer in the
  manner of Walter Scott. At moments in his writing there is positive
  inspiration, a truth and vivid reality that are startling."

  The Sun, Philadelphia, says:

  "We would much prefer teaching a youth Swedish history from the novels
  of Topelius than from any book of strict historical narrative."

  The Standard, Chicago, says:

  "The series as a whole deserves a place with the very best fiction of
  the present time. The scenery is new to most readers; the historical
  period covered one of transcendent interest; the characters, the
  incidents, the narrative style in each story are of the sort to carry
  the reader straight through, from beginning to end, unwearied, and
  ready, as each volume closes, to open the next in order."


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, post-paid, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.

FAMILIAR TALKS ON ENGLISH LITERATURE. A Manual embracing the Great Epochs
of English Literature, from the English conquest of Britain, 449, to the
death of Walter Scott, 1832. By Abby Sage Richardson, Fourth edition,
revised. Price $1.50.


  The Boston Transcript says:

  "The work shows thorough study and excellent judgment, and we can
  warmly recommend it to schools and private classes for reading as an
  admirable text-book."

  The New York Evening Mail says:

  "What the author proposed to do was to convey to her readers a clear
  idea of the variety, extent, and richness of English literature.... She
  has done just what she intended to do, and done it well."

  The New York Nation says:

  "It is refreshing to find a book designed for young readers which seeks
  to give only what will accomplish the real aim of the study; namely, to
  excite an interest in English literature, cultivate a taste for what is
  best in it, and thus lay a foundation on which they can build after
  reading."

  Prof. Moses Coit Tyler says:

  "I have had real satisfaction in looking over the book. There are some
  opinions with which I do not agree; but the main thing about the book
  is a good thing; namely, its hearty, wholesome love of English
  literature, and the honest, unpretending, but genial and
  conversational, manner in which that love is uttered. It is a charming
  book to read, and it will breed in its readers the appetite to read
  English literature for themselves."


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, post-paid, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.

TALES OF ANCIENT GREECE. By the Rev. Sir G. W. Cox, Bart., M.A., Trinity
College, Oxford.

12mo, cloth, price, $1.25.


  "Written apparently for young readers, it yet possesses a charm of
  manner which will recommend it to all."--_The Examiner, London._

  "It is only when we take up such a book as this that we realize how
  rich in interest is the mythology of Greece."--_Inquirer,
  Philadelphia._

  "Admirable in style, and level with a child's comprehension. These
  versions might well find a place in every family."--_The Nation, New
  York._

  "The author invests these stories with a charm of narrative entirely
  peculiar. The book is a rich one in every way."--_Standard, Chicago._

  "In Mr. Cox will be found yet another name to be enrolled among those
  English writers who have vindicated for this country an honorable rank
  in the investigation of Greek history."--_Edinburgh Review._

  "It is doubtful if these tales--antedating history in their origin, and
  yet fresh with all the charms of youth to all who read them for the
  first time--were ever before presented in so chaste and popular
  form."--_Golden Rule, Boston._

  "The grace with which these old tales of the mythology are re-told
  makes them as enchanting to the young as familiar fairy tales or the
  'Arabian Nights.'... We do not know of a Christmas book which promises
  more lasting pleasures."--_Publishers' Weekly._

  "Its exterior fits it to adorn the drawing-room table, while its
  contents are adapted to the entertainment of the most cultivated
  intelligence.... The book is a scholarly production, and a welcome
  addition to a department of literature that is thus far quite too
  scantily furnished."--_Tribune, Chicago._


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.

SHORT HISTORY OF FRANCE, FOR YOUNG PEOPLE. By Miss E. S. Kirkland, author
of "Six Little Cooks," "Dora's House-keeping," &c.

12mo, cloth, price, $1.25.


  "A very ably written sketch of French history, from the earliest times
  to the foundation of the existing Republic."--_Cincinnati Gazette._

  "The narrative is not dry on a single page, and the little history may
  be commended as the best of its kind that has yet
  appeared."--_Bulletin, Philadelphia._

  "A book both instructive and entertaining. It is not a dry compendium
  of dates and facts, but a charmingly written history."--_Christian
  Union, New York._

  "After a careful examination of its contents, we are able to
  conscientiously give it our heartiest commendation. We know no
  elementary history of France that can at all be compared with
  it."--_Living Church._

  "A spirited and entertaining sketch of the French people and
  nation,--one that will seize and hold the attention of all bright boys
  and girls who have a chance to read it."--_Sunday Afternoon,
  Springfield (Mass.)._

  "We find its descriptions universally good, that it is admirably simple
  and direct in style, without waste of words or timidity of opinion. The
  book represents a great deal of patient labor and conscientious
  study."--_Courant, Hartford (Conn.)._

  "Miss Kirkland has composed her 'Short History of France' in the way in
  which a history for young people ought to be written; that is, she has
  aimed to present a consecutive and agreeable story, from which the
  reader can not only learn the names of kings and the succession of
  events, but can also receive a vivid and permanent impression as to the
  characters, modes of life, and the spirit of different periods."--_The
  Nation, New York._


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.




                          LAUREL-CROWNED TALES.


Abdallah; or, The Four-Leaved Shamrock. By Edouard Laboulaye. Translated
by Mary L. Booth.

Rasselas, Prince of Abyssinia. By Samuel Johnson.

Raphael; or, Pages of the Book of Life at Twenty. From the French of
Alphonse de Lamartine.

The Vicar of Wakefield. By Oliver Goldsmith.

The Epicurean. By Thomas Moore.

Picciola.  By X. B. Saintine.

An Iceland Fisherman. By Pierre Loti.

                     _Other volumes in preparation._

  Handsomely printed from new plates, on fine laid paper, 12mo, cloth,
  with gilt tops, price per volume, $1.00.

  In half calf or half morocco, $2.50.


  In planning this series, the publishers have aimed at a form which
  should combine an unpretentious elegance suited to the fastidious
  book-lover with an inexpensiveness that must appeal to the most
  moderate buyer.

  It is the intent to admit to the series only such tales as have for
  years or for generations commended themselves not only to the
  fastidious and the critical, but also to the great multitude of the
  refined reading public,--tales, in short, which combine purity and
  classical beauty of style with perennial popularity.


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.

THE BOOK-LOVER. A Guide to the Best Reading. By James Baldwin, Ph.D.
Sixth edition, 16mo, cloth, gilt top, 201 pages. Price, $1.00.

                  In half calf or half morocco, $2.75.


  Of this book, on the best in English Literature, which has already been
  declared of the highest value by the testimony of the best critics in
  this country, an edition of one thousand copies has just been ordered
  for London, the home of English Literature,--a compliment of which its
  scholarly western author may justly be proud.

  We know of no work of the kind which gives so much useful information
  in so small a space.--_Evening Telegram, New York._

  Sound in theory and in a practical point of view. The courses of
  reading laid down are made of good books, and in general, of the
  best.--_Independent, New York._

  Mr. Baldwin has written in this monograph a delightful eulogium of
  books and their manifold influence, and has gained therein two classes
  of readers,--the scholarly class, to which he belongs, and the
  receptive class, which he has benefited.--_Evening Mail and Express,
  New York._

  If a man needs that the love of books be cultivated within him, such a
  gem of a book as Dr. Baldwin's ought to do the work. Perfect and
  inviting in all that a book ought outwardly to be, its contents are
  such as to instruct the mind at the same time that they answer the
  taste, and the reader who goes carefully through its two hundred pages
  ought not only to love books in general better than he ever did before,
  but to love them more wisely, more intelligently, more
  discriminatingly, and with more profit to his own soul.--_Literary
  World, Boston._


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.

WE TWO ALONE IN EUROPE. By Mary L. Ninde. Illustrated from Original
Designs.

                     12mo, 348 pages, price, $1.50.


  The foreign travels which gave rise to this volume were of a novel and
  perhaps unprecedented kind. Two young American girls started for "the
  grand tour" with the father of one of them, and he being compelled to
  return home from London they were courageous enough to continue their
  journeyings alone. They spent two years in travel,--going as far north
  as the North Cape and south to the Nile, and including in their
  itinerary St. Petersburg and Moscow. Miss Ninde's narrative is written
  in a fresh and sprightly but unsensational style, which, with the
  unusual experiences portrayed, renders the work quite unlike the
  ordinary books of travel.

  It is a narrative told so naturally and so vividly that the two gentle
  travellers do not seem to be "alone," but to have taken at least the
  reader along with them.... It is filled with so many interesting
  glimpses of sights and scenes in many lands as to render it thoroughly
  entertaining.--_The Congregationalist, Boston._

  As the work of a bright American girl, the book is sure to command wide
  attention. The volume is handsomely bound and copiously illustrated
  with views drawn, if we mistake not, by the author's own fair hands, so
  well do they accord with the vivacious spirit of her
  narrative.--_Times, Troy, New York._

  In these days when letters and books about travels in Europe have
  become generally monotonous, to say the least, it is absolutely
  refreshing to get hold of a bright, original book like "We Two alone in
  Europe."... The book is especially interesting for its fresh, bright
  observations on manners, customs, and objects of interest as viewed
  through these young girls' eyes, and the charming spice of adventure
  running through it.--_Home Journal, Boston._


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.

THE HUMBLER POETS. A Collection of Newspaper and Periodical Verse. 1870
to 1885. By Slason Thompson. Crown 8vo, 459 pages, cloth, gilt top.
Price, $2.00.

                  In half calf or half morocco, $4.00.


  The publishers have done well in issuing this volume in a style of
  literary and artistic excellence, such as is given to the works of the
  poets of name and fame, because the contents richly entitle it to such
  distinction.--_Home Journal, Boston._

  The high poetic character of these poems, as a whole, is surprising. As
  a unit, the collection makes an impression which even a genius of the
  highest order would not be adequate to produce.... Measured by poetic
  richness, variety, and merit of the selections contained, the
  collection is a rarely good one flavored with the freshness and aroma
  of the present time.--_Independent, New York._

  Mr. Thompson winnowed out the chaff from the heap, and has given us the
  golden grain in this volume. Many old newspaper favorites will be
  recognized in this collection,--many of those song-waifs which have
  been drifting up and down the newspaper world for years, and which
  nobody owns but everybody loves. We are glad for ourselves that some
  one has been kind and tender-hearted enough to take in these fugitive
  children of the Muses and give them a safe and permanent home. The
  selection has been made with rare taste and discrimination, and the
  result is a delightful volume.--_Observer, New York._


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.

LIFE OF ABRAHAM LINCOLN, By the Hon. Isaac N. Arnold. With Steel
Portrait. 8vo, cloth, 471 pages. Price, $1.50.

                  In half calf or half morocco, $3.50.


  It is decidedly the best and most complete Life of Lincoln that has yet
  appeared.--_Contemporary Review, London._

  Mr. Arnold succeeded to a singular extent in assuming the broad view
  and judicious voice of posterity and exhibiting the greatest figure of
  our time in its true perspective.--_The Tribune, New York._

  It is the only Life of Lincoln thus far published that is likely to
  live,--the only one that has any serious pretensions to depict him with
  adequate veracity, completeness, and dignity.--_The Sun, New York._

  The author knew Mr. Lincoln long and intimately, and no one was better
  fitted for the task of preparing his biography. He has written with
  tenderness and fidelity, with keen discrimination, and with graphic
  powers of description and analysis.--_The Interior, Chicago._

  Mr. Arnold's "Life of President Lincoln" is excellent in almost every
  respect.... The author has painted a graphic and life-like portrait of
  the remarkable man who was called to decide on the destinies of his
  country at the crisis of its fate.--_The Times, London._

  The book is particularly rich in incidents connected with the early
  career of Mr. Lincoln; and it is without exception the most
  satisfactory record of his life that has yet been written. Readers will
  also find that in its entirety it is a work of absorbing and enduring
  interest that will enchain the attention more effectually than any
  novel.--_Magazine of American History, New York._


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.

THE AZTECS. Their History, Manners, and Customs. From the French of
Lucien Biart. Authorized translation by J. L. Garner.

               Illustrated, 8vo, 340 pages, price, $2.00.


  The author has travelled through the country of whose former glories
  his book is a recital, and his studies and discoveries leaven the book
  throughout. The volume is absorbingly interesting, and is as attractive
  in style as it is in material.--_Saturday Evening Gazette, Boston._

  Nowhere has this subject been more fully and intelligently treated than
  in this volume, now placed within reach of American readers. The
  mythology of the Aztecs receives special attention, and all that is
  known of their lives, their hopes, their fears, and aspirations finds
  record here.--_The Tribune, Chicago._

  The man who can rise from the study of Lucien Biart's invaluable work,
  "The Aztecs," without feelings of amazement and admiration for the
  history and the government, and for the arts cultivated by these Romans
  of the New World is not to be envied.--_The Advance, Chicago._

  The twilight origin of the present race is graphically presented: those
  strange people whose traces have almost vanished from off the face of
  the earth again live before us. Their taxes and tributes, their
  marriage ceremonies, their burial customs, laws, medicines, food,
  poetry, and dances are described.... The book is a very interesting
  one, and is brought out with copious illustrations.--_The Traveller,
  Boston._

  M. Biart is the most competent authority living on the subject of the
  Aztecs. He spent many years in Mexico, studied his subject carefully
  through all means of information, and wrote his book from the
  view-point of a scientist. His style is very attractive, and it has
  been very successfully translated. The general reader, as well as all
  scholars, will be much taken with the work.--_Chronicle Telegraph,
  Pittsburg._


_Sold by all booksellers, or mailed, on receipt of price, by_

                                         A.C. McCLURG & CO., Publishers,
                              Cor. Wabash Ave. and Madison St., Chicago.




              Transcriber's Notes to the Electronic Edition


    In the name "Dvorak", the caron over the "R" and the diacrit over the
"V" have been omitted. On the other hand, an accent has been consistently
applied to the "a".
    The publisher's catalog and ads were moved to the back of the book,
and assigned arbitrary page numbers. In the original, they were not
numbered.
    The (few) footnotes were moved to chapter ends; in the original they
were in page footers.







End of Project Gutenberg's The Standard Oratorios, by George P. Upton

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE STANDARD ORATORIOS ***

***** This file should be named 22793-8.txt or 22793-8.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/2/7/9/22793/

Produced by David Newman, Stephen Hutcheson and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
